





IMS part 1



1. History of International Monetary          
Systems, Part 1
(See handout no.2)
Four general points
As we begin to discuss the history of international monetary systems in this         
and the next two lectures, four general features are worth emphasizing at the outset.

  (1) The international monetary system (how exchange rates, balance of payments 
  and macroeconomic management         
    are managed and adjusted globally) is part of a broader international 
  regime. As such, it         
    is influenced strongly by the way power is distributed and exercised in the         
    world, as well as the presence or absence of a powerful and reliable leader         
    country.(2) Over time, international monetary systems exhibit oscillation between two         
    opposites: for example, (i) general floating versus general fixity, (ii) stability versus         
    instability, and (iii) free capital mobility versus no such mobility. It is         
    hard to say which situation is normal and which is abnormal. People often 
  believe that the prevailing system is normal and permanent, but it usually 
  isn't. Whether capital mobility         
    has become irreversible in the 21st century is an interesting and open question.
  (3) "The triangle of impossibility": Consider (i) exchange rate stability (i.e.,         
    fixed exchange rates), (ii) monetary policy independence, and (iii) free capital mobility. These         
    three things are regarded as desirable, but only two can be realized at any      
    time.         
    Different international monetary systems emerge depending on which one we give up. For example, if we 
  abandon the first, we have a floating rate     
    system; and if the second is removed, monetary union like EU will emerge,     
    and so on.(4) Since the 19th century, there has been a gradual movement away from         
    commodity money (typically gold) toward paper money (managed currency). The         
    problem with gold is its quantity is too constraining, which is also a merit if the         
    central bank is irresponsible. In the 21st century, maybe we will have         
    e-money which has completely new characteristics (and risks).


Historical overview
From the 19th century to present, the major international monetary systems         
have evolved as follows.

Gold standard, until 1914 (fixed rates under UK dominance): throughout most of         
    the 19th century and up to 1914 (outbreak of WW1), the world was on a gold         
    standard. Especially, the period of 1879-1913 was called the Classical Gold         
    Standard (or International Gold Standard) because all major countries participated in it.        
    Trade was liberalized and capital was mobile.Interwar period: after WW1, the world powers tried to return to the        
    gold standard at prewar parities (i.e., at the previous exchange rates), but the attempt to        
    restore gold convertibility did not succeed, except momentarily. The        
    1920s-30s were characterized by recessions, banking crises, the Great Depression 
  and the rise of fascism. Exchange rates were mostly floating and protectionism increased.        
    There was a hegemonic power shift from the UK to the US.
Bretton Woods system, 1950s-1971 (US-centered fixed rates): Under        
    the international dollar standard, the world economy experienced high        
    growth, price stability and movement toward freer trade. Unlike the gold        
    standard days, however, there were severe restrictions on private capital        
    mobility.General floating and attempts to reduce instabilities, 1973-: After        
    the transition period of 1971-73, the major currencies started to float.        
    Soon, it was discovered that currency sometimes fluctuated too much. Crises      
    and calm periods alternated. Overshooting, currency crises and massive capital flows became common. From        
    1985, major countries occasionally intervened jointly to correct currency        
    levels. At the same time, European countries strived to create a unified        
    currency in steps, which was achieved in 2002.

Since the late 19th century to present, broad developments in prices and long-term interest rates were as follows.
Inflation was most stable during the Bretton Woods period, with WPI inflation        
in major countries staying almost at zero for a few decades (particularly early 
1950s to mid 1960s). The 19th century gold standard        
also experienced relative price stability, although long- and medium-term price        
swings (which were synchronous across all countries) existed. In the 1970s, 
inflation accelerated with different rates of price increase across countries. But since the late        
1980s and up to present, high inflation subsided (except in a small number of        
developing and transition countries). The world faces a relative price        
stability again, even a deflationary trend in some countries including Japan.
Long-term interest rates  on government and corporate bonds were very stable        
during the gold standard period. But they became unstable and internationally        
divergent after the 1960s, especially the inflationary period of the 1970s-80s. 
At present, interest rates remain different across countries even though the 
world is financially integrated.
The Classical Gold Standard, 1879-1914       
The 19th century was the century of British economic and military dominance. The        
UK adopted the gold standard in 1821, after the inflation associated with        
the Napoleonic Wars stabilized. But the other countries remained on  bimetallism (both gold        
and silver were used, with a fluctuating conversion ratio between them). During the 1870s, most European countries joined the gold standard. In 1879, the        
US returned to the gold standard when price stability was restored after the Civil        
War. In this way, from 1879 until the sudden outbreak of WW1 in July 1914, all        
major countries in Europe and North America were on the gold standard. This        
meant that their economies were closely linked and operating under the same financial mechanism        
orchestrated by the City (London financial market). The Classical Gold Standard        
was truly international.This was also a period of imperialism and colonialism by the Western powers.        
At the same time, the latecomers (US, Germany and Japan) were rapidly catching        
up with the UK.
As a developing country, Japan joined the gold standard somewhat later, in        
1897. For details, see lecture 6 of        
Economic Development of Japan.
Salient features of the Classical Gold Standard were as follows.

  (1) Goods market integration under free trade: international price linkage was strong, and the world        
    experienced common price movements and business cycles.  The law of one price      
    (the same products bear the same price in different locations) held in many commodities, and this      
    fact can also be confirmed by econometric        
    studies. However, one problem was the absence of the nominal anchor (see    
    below).        
    This means that no country, organization or mechanism played the role of stabilizing        
    the global price level. As a result, there was globally common price fluctuations in        
    the medium and long run.(2) Financial integration under free capital mobility: the private sector could issue, sell or buy        
    foreign stocks and bonds freely. US railroad bonds were particularly popular        
    as a means to convert British saving into American investment. Free capital movement 
  resulted in strong interest rate linkage.        
    Short-term interest rates were volatile while long-term interest rates were extremely stable,        
    and these interest movements were internationally synchronized. British interest rates always        
    provided the floor (i.e., they were lowest) for the rates of other countries, because      
    British securities        
    had highest liquidity and lowest risk premium, and because London was the financial center        
    of the world. Another interesting point was that current account        
    "imbalances" were huge relative to (estimated) GDP. This means        
    that some countries lent while others borrowed according to their        
    saving-investment balances. And this was not a disequilibrium. Furthermore,        
    banking crises tended to occur simultaneously across countries.
  (3) Fixed exchange rates: for 35 years, there was no realignment of major exchange rates. In those days, the exchange rate was called the        
    "gold parity" which was the conversion ratio between the home        
    currency and an ounce (31.10 grams) of gold. The cross rates between two currencies could        
    be calculated as the ratio of two gold parities.(4) Macroeconomic fundamentals were not stable: although integrated in trade and        
    finance, the world economy was far from stable, from the viewpoint of        
    macroeconomy. There were booms and busts, and severe recessions were        
    experienced. Financial crises and bank runs were common.

The nominal anchor
A nominal anchor is a mechanism to stabilize nominal variables, especially        
the general price level. More plainly, it is a mechanism to prevent inflation or deflation.        
This can be an informal policy rule adopted by the central bank, such as the        
Taylor's rule (US short-term interest rate policy responds to domestic inflation        
and unemployment). It can be a legally binding commitment such as        
inflation targeting. It may depend on the wisdom of the central banker, for 
example, like Mr. Alan Greenspan. Alternatively, it can be an automatic mechanism. The nominal        
anchor can be domestic or global. Here, we are discussing the nominal        
anchor for the entire world. The point is that no one ensured the price stability of        
the gold standard world--neither the UK government, the Bank of England, the        
City, nor the supply and demand of gold.
Sherlock Holmes, Dr. Watson, and capital mobility
Sherlock Holmes was a famous London detective in the novels written by Sir        
Arthur Conan Doyle (1859-1930). Dr. John Watson was his friend and assistant. In 
the adventure stories of Sherlock Holmes, we can find many references to foreign securities and        
investment. For example, the adventure entitled "The Dancing Men" (1903)        
begins as follows.






Holmes had been seated for some hours in silence with        
  his long, thin back curved over a chemical vessel in which he was brewing a        
  particularly malodorous product. His head was sunk upon his breast, and he        
  looked from my point of view like a strange, lank bird, with dull gray plumage        
  and a black top-knot.
"So, Watson," said he, suddenly, "you        
  do not propose to invest in South African securities?"
I gave a start of astonishment. Accustomed as I was        
  to Holmes's curious faculties, this sudden intrusion into my most intimate        
  thoughts was utterly inexplicable.    
  "How on earth do you know that?" I asked.





Apart from econometric studies, I think this can be presented as a strong        
evidence that Dr. Watson (and other ordinary citizens) often invested in foreign        
securities.
Although there was no internet in the late 19th century, the trans-Atlantic      
cable guaranteed that the financial markets in London and New        
York were integrated on a real-time basis.
The rules of the game
There are two important terms associated with the gold standard. The first is        
the "rules of the game," and the second is the "price-species flow        
mechanism."
The rules of the game means a set of rules of conduct, often implicit but        
nonetheless binding, that are expected of the participating members of a certain        
system. In the case of the Classical Gold Standard, the participating countries        
were required to observe the following rules:

Gold parity. Each country must declare a fixed value ratio between        
    gold and domestic currency. For example, 1 ounce of gold  = 20.69 US        
    dollars, 1 ounce of gold = 4.24 British pounds, and so on. This establishes 
  the cross ratio of 1 British        
    pound = 4.87 US dollars.Convertibility to gold (domestic convertibility). 
  All paper money        
            
    must be exchanged freely to gold at the declared gold parity, if the        
    bearer brings it to the central bank. Usually this promise was clearly printed on        
    bank notes. In those days, convertibility meant convertibility to        
    gold (today, it means convertibility to international currencies such as        
    dollar, euro and yen).
Free international gold movement (international convertibility):        
    there should be no restriction on the exportation or importation of gold as        
    a commodity as well as a payment method. This guaranteed free monetary mobility        
    based on demand and supply conditions. The requirement that the government should not        
    prevent the loss (exportation) of gold was particularly important.Interest rate policy: if a country began to lose gold 
  through a balance-of-payments deficit, it was        
    expected to raise short-term interest rates to attract back the monetary 
  metal. Conversely, if it is gaining gold, short-term interest rates must        
    be lowered to repel the gold inflow. By this symmetrical operation, it was thought that the        
    monetary authority could assist international adjustment. (But whether that        
    really worked is an open question, as discussed below.)

Prof. Ronald McKinnon (Stanford University) spelled out the rules of the        
game for other international monetary systems, including the Bretton Woods        
system, general floating until 1985, general floating after 1985, EMS, etc. If        
interested, see the book in the reference section.
The price-species flow mechanism
Here, price means inflation or deflation.  Species (true money) means gold. So this        
funny term really means a "mechanism linking inflation/deflation with gold        
flows."
Through this mechanism, it was thought        
that the gold standard had a wonderful built-in adjustment mechanism. Even        
if governments did nothing, international macroeconomic adjustment would occur        
automatically, or so it was argued. It works like this:

  If a country has a current account deficit for any reason, there will be        
    an outflow of gold. The loss of gold means less money supply, so this        
    country will have a price deflation. After some time, its products become        
    cheaper in the global market, so exports will rise and imports will fall. 
  This improves the current account.It works just the opposite for a country with an initial current account        
    surplus. It will accumulate gold, which increases money supply and raises the        
    price level. The country loses price competitiveness, so the trade balance        
    worsens.


In either case, there is a change in the price level that automatically        
offsets the initial current account imbalance. There is no need for central bank        
action or international policy coordination. In fact, the US did not even have a        
central bank until 1913!
Although this mechanism is still taught today as a key feature of the gold        
standard, whether it really functioned like this is highly questionable.        
Evidence strongly suggests otherwise.
The biggest problem with this explanation is its total neglect of capital        
mobility; it is focused on the current account and price competitiveness only.        
But in a financially integrated world with firmly fixed exchange rates, a tiny        
difference in interest rates will prompt a huge and immediate private capital        
flow. Moreover, the current account is just a mirror image of the        
capital account (with the opposite sign). Therefore, as long as the country continues to lend or borrow, there is        
no need for the current account to "balance."
In fact, throughout the 19th century, the UK always had a current account        
surplus (except for a few years), which rose to as high as 8% of GNP just before        
WW1. The US, a young developing country with vast investment opportunities,        
continuously had a current-account deficit and a strong capital inflow until around        
1895. Germany was constantly in surplus while Sweden was constantly in deficit,        
except for a few years. All this reflected each country's long-term saving-investment balance.
Moreover, since private capital moved swiftly to offset any balance of      
payments shocks, there was no need to        
ship gold across the Atlantic Ocean (though some gold shipment actually      
occurred). The overall balance of payments (=current account + capital account)      
could be kept near zero instantaneously as long as capital was mobile.
The interwar period, the 1920s-30s
The Classical Gold Standard was shattered by the outbreak of WW1. The system        
collapsed not because of an internal dilemma but because of an external violence.        
As soon as the fighting began in Europe, private trade and financial transactions were        
suspended. Gold exports were banned. As international linkage disappeared, each        
country started to issue bonds and print money to finance the war effort. They began to        
have different inflation rates.
When WW1 ended, the major countries wished to restore the prewar gold        
standard, which seemed to offer prosperity and stability.        
"Return to gold" became the national and even global slogan, and it was 
believed that returning        
to gold at the prewar parities (i.e., at the previous exchange rates) was the right      
thing to do. A report was published, and a few important international conferences        
were held for this purpose (UK's Cunliffe Report, 1919; conferences in Brussels 1920, in Genoa        
1922).
The US returned to gold early, in 1919. The UK returned in 1925. Most other        
European states also returned by 1928, so it looked like the gold standard was        
resurrected. But this system lacked leadership and coordination, and turned out        
to be fragile and short-lived. As France demanded only gold for international 
settlements, a        
speculative downward pressure on the UK pound emerged. In 1931, the UK abandoned the gold        
standard again, and the other countries followed. In the midst of the Great        
Depression (1929-), countries began to form trade blocs and protected their 
internal markets.        
Global trade continued to shrink. Militarism and fascism rose.
Japan returned to the gold standard in January 1930 and abandoned it in        
December 1931. For more details, see lecture 7        
of Economic Development of Japan.
Why did the attempt to restore the gold standard in the interwar period fail?

  First, the 1920s and 30s saw frequent recessions and banking crises      
    (exception: the US economy was booming until 1929). It was thought that        
    governments had first and foremost the responsibility to solve the domestic problems of        
    bankruptcy and unemployment, rather than keeping international commitments.        
    Inward-looking attitude became dominant.Second, there was a leadership vacuum in the 
  international regime. The UK, the old        
    leader, was losing power and incapable of handling the situation. The US,        
    the new leader, would not assume the responsibility yet. During the        
    transition period, no one watches over big issues.
  Third, as a result of this and in the absence of policy cooperation, each country        
    became selfish. Protectionism and competitive devaluation escalated. Under such        
    circumstances, the restoration of the prewar international monetary system was        
    impossible.

During this period, the famous British economist John Maynard Keynes argued      
against returning to gold (this was in 1925, before he wrote the famous General Theory in 
1936). His argument was roughly as follows:

    At the prewar parity, the pound would 
be 10% overvalued against the      
    dollar because of the inflation gap between the UK and the US since 1914. If        
    the UK returned to gold at the old exchange rate, the tradable sector (especially the        
    coal industry) would have to suffer severely.Moreover, from a historical 
    perspective, the gold standard was a "barbaric relic" (i.e., crude 
    and outdated system) and should be        
    abandoned. The value of money should not be subjected to the demand and        
    supply of gold which was uncontrollable. The world should move to paper        
    currency managed scientifically and responsibly by central banks.

<References>
Bordo, Michael D., and Anna J. Schwartz, eds, A Retrospective on the    
Classical Gold Standard, 1821-1831, The University of Chicago Press, 1984.Eichengreen, Barry, ed, The Gold Standard in Theory and History,    
Methuen & Co. Ltd, 1985.
Keynes, John Maynard, "The Economic Consequences of Mr. Churchill,"    
1925 (reprinted in his Essays in Persuasion).
 McKinnon, Ronald I., The Rules of the Game: International Money        
and Exchange Rates, MIT Press, 1996.




Gross domestic product - Wikipedia






















 






Gross domestic product

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

"GDP" redirects here. For other uses, see GDP (disambiguation).




A map of world economies by size of GDP (nominal) in USD, World Bank, 2014[1]






Selection of GDP PPP data (top 10 countries and blocks, 2016) in no particular order


Gross domestic product (GDP) is a monetary measure of the market value of all final goods and services produced in a period (quarterly or yearly). Nominal GDP estimates are commonly used to determine the economic performance of a whole country or region, and to make international comparisons. Nominal GDP per capita does not, however, reflect differences in the cost of living and the inflation rates of the countries; therefore using a basis of GDP per capita at purchasing power parity (PPP) is arguably more useful when comparing differences in living standards between nations.



Contents


1 Definition
2 History
3 Determining gross domestic product (GDP)

3.1 Production approach
3.2 Income approach
3.3 Expenditure approach

3.3.1 Components of GDP by expenditure




4 GDP vs GNI

4.1 International standards
4.2 National measurement


5 Nominal GDP and adjustments to GDP
6 Cross-border comparison and purchasing power parity
7 Standard of living and GDP: Wealth distribution and externalities
8 Limitations and criticisms

8.1 Limitations at introduction
8.2 Further criticisms
8.3 Proposals to overcome GDP limitations


9 Lists of countries by their GDP
10 See also
11 Notes and references
12 Further reading
13 External links

13.1 Global
13.2 Data
13.3 Articles and books





Definition[edit]
The OECD defines GDP as "an aggregate measure of production equal to the sum of the gross values added of all resident and institutional units engaged in production (plus any taxes, and minus any subsidies, on products not included in the value of their outputs).”[2] An IMF publication states that "GDP measures the monetary value of final goods and services - that is, those that are bought by the final user - produced in a country in a given period of time (say a quarter or a year)."[3]
Total GDP can also be broken down into the contribution of each industry or sector of the economy.[4] The ratio of GDP to the total population of the region is the per capita GDP and the same is called Mean Standard of Living.
History[edit]
William Petty came up with a basic concept of GDP to defend landlords against unfair taxation during warfare between the Dutch and the English between 1652 and 1674.[5] Charles Davenant developed the method further in 1695.[6] The modern concept of GDP was first developed by Simon Kuznets for a US Congress report in 1934.[7] In this report, Kuznets warned against its use as a measure of welfare (see below under limitations and criticisms). After the Bretton Woods conference in 1944, GDP became the main tool for measuring a country's economy.[8] At that time gross national product (GNP) was the preferred estimate, which differed from GDP in that it measured production by a country's citizens at home and abroad rather than its 'resident institutional units' (see OECD definition above). The switch from "GNP" to "GDP" in the US was in 1991, trailing behind most other nations.
The history of the concept of GDP should be distinguished from the history of changes in ways of estimating it. The value added by firms is relatively easy to calculate from their accounts, but the value added by the public sector, by financial industries, and by intangible asset creation is more complex. These activities are increasingly important in developed economies, and the international conventions governing their estimation and their inclusion or exclusion in GDP regularly change in an attempt to keep up with industrial advances. In the words of one academic economist "The actual number for GDP is therefore the product of a vast patchwork of statistics and a complicated set of processes carried out on the raw data to fit them to the conceptual framework."[9]
Determining gross domestic product (GDP)[edit]


Economics



A supply and demand diagram, illustrating
the effects of an increase in demand.






Index
Outline
Category








History
Types
Classification







History of economics
Economic history (academic study)
Schools of economics



Microeconomics
Macroeconomics
Methodology
Heterodox economics
JEL classification codes








Concepts
Theory
Techniques








Econometrics
Economic growth
Economic system
Experimental economics
Mathematical economics
Game theory
Post-scarcity
Market
National accounting





By application





Agricultural
Behavioral
Business
Computational
Cultural
Demographic
Development
Digitization
Ecological
Education
Environmental
Evolutionary
Expeditionary
Geography
Health
Industrial organization
Information
International
Knowledge
Labour
Law
Managerial
Monetary / Financial
Natural resource
Organizational
Personnel
Public / Welfare economics
Regional
Rural
Service
Urban
Welfare





Lists




Economists
Publications (journals)






 Business and economics portal







v
t
e





GDP can be determined in three ways, all of which should, in principle, give the same result. They are the production (or output or value added) approach, the income approach, or the expenditure approach.
The most direct of the three is the production approach, which sums the outputs of every class of enterprise to arrive at the total. The expenditure approach works on the principle that all of the product must be bought by somebody, therefore the value of the total product must be equal to people's total expenditures in buying things. The income approach works on the principle that the incomes of the productive factors ("producers," colloquially) must be equal to the value of their product, and determines GDP by finding the sum of all producers' incomes.[10]
Production approach[edit]
This approach mirrors the OECD definition given above.

Estimate the gross value of domestic output out of the many various economic activities;
Determine the intermediate consumption, i.e., the cost of material, supplies and services used to produce final goods or services.
Deduct intermediate consumption from gross value to obtain the gross value added.

Gross value added = gross value of output – value of intermediate consumption.
Value of output = value of the total sales of goods and services plus value of changes in the inventory.
The sum of the gross value added in the various economic activities is known as "GDP at factor cost".
GDP at factor cost plus indirect taxes less subsidies on products = "GDP at producer price".
For measuring output of domestic product, economic activities (i.e. industries) are classified into various sectors. After classifying economic activities, the output of each sector is calculated by any of the following two methods:

By multiplying the output of each sector by their respective market price and adding them together
By collecting data on gross sales and inventories from the records of companies and adding them together

The gross value of all sectors is then added to get the gross value added (GVA) at factor cost. Subtracting each sector's intermediate consumption from gross output gives the GVA at factor cost. Adding indirect tax minus subsidies in GVA at factor cost gives the "GVA at producer prices".
Income approach[edit]




List of countries by GDP (PPP) per capita by 2014 International Monetary Fund.






Countries by 2015 GDP (nominal) per capita.[11]



  > $64,000
  $32,000 – 64,000
  $16,000 – 32,000
  $8,000 – 16,000
  $4,000 – 8,000


  $2,000 – 4,000
  $1,000 – 2,000
  $500 – 1,000
  < $500
  unavailable










U.S GDP computed on the income basis


The second way of estimating GDP is to use "the sum of primary incomes distributed by resident producer units".[2]
If GDP is calculated this way it is sometimes called gross domestic income (GDI), or GDP (I). GDI should provide the same amount as the expenditure method described later. (By definition, GDI = GDP. In practice, however, measurement errors will make the two figures slightly off when reported by national statistical agencies.)
This method measures GDP by adding incomes that firms pay households for factors of production they hire - wages for labour, interest for capital, rent for land and profits for entrepreneurship.
The US "National Income and Expenditure Accounts" divide incomes into five categories:

Wages, salaries, and supplementary labour income
Corporate profits
Interest and miscellaneous investment income
Farmers' incomes
Income from non-farm unincorporated businesses

These five income components sum to net domestic income at factor cost.
Two adjustments must be made to get GDP:

Indirect taxes minus subsidies are added to get from factor cost to market prices.
Depreciation (or capital consumption allowance) is added to get from net domestic product to gross domestic product.

Total income can be subdivided according to various schemes, leading to various formulae for GDP measured by the income approach. A common one is:

GDP = compensation of employees + gross operating surplus + gross mixed income + taxes less subsidies on production and imports
GDP = COE + GOS + GMI + TP & M – SP & M


Compensation of employees (COE) measures the total remuneration to employees for work done. It includes wages and salaries, as well as employer contributions to social security and other such programs.
Gross operating surplus (GOS) is the surplus due to owners of incorporated businesses. Often called profits, although only a subset of total costs are subtracted from gross output to calculate GOS.
Gross mixed income (GMI) is the same measure as GOS, but for unincorporated businesses. This often includes most small businesses.

The sum of COE, GOS and GMI is called total factor income; it is the income of all of the factors of production in society. It measures the value of GDP at factor (basic) prices. The difference between basic prices and final prices (those used in the expenditure calculation) is the total taxes and subsidies that the government has levied or paid on that production. So adding taxes less subsidies on production and imports converts GDP at factor cost to GDP(I).
Total factor income is also sometimes expressed as:

Total factor income = employee compensation + corporate profits + proprietor's income + rental income + net interest[12]

Expenditure approach[edit]
The third way to estimate GDP is to calculate the sum of the final uses of goods and services (all uses except intermediate consumption) measured in purchasers' prices.[2]
Market goods which are produced are purchased by someone. In the case where a good is produced and unsold, the standard accounting convention is that the producer has bought the good from themselves. Therefore, measuring the total expenditure used to buy things is a way of measuring production. This is known as the expenditure method of calculating GDP.
Components of GDP by expenditure[edit]




U.S. GDP computed on the expenditure basis.


GDP (Y) is the sum of consumption (C), investment (I), government spending (G) and net exports (X – M).

Y = C + I + G + (X − M)

Here is a description of each GDP component:

C (consumption) is normally the largest GDP component in the economy, consisting of private expenditures in the economy (household final consumption expenditure). These personal expenditures fall under one of the following categories: durable goods, nondurable goods, and services. Examples include food, rent, jewelry, gasoline, and medical expenses, but not the purchase of new housing.
I (investment) includes, for instance, business investment in equipment, but does not include exchanges of existing assets. Examples include construction of a new mine, purchase of software, or purchase of machinery and equipment for a factory. Spending by households (not government) on new houses is also included in investment. In contrast to its colloquial meaning, "investment" in GDP does not mean purchases of financial products. Buying financial products is classed as 'saving', as opposed to investment. This avoids double-counting: if one buys shares in a company, and the company uses the money received to buy plant, equipment, etc., the amount will be counted toward GDP when the company spends the money on those things; to also count it when one gives it to the company would be to count two times an amount that only corresponds to one group of products. Buying bonds or stocks is a swapping of deeds, a transfer of claims on future production, not directly an expenditure on products.
G (government spending) is the sum of government expenditures on final goods and services. It includes salaries of public servants, purchases of weapons for the military and any investment expenditure by a government. It does not include any transfer payments, such as social security or unemployment benefits.
X (exports) represents gross exports. GDP captures the amount a country produces, including goods and services produced for other nations' consumption, therefore exports are added.
M (imports) represents gross imports. Imports are subtracted since imported goods will be included in the terms G, I, or C, and must be deducted to avoid counting foreign supply as domestic.

Note that C, G, and I are expenditures on final goods and services; expenditures on intermediate goods and services do not count. (Intermediate goods and services are those used by businesses to produce other goods and services within the accounting year.[13])
According to the U.S. Bureau of Economic Analysis, which is responsible for calculating the national accounts in the United States, "In general, the source data for the expenditures components are considered more reliable than those for the income components [see income method, below]."[14]
GDP vs GNI[edit]
GDP can be contrasted with gross national product (GNP) or, as it is now known, gross national income (GNI). The difference is that GDP defines its scope according to location, while GNI defines its scope according to ownership. In a global context, world GDP and world GNI are, therefore, equivalent terms.
GDP is product produced within a country's borders; GNI is product produced by enterprises owned by a country's citizens. The two would be the same if all of the productive enterprises in a country were owned by its own citizens, and those citizens did not own productive enterprises in any other countries. In practice, however, foreign ownership makes GDP and GNI non-identical. Production within a country's borders, but by an enterprise owned by somebody outside the country, counts as part of its GDP but not its GNI; on the other hand, production by an enterprise located outside the country, but owned by one of its citizens, counts as part of its GNI but not its GDP.
For example, the GNI of the USA is the value of output produced by American-owned firms, regardless of where the firms are located. Similarly, if a country becomes increasingly in debt, and spends large amounts of income servicing this debt this will be reflected in a decreased GNI but not a decreased GDP. Similarly, if a country sells off its resources to entities outside their country this will also be reflected over time in decreased GNI, but not decreased GDP. This would make the use of GDP more attractive for politicians in countries with increasing national debt and decreasing assets.
Gross national income (GNI) equals GDP plus income receipts from the rest of the world minus income payments to the rest of the world.[15]
In 1991, the United States switched from using GNP to using GDP as its primary measure of production.[16] The relationship between United States GDP and GNP is shown in table 1.7.5 of the National Income and Product Accounts.[17]
International standards[edit]
The international standard for measuring GDP is contained in the book System of National Accounts (1993), which was prepared by representatives of the International Monetary Fund, European Union, Organization for Economic Co-operation and Development, United Nations and World Bank. The publication is normally referred to as SNA93 to distinguish it from the previous edition published in 1968 (called SNA68) [18]
SNA93 provides a set of rules and procedures for the measurement of national accounts. The standards are designed to be flexible, to allow for differences in local statistical needs and conditions.



This section needs expansion. You can help by adding to it. (August 2009)


National measurement[edit]
Within each country GDP is normally measured by a national government statistical agency, as private sector organizations normally do not have access to the information required (especially information on expenditure and production by governments).
Main article: National agencies responsible for GDP measurement
Nominal GDP and adjustments to GDP[edit]
The raw GDP figure as given by the equations above is called the nominal, historical, or current, GDP. When one compares GDP figures from one year to another, it is desirable to compensate for changes in the value of money – i.e., for the effects of inflation or deflation. To make it more meaningful for year-to-year comparisons, it may be multiplied by the ratio between the value of money in the year the GDP was measured and the value of money in a base year.
For example, suppose a country's GDP in 1990 was $100 million and its GDP in 2000 was $300 million. Suppose also that inflation had halved the value of its currency over that period. To meaningfully compare its GDP in 2000 to its GDP in 1990, we could multiply the GDP in 2000 by one-half, to make it relative to 1990 as a base year. The result would be that the GDP in 2000 equals $300 million × one-half = $150 million, in 1990 monetary terms. We would see that the country's GDP had realistically increased 50 percent over that period, not 200 percent, as it might appear from the raw GDP data. The GDP adjusted for changes in money value in this way is called the real, or constant, GDP.
The factor used to convert GDP from current to constant values in this way is called the GDP deflator. Unlike consumer price index, which measures inflation or deflation in the price of household consumer goods, the GDP deflator measures changes in the prices of all domestically produced goods and services in an economy including investment goods and government services, as well as household consumption goods.[19]
Constant-GDP figures allow us to calculate a GDP growth rate, which indicates how much a country's production has increased (or decreased, if the growth rate is negative) compared to the previous year.

Real GDP growth rate for year n = [(Real GDP in year n) − (Real GDP in year n − 1)] / (Real GDP in year n − 1)

Another thing that it may be desirable to account for is population growth. If a country's GDP doubled over a certain period, but its population tripled, the increase in GDP may not mean that the standard of living increased for the country's residents; the average person in the country is producing less than they were before. Per-capita GDP is a measure to account for population growth.
Cross-border comparison and purchasing power parity[edit]
The level of GDP in different countries may be compared by converting their value in national currency according to either the current currency exchange rate, or the purchasing power parity exchange rate.

Current currency exchange rate is the exchange rate in the international foreign exchange market.
Purchasing power parity exchange rate is the exchange rate based on the purchasing power parity (PPP) of a currency relative to a selected standard (usually the United States dollar). This is a comparative (and theoretical) exchange rate, the only way to directly realize this rate is to sell an entire CPI basket in one country, convert the cash at the currency market rate & then rebuy that same basket of goods in the other country (with the converted cash). Going from country to country, the distribution of prices within the basket will vary; typically, non-tradable purchases will consume a greater proportion of the basket's total cost in the higher GDP country, per the Balassa-Samuelson effect.

The ranking of countries may differ significantly based on which method is used.

The current exchange rate method converts the value of goods and services using global currency exchange rates. The method can offer better indications of a country's international purchasing power. For instance, if 10% of GDP is being spent on buying hi-tech foreign arms, the number of weapons purchased is entirely governed by current exchange rates, since arms are a traded product bought on the international market. There is no meaningful 'local' price distinct from the international price for high technology goods. The PPP method of GDP conversion is more relevant to non-traded goods and services. In the above example if hi-tech weapons are to be produced internally their amount will be governed by GDP(PPP) rather than nominal GDP.

There is a clear pattern of the purchasing power parity method decreasing the disparity in GDP between high and low income (GDP) countries, as compared to the current exchange rate method. This finding is called the Penn effect.
For more information, see Measures of national income and output.
Standard of living and GDP: Wealth distribution and externalities[edit]
GDP per capita is often used as an indicator of living standards.[20]
The major advantage of GDP per capita as an indicator of standard of living is that it is measured frequently, widely, and consistently. It is measured frequently in that most countries provide information on GDP on a quarterly basis, allowing trends to be seen quickly. It is measured widely in that some measure of GDP is available for almost every country in the world, allowing inter-country comparisons. It is measured consistently in that the technical definition of GDP is relatively consistent among countries.
GDP does not include several factors that influence the standard of living. In particular, it fails to account for:

Externalities – Economic growth may entail an increase in negative externalities that are not directly measured in GDP.[21][22] Increased industrial output might grow GDP, but any pollution is not counted.[23]
Non-market transactions– GDP excludes activities that are not provided through the market, such as household production, bartering of goods and services, and volunteer or unpaid services.
Non-monetary economy– GDP omits economies where no money comes into play at all, resulting in inaccurate or abnormally low GDP figures. For example, in countries with major business transactions occurring informally, portions of local economy are not easily registered. Bartering may be more prominent than the use of money, even extending to services.[22]
Quality improvements and inclusion of new products– by not fully adjusting for quality improvements and new products, GDP understates true economic growth. For instance, although computers today are less expensive and more powerful than computers from the past, GDP treats them as the same products by only accounting for the monetary value. The introduction of new products is also difficult to measure accurately and is not reflected in GDP despite the fact that it may increase the standard of living. For example, even the richest person in 1900 could not purchase standard products, such as antibiotics and cell phones, that an average consumer can buy today, since such modern conveniences did not exist then.
Sustainability of growth– GDP is a measurement of economic historic activity and is not necessarily a projection.
Wealth distribution – GDP does not account for variances in incomes of various demographic groups. See income inequality metrics for discussion of a variety of inequality-based economic measures.[22]

It can be argued that GDP per capita as an indicator standard of living is correlated with these factors, capturing them indirectly.[20][24] As a result, GDP per capita as a standard of living is a continued usage because most people have a fairly accurate idea of what it is and know it is tough to come up with quantitative measures for such constructs as happiness, quality of life, and well-being.[20]
Limitations and criticisms[edit]



This section needs expansion. You can help by adding to it. (February 2012)


Limitations at introduction[edit]
Simon Kuznets, the economist who developed the first comprehensive set of measures of national income, stated in his first report to the US Congress in 1934, in a section titled "Uses and Abuses of National Income Measurements":[7]

The valuable capacity of the human mind to simplify a complex situation in a compact characterization becomes dangerous when not controlled in terms of definitely stated criteria. With quantitative measurements especially, the definiteness of the result suggests, often misleadingly, a precision and simplicity in the outlines of the object measured. Measurements of national income are subject to this type of illusion and resulting abuse, especially since they deal with matters that are the center of conflict of opposing social groups where the effectiveness of an argument is often contingent upon oversimplification. [...]


All these qualifications upon estimates of national income as an index of productivity are just as important when income measurements are interpreted from the point of view of economic welfare. But in the latter case additional difficulties will be suggested to anyone who wants to penetrate below the surface of total figures and market values. Economic welfare cannot be adequately measured unless the personal distribution of income is known. And no income measurement undertakes to estimate the reverse side of income, that is, the intensity and unpleasantness of effort going into the earning of income. The welfare of a nation can, therefore, scarcely be inferred from a measurement of national income as defined above.

In 1962, Kuznets stated:[25]

Distinctions must be kept in mind between quantity and quality of growth, between costs and returns, and between the short and long run. Goals for more growth should specify more growth of what and for what.

Further criticisms[edit]
Ever since the development of GDP, multiple observers have pointed out limitations of using GDP as the overarching measure of economic and social progress.
Many environmentalists argue that GDP is a poor measure of social progress because it does not take into account harm to the environment.[26][27]
Although a high or rising level of GDP is often associated with increased economic and social progress within a country, a number of scholars have pointed out that this does not necessarily play out in many instances. For example, Jean Drèze and Amartya Sen have pointed out that an increase in GDP or in GDP growth does not necessarily lead to a higher standard of living, particularly in areas such as healthcare and education.[28] Another important area that does not necessarily improve along with GDP is political liberty, which is most notable in China, where GDP growth is strong yet political liberties are heavily restricted.[29]
GDP does not account for the distribution of income among the residents of a country, because GDP is merely an aggregate measure. An economy may be highly developed or growing rapidly, but also contain a wide gap between the rich and the poor in a society. These inequalities often occur on the lines of race, ethnicity, gender, religion, or other minority status within countries. This can lead to misleading characterizations of economic well-being if the income distribution is heavily skewed toward the high end, as the poorer residents will not directly benefit from the overall level of wealth and income generated in their country. Even GDP per capita measures may have the same downside if inequality is high. For example, South Africa during apartheid ranked high in terms of GDP per capita, but the benefits of this immense wealth and income were not shared equally among the country.[citation needed]
GDP does not take into account the value of household and other unpaid work. Some, including Martha Nussbaum, argue that this value should be included in measuring GDP, as household labor is largely a substitute for goods and services that would otherwise be purchased for value.[30] Even under conservative estimates, the value of unpaid labor in Australia has been calculated to be over 50% of the country's GDP.[31] A later study analyzed this value in other countries, with results ranging from a low of about 15% in Canada (using conservative estimates) to high of nearly 70% in the United Kingdom (using more liberal estimates). For the United States, the value was estimated to be between about 20% on the low end to nearly 50% on the high end, depending on the methodology being used.[32] Because many public policies are shaped by GDP calculations and by the related field of national accounts,[33] the non-inclusion of unpaid work in calculating GDP can create distortions in public policy, and some economists have advocated for changes in the way public policies are formed and implemented.[34]
The UK's Natural Capital Committee highlighted the shortcomings of GDP in its advice to the UK Government in 2013, pointing out that GDP "focuses on flows, not stocks. As a result, an economy can run down its assets yet, at the same time, record high levels of GDP growth, until a point is reached where the depleted assets act as a check on future growth". They then went on to say that "it is apparent that the recorded GDP growth rate overstates the sustainable growth rate. Broader measures of wellbeing and wealth are needed for this and there is a danger that short-term decisions based solely on what is currently measured by national accounts may prove to be costly in the long-term".
Proposals to overcome GDP limitations[edit]
In response to these and other limitations of using GDP, alternative approaches have emerged.

In the 1980s, Amartya Sen and Martha Nussbaum developed the capability approach, which focuses on the functional capabilities enjoyed by people within a country, rather than the aggregate wealth held within a country. These capabilities consist of the functions that a person is able to achieve.[35]
In 1990 Mahbub ul Haq, a Pakistani Economist at the United Nations, introduced the Human Development Index (HDI). The HDI is a composite index of life expectancy at birth, adult literacy rate and standard of living measured as a logarithmic function of GDP, adjusted to purchasing power parity.
In 1989, John B. Cobb and Herman Daly introduced Index of Sustainable Economic Welfare (ISEW) by taking into account various other factors such as consumption of nonrenewable resources and degradation of the environment. The new formula deducted from GDP (personal consumption + public non-defensive expenditures - private defensive expenditures + capital formation + services from domestic labour - costs of environmental degradation - depreciation of natural capital)
In 2005, Med Jones, an American Economist, at the International Institute of Management, introduced the first secular Gross National Happiness Index a.k.a Gross National Well-being framework and Index to complement GDP economics with additional seven dimensions, including environment, education, and government, work, social and health (mental and physical) indicators. The proposal was inspired by the King of Bhutan's GNH philosophy.[36][37][38]
In 2009 the European Union released a communication titled GDP and beyond: Measuring progress in a changing world[39] that identified five actions to improve the indicators of progress in ways that make it more responsive to the concerns of its citizens: Introduced a proposal to complementing GDP with environmental and social indicators
In 2009 Professors Joseph Stiglitz, Amartya Sen, and Jean-Paul Fitoussi at the Commission on the Measurement of Economic Performance and Social Progress (CMEPSP), formed by French President, Nicolas Sarkozy published a proposal to overcome the limitation of GDP economics to expand the focus to well-being economics with wellbeing framework consisting of health, environment, work, physical safety, economic safety, political freedom.
In 2012, the Karma Ura of the Center for Bhutan Studies published Bhutan Local GNH Index contributors to happiness—physical, mental and spiritual health; time-balance; social and community vitality; cultural vitality; education; living standards; good governance; and ecological vitality. The Bhutan GNH Index.[40]
In 2013 OECD Better Life Index was published by the OECD. The dimensions of the index included health, economic, workplace, income, jobs, housing, civic engagement, life satisfaction
In 2013 professors John Helliwell, Richard Layard and Jeffrey Sachs published World Happiness Report and proposed to measure other wellbeing indicators in addition to GDP. the evaluation framework included GDP per capita, Gini (income inequality), life satisfaction, health, freedom of life choices, trust and absence of corruption.

Lists of countries by their GDP[edit]

Lists of countries by GDP
List of countries by GDP (nominal), (per capita)
List of continents by GDP (nominal)
List of countries by GDP (PPP), (per capita), (per hour)
List of countries by GDP (real) growth rate, (per capita)
List of countries by GDP sector composition
List of IMF ranked countries by past and projected GDP (PPP), (per capita), (nominal)

See also[edit]


Annual average GDP growth
Capability approach
Chained volume series
Circular flow of income
Economic growth
GDP density
Gross output
Gross regional domestic product
Gross state product
Gross value added
Gross world product
Intermediate consumption
Inventory investment
List of countries by average wage
List of countries by household income
List of countries by GDP (nominal)
List of countries by GDP (nominal) per capita
List of countries by GDP (PPP)
List of countries by GDP (PPP) per capita
List of economic reports by U.S. government agencies
Misery index (economics)
National average salary
Potential output
Production (economics)
Productivism
Real gross domestic product


Notes and references[edit]


^ "GDP (Official Exchange Rate)" (PDF). World Bank. Retrieved August 24, 2015. 
^ a b c "OECD". Retrieved 14 August 2014. 
^ Callen, Tim. "Gross Domestic Product: An Economy’s All". IMF. Retrieved 3 June 2016. 
^ Dawson, Graham (2006). Economics and Economic Chenge. FT / Prentice Hall. p. 205. ISBN 9780273693512. 
^ "Petty impressive". The Economist. Retrieved August 1, 2015. 
^ Coyle, Diane. "Warfare and the Invention of GDP". The Globalist. Retrieved August 1, 2015. 
^ a b Congress commissioned Kuznets to create a system that would measure the nation's productivity in order to better understand how to tackle the Great Depression.Simon Kuznets, 1934. "National Income, 1929–1932". 73rd US Congress, 2d session, Senate document no. 124, page 5-7 Simon Kuznets, 1934. "National Income, 1929–1932". 73rd US Congress, 2d session, Senate document no. 124, page 5-7 Simon Kuznets, 1934. "National Income, 1929–1932". 73rd US Congress, 2d session, Senate document no. 124, page 5-7. https://fraser.stlouisfed.org/scribd/?title_id=971&filepath=/docs/publications/natincome_1934/19340104_nationalinc.pdf
^ Dickinson, Elizabeth. "GDP: a brief history". ForeignPolicy.com. Retrieved 25 April 2012. 
^ Coyle, Diane (2014). GDP: A Brief but Affectionate History. Princeton University Press. p. 6. ISBN 9780691156798. 
^ World Bank, Statistical Manual >> National Accounts >> GDP–final output, retrieved October 2009.
"User's guide: Background information on GDP and GDP deflator". HM Treasury. 
"Measuring the Economy: A Primer on GDP and the National Income and Product Accounts" (PDF). Bureau of Economic Analysis. 
^ Based on the IMF data. If no data was available for a country from IMF, I used WorldBank data.
^ United States Bureau of Economic Analysis, "A guide to the National Income and Product Accounts of the United States" (PDF). , page 5; retrieved November 2009. Another term, "business current transfer payments", may be added. Also, the document indicates that the capital consumption adjustment (CCAdj) and the inventory valuation adjustment (IVA) are applied to the proprietor's income and corporate profits terms; and CCAdj is applied to rental income.
^ Thayer Watkins, San José State University Department of Economics, "Gross Domestic Product from the Transactions Table for an Economy", commentary to first table, " Transactions Table for an Economy". (Page retrieved November 2009.)
^ Concepts and Methods of the United States National Income and Product Accounts, chap. 2.
^ Lequiller, François; Derek Blades (2006). Understanding National Accounts. OECD. p. 18. ISBN 978-92-64-02566-0. To convert GDP into GNI, it is necessary to add the income received by resident units from abroad and deduct the income created by production in the country but transferred to units residing abroad. 
^ United States, Bureau of Economic Analysis, Glossary, "GDP". Retrieved November 2009.
^ "U.S. Department of Commerce. Bureau of Economic Analysis". Bea.gov. 2009-10-21. Retrieved 2010-07-31. 
^ "National Accounts". Central Bureau of Statistics. Retrieved 2011-06-29. 
^ HM Treasury, Background information on GDP and GDP deflator
Some of the complications involved in comparing national accounts from different years are explained in this World Bank document.
^ a b c "How Do We Measure Standard of Living?" (PDF). The Federal Reserve Bank of Boston. 
^ Mankiw, N.G.; Taylor, M.P. (2011). Economics (2nd ed., revised ed.). Andover: Cengage Learning. 
^ a b c "Macroeconomics - GDP and Welfare". Retrieved 2015-02-21. 
^ http://www2.econ.iastate.edu/classes/econ355/choi/gdp.htm
^ "How Real GDP per Capita Affects the Standard of Living". Study.com. 
^ Simon Kuznets. "How To Judge Quality". The New Republic, October 20, 1962
^ The Virtues of Ignoring GDP http://www.thebrokeronline.eu/Articles/The-virtues-of-ignoring-GDP
^ The Rise and Fall of G.D.P. http://www.nytimes.com/2010/05/16/magazine/16GDP-t.html?pagewanted=all
^ Drèze, Jean; Sen, Amartya (2013). An uncertain glory India and its contradictions. Princeton: Princeton University Press. ISBN 9781400848775. 
^ "China Country Report Freedom in the World 2012". freedomhouse.org. 
^ Nussbaum, Martha C. (2013). Creating capabilities : the human development approach. Cambridge, Mass.: Belknap Press of Harvard University Press. ISBN 0674072359. 
^ Blades, François Lequiller, Derek (2006). Understanding national accounts (Reprint. ed.). Paris: OECD. p. 112. ISBN 978-92-64-02566-0. 
^ "Incorporating Estimates of Household Production of Non-Market Services into International Comparisons of Material Well-Being". 
^ "National Income Accounting and Public Policy" (PDF). 
^ "National Accounts: A Practical Introduction" (PDF). 
^ Shahani, Severine Deneulin ; Lila (2009). An Introduction to the Human Development and Capability : Approach (1. ed.). London: Earthscan Ltd. ISBN 9781844078066. 
^ "Gross National Happiness (GNH) - A New Socioeconomic Development Policy Framework - A Policy White Paper - The American Pursuit of Unhappiness - Med Jones, IIM". Iim-edu.org. 10 January 2005. 
^ Happiness Ministry in Dubai http://www.thenational.ae/opinion/comment/the-happiness-portfolio-is-no-laughing-matter Happiness Ministry in Dubai Check |url= value (help).  Missing or empty |title= (help)
^ "Harvard Kennedy School Report to US Congressman 21st Century GDP: National Indicators for a New Era" (PDF). 
^ "GDP and beyond: Measuring progress in a changing world". European Union. 2009. Retrieved 2012-02-26. 
^ "Bhutan GNH Index"


Further reading[edit]


Coyle, Diane (2014). GDP: A Brief but Affectionate History. Princeton, NJ: Princeton University Press. ISBN 978-0-691-15679-8. 
Australian Bureau for Statistics, Australian National Accounts: Concepts, Sources and Methods, 2000. Retrieved November 2009. In depth explanations of how GDP and other national accounts items are determined.
United States Department of Commerce, Bureau of Economic Analysis, "Concepts and Methods of the United States National Income and Product Accounts" (PDF). . Retrieved November 2009. In depth explanations of how GDP and other national accounts items are determined.


External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Gross domestic product.





Wikiquote has quotations related to: Gross Domestic Product


Global[edit]

Australian Bureau of Statistics Manual on GDP measurement
GDP-indexed bonds
OECD GDP chart
UN Statistical Databases
World Development Indicators (WDI) at Worldbank.org
World GDP Chart (since 1960)

Data[edit]

Bureau of Economic Analysis: Official United States GDP data
Historicalstatistics.org: Links to historical statistics on GDP for different countries and regions, maintained by the Department of Economic History at Stockholm University.
Quandl - GDP by country - downloadable in CSV, Excel, JSON or XML
Historical US GDP (yearly data), 1790–present, maintained by Samuel H. Williamson and Lawrence H. Officer, both professors of economics at the University of Illinois at Chicago.
Historical US GDP (quarterly data), 1947–present
Google – public data: GDP and Personal Income of the U.S. (annual): Nominal Gross Domestic Product
The Maddison Project of the Groningen Growth and Development Centre at the University of Groningen, the Netherlands. This project continues and extends the work of Angus Maddison in collating all the available, credible data estimating GDP for different countries around the world. This includes data for some countries for over 2,000 years back to 1 CE and for essentially all countries since 1950.

Articles and books[edit]


Library resources about
Gross domestic product





Resources in your library





Gross Domestic Product: An Economy’s All, International Monetary Fund.
Stiglitz JE, Sen A, Fitoussi J-P. Mismeasuring our Lives: Why GDP Doesn't Add Up, New Press, New York, 2010
What's wrong with the GDP?
Whether output and CPI inflation are mismeasured, by Nouriel Roubini and David Backus, in Lectures in Macroeconomics
Rodney Edvinsson, "Growth, Accumulation, Crisis: With New Macroeconomic Data for Sweden 1800–2000". 
Clifford Cobb, Ted Halstead and Jonathan Rowe. "If the GDP is up, why is America down?" The Atlantic Monthly, vol. 276, no. 4, October 1995, pages 59–78
Jerorn C.J.M. van den Bergh, "Abolishing GDP"
GDP and GNI in OECD Observer No246-247, Dec 2004-Jan 2005
Progress, what progress? in OECD Observer No272 March 2009







v
t
e


Lists of countries by GDP rankings



Purchasing power parity (PPP)



Per capita
Past

per capita


Past and projected

per capita


Private consumption per capita
Per hour
Per person employed
Ten largest historically
19th century





Nominal



Per capita
Past and projected

per capita


Sector composition





Growth rate



African countries
Asian states
European Union member states
European countries
Latin American and Caribbean countries
Oceanian countries
Per capita
1980–2010 growth
Industrial growth





Gross national income (GNI)



PPP
Nominal





Countries by region



Africa

PPP
nominal


Commonwealth of Nations

nominal


Latin America & Caribbean

PPP
nominal


North America

PPP
nominal
nominal per capita


South America

PPP


Arab League
ASEAN
Asia
Asia & Pacific

PPP


Former Soviet Republics
Europe

PPP
PPP per capita
nominal
nominal per capita


Oceania

PPP
PPP per capita
nominal
nominal per capita







Subnational divisions



Argentina
Australia
Brazil
Canada
Chile

per capita


China

per capita


Colombia
Croatia
France
Germany
Greece
India

per capita


Indonesia
Italy
Japan
Malaysia
Mexico
Pakistan
Russia

per capita


South Africa
South Korea
Spain
United States

PPP
nominal
nominal per capita


Thailand
OECD
Top country subdivisions by GDP

nominal










Lists of countries by financial rankings



List of international rankings
List of top international rankings by country
Lists by country













v
t
e


Economic classification of countries






Developed country
Developing country
Least Developed Countries
World Bank high-income economy
Newly industrialized country
Heavily indebted poor countries





Three-World Model



First World
Second World
Third World
Fourth World





Gross domestic product (GDP)





Nominal




By country

past and projected

per capita


per capita








Purchasing
power parity (PPP)




By country

future estimates

per capita


per capita
per hour worked
per person employed










Gross national income (GNI)



(Nominal, Atlas method) per capita
(PPP) per capita





Wages



Average wage

Europe by monthly average wage


Employee compensation (per hour)
List of countries by median wage
Minimum wages

Canada
Europe
United States







Wealth



Wealth per adult





Other national accounts



Gross National Happiness
Net material product
Research and development spending





Human development



Human Development Index

by country
inequality-adjusted


Human Poverty Index
Percentage living in poverty
Social Progress Index





Digital divide



ICT Development Index
Number of broadband Internet subscriptions
Number of Internet users
Smartphone penetration





Net international
investment position (NIIP)



Per capita









Authority control



GND: 4146775-9
NDL: 00871221










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Gross_domestic_product&oldid=793392265"					
Categories: Gross domestic productNational accountsHidden categories: Pages with citations lacking titlesPages with citations having bare URLsPages with URL errorsArticles to be expanded from August 2009All articles to be expandedArticles using small message boxesArticles to be expanded from February 2012All articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from June 2016Wikipedia articles with GND identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikiquote 



Languages


AfrikaansAlemannischالعربيةAragonésAsturianuАварAzərbaycancaBamanankanবাংলাBân-lâm-gúБашҡортсаБеларускаяБеларуская (тарашкевіца)‎भोजपुरीБългарскиBoarischBosanskiBrezhonegБуряадCatalàČeštinaCymraegDanskDeutschEestiΕλληνικάЭрзяньEspañolEsperantoEstremeñuEuskaraفارسیFøroysktFrançaisFryskGaeilgeGaelgGàidhligGalego𐌲𐌿𐍄𐌹𐍃𐌺客家語/Hak-kâ-ngî한국어Հայերենहिन्दीHrvatskiIdoIlokanoBahasa IndonesiaИронÍslenskaItalianoעבריתBasa Jawaಕನ್ನಡКъарачай-малкъарქართულიҚазақшаKurdîКыргызчаລາວLatinaLatviešuLietuviųMagyarमैथिलीМакедонскиമലയാളംमराठीმარგალურიمصرىمازِرونیBahasa MelayuMìng-dĕ̤ng-ngṳ̄Монголမြန်မာဘာသာNederlandsनेपाली日本語НохчийнNordfriiskNorsk bokmålNorsk nynorskOccitanOʻzbekcha/ўзбекчаਪੰਜਾਬੀپښتوPlattdüütschPolskiPortuguêsRomânăРусскийСаха тылаGagana SamoaScotsSeelterskShqipSicilianuSimple EnglishSlovenčinaSlovenščinaSoomaaligaکوردیСрпски / srpskiSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиBasa SundaSuomiSvenskaTagalogதமிழ்Татарча/tatarçaతెలుగుไทยТоҷикӣTürkçeУдмуртУкраїнськаاردوئۇيغۇرچە / UyghurcheVènetoTiếng Việt文言吴语ייִדישYorùbá粵語Žemaitėška中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 1 August 2017, at 13:13.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 















The international monetary and financial system












This website requires javascript for proper use














 Twitter
 YouTube
 RSS
 BIS alerts
 Sitemap
 FAQ
 Contact
Log out










































Research at the BIS
BIS authors
Annual Report
Quarterly Review
BIS Papers
Working Papers
Committee publications 
About committee publications

Basel Committee on Banking Supervision

Committee on the Global Financial System

Committee on Payments and Market Infrastructures

Markets Committee



Conferences
Asian Office research 
About Asian Office research

Research papers

Conferences

Research network



Americas Office research 
About Americas Office research

Research papers

Conferences

Research networks

Working Group on Financial Stability

Study Group on Markets and CB Operations



Other publications
Discontinued papers series






Home
Research & publications
Annual Report
 85th Annual Report, 2014/15



The international monetary and financial system



28 June 2015



 

Abstract
The suitable design of international monetary and financial arrangements for the global economy is a long-standing issue. A key shortcoming of the existing system is that it tends to heighten the risk of financial imbalances, leading to booms and busts in credit and asset prices with serious macroeconomic consequences. These imbalances often occur simultaneously across countries, deriving strength from international spillovers of various types. The global use of the dollar and the euro allows monetary conditions to affect borrowers well beyond the respective issuing economies. Many countries also import monetary conditions when setting policy rates to limit interest rate differentials and exchange rate movements against the major currencies. The global integration of financial markets tends to reinforce these dynamics, by allowing common factors to drive capital flows and a common price of risk to move bond and equity prices. Policies to keep one's own house in order by managing financial cycles would help to reduce such spillovers. In addition, central banks need to better internalise spillovers, not least to avoid the effects of their actions spilling back into their own economies. Moving beyond enlightened self-interest would require international cooperation on rules constraining domestic policies.
Full text
The suitable design of international monetary and financial arrangements for the global economy is a long-standing issue in economics. Putting in place mechanisms that facilitate the achievement of sustained, non-inflationary and balanced growth has proved elusive. In the wake of the Great Financial Crisis, the issue has again gained prominence on the international policy agenda.
Just as in the past, however, there is little agreement on what the key shortcomings of the current international monetary and financial system (IMFS) are, let alone on what to do about them. A common diagnosis has been that the system is unable to prevent the build-up of unsustainable current account imbalances and that this, in turn, has induced a contractionary bias: surplus countries have no incentive to adjust, while deficit countries are forced to do so. Indeed, current account imbalances have been a focus of G20 cooperative efforts.
This chapter provides a different perspective, by arguing that the main shortcoming of existing arrangements is that they tend to compound the weaknesses of domestic monetary and financial frameworks ("regimes"). In particular, the IMFS tends to heighten the risk of financial imbalances - that is, unsustainable credit and asset price booms that overstretch balance sheets and can lead to financial crises and serious macroeconomic damage. These imbalances occur simultaneously across countries, deriving strength from global monetary ease and cross-border financing. Put differently, the system exhibits "excess financial elasticity": think of an elastic band that can be stretched out further but that, as a result, eventually snaps back all the more violently.1
The chapter is structured as follows. After outlining the key features of the IMFS, the first section explains and documents how the interaction of domestic monetary and financial regimes increases financial imbalances. It highlights several factors: (i) the role of monetary areas that for the key international currencies (notably the US dollar) extend well beyond national borders; (ii) the limited insulation properties of exchange rates, which induce policy responses designed to avoid large interest rate differentials vis-à-vis the main international currencies; and (iii) the powerful waves generated by freely mobile financial capital and global liquidity, which wash across currencies and borders, carrying financial conditions across the globe. The second section considers possible solutions. It highlights the need to adjust domestic policy frameworks and to strengthen international cooperation, going beyond the own-house-in-order doctrine.
The IMFS: main elements and weaknesses
Main elements
The IMFS comprises the arrangements governing transactions in goods, services and financial instruments among countries. Today, it consists of a set of domestically oriented policies in a world of largely free capital flows. Domestic monetary regimes focus mainly on price stability, while currencies are allowed to float to varying degrees: free floating among the principal international currencies coexists with greater or lesser management of other currencies. Financial regimes generally allow funds to move freely across currencies and borders, although some countries still impose restrictions. The main restraint on financial transactions takes the form of prudential regulation and supervision, in part based on internationally agreed standards.




Current arrangements differ markedly from the previous system, Bretton Woods (1946-73). At the time, the US dollar's convertibility into gold served as an external monetary anchor, and currencies were tied together through fixed but adjustable exchange rates (Table V.1). Domestic monetary regimes in general gave less priority to price stability and more to external balance and demand growth. While the anchor ultimately did not prove that strong, the arrangements contrast with present ones, in which the aggregation of monetary policies pursued under domestic mandates acts as the only overall constraint. During the Bretton Woods era, the leading international currency was the dollar, which now shares this role to some extent with others, mainly the euro. And international capital mobility was quite limited, reflecting a myriad of restrictions on "repressed" domestic financial systems.
The performance of the two systems has differed markedly as well. Bretton Woods did not see major episodes of financial instability, but eventually proved unable to ensure lasting global monetary stability. It broke down once the United States formally abandoned gold convertibility and exchange rates were allowed to float. Current arrangements have succeeded in promoting price stability more than financial stability.
Arguably, this is no coincidence. The 84th Annual Report, as further elaborated in other chapters of this Annual Report, explored why domestic monetary and financial regimes have so far been unable to ensure lasting financial stability. But their interaction through the IMFS has also played a role, by compounding rather than limiting the weaknesses of domestic regimes. Consider, in turn, the interaction of monetary and financial arrangements.
Interaction of domestic monetary regimes
The interaction of monetary regimes spreads easy monetary conditions from core economies to the rest of the world. The international use of reserve currencies does so directly, and the strategic conduct of monetary policy does so indirectly. Take each in turn.
The reliance on a single global currency has diminished slowly since Bretton Woods, but the US dollar continues to play a dominant role in international trade and finance, alongside the euro. As a means of exchange, the dollar is on one side of no less than 87% of foreign exchange market transactions (Table V.2), with an even higher share of forward and swap transactions. Its dominance in foreign exchange markets makes the dollar the sole intervention currency outside Europe and Japan, which supports its high share in foreign exchange reserves. More than half of world trade is invoiced and settled in dollars, pointing to the greenback's pre-eminent role as a unit of account.




Remarkably, the advent of the euro and the dollar's trend depreciation since the 1970s have not materially challenged the dollar's role as a store of value (Graph V.1, left-hand panel). At 63%, it maintains almost three times the share of the euro in foreign exchange reserves. Its share in both official reserves and private portfolios is sustained by the scale of what can be termed the "dollar zone" of economies whose currencies move more closely with the dollar than with the euro (Box V.A). At half or more of world GDP, the dollar zone is far larger than the US economy, which is less than a quarter.
Monetary policy settings for key international currencies influence financial conditions outside these currencies' home jurisdictions directly through their impact on interest rates and the valuation of assets or liabilities denominated in these currencies but held or owed by non-residents. In particular, dollar and euro credit to non-bank borrowers outside the United States and euro area stood at $9.5 trillion and €2.3 trillion ($2.7 trillion), respectively, at end-2014. The dollar debt represents a seventh of global GDP outside the United States (Box V.B).
The large stocks of dollar- and euro-denominated credit extended to borrowers outside the United States and the euro area, respectively, mean that Federal Reserve and ECB policies are transmitted directly to other economies. The impact depends on the characteristics of the instrument in question, notably its maturity and the flexibility of the corresponding interest rate. For instance, in the case of bank loans priced off of dollar Libor or Euribor, changes in short-term policy rates pass through within weeks. Over half of dollar and euro credit to borrowers outside the United States and euro area remains in the form of bank loans.




The pass-through is slower for bonds, given their generally fixed rates and longer maturity, but then quantities can respond too. In particular, some stocks of dollar bonds have changed quite markedly in response to unconventional monetary policy (Chapter IV). Low yields reflecting the Federal Reserve's large-scale purchases of Treasury and agency bonds, among other factors, led US and global investors to seek yield in lower-quality bonds. The impact was especially pronounced for non-US borrowers, who between 2009 and 2014 ramped up their dollar bond issuance by $1.8 trillion (Graph V.2, left-hand panel). Investor demand for such bonds proved highly responsive to the compression of the term premium, as measured by the spread between Treasury bond yields and expected bill yields: the lower the premium, the faster the growth of dollar bonds issued by non-US borrowers (hence the negative relationship after the first quarter of 2009 seen in the right-hand panel of Graph V.2).
By the same token, the recent ECB large-scale bond purchases and compression of term premia on euro-denominated bonds raise the question of whether borrowers outside the euro area will take advantage of the funding opportunity. In fact, by the end of 2014 the stock of euro bonds issued by such borrowers was already growing as fast as its dollar counterpart.
Post-crisis, offshore dollar credit has grown fastest in those jurisdictions where it has been cheapest relative to local funding, especially emerging market economies (EMEs).2 Authorities around the world use capital controls or macroprudential policy to raise the cost of dollar borrowing at home, but their policy reach does not extend to activities of multinational firms, which can borrow dollars (or euros) offshore to sidestep tight domestic funding conditions. This is one reason for the rapid growth in various quantitative measures of "global liquidity", which denotes the ease of financing in global financial markets (Box V.B).

Box V.A
Mapping the dollar and euro zones
This box uses simple regression methods to place currencies in three zones of influence corresponding to the main international currencies based on the currencies' degree of co-movement. The three reference currencies are the dollar, the euro (before 1999, the Deutsche mark) and the yen, consistent with their status as the three most transacted currencies in the world in the BIS Triennial Central Bank Survey. Thus defined, the dollar zone accounts for nearly 60% of world GDP, far more than the US share in world GDP, which is between 20 and 25%.
The dollar share is calculated in two steps. First, each currency is placed in or between zones. Each currency's weekly percentage change against the dollar is regressed on the weekly percentage change of the euro/dollar and yen/dollar rates. The dollar zone weight is calculated as 1 minus the corresponding regression coefficients. For example, the Hong Kong dollar is pegged to the US dollar, so the coefficients are zero and the dollar zone weight is 1. For the intermediate case of sterling, in 2013 the pound's estimated coefficient is 0.60 on the euro/dollar rate and 0.09 on the yen/dollar, making the currency's dollar weight 1 - 0.60 - 0.09, or 0.31. The results in Graph V.A show the dollar to be more global, the euro to be more regional and the yen to lack much external influence. The dollar weights can thus be read in reverse as euro weights, eg with the dark blue area representing over 95% euro weight.
Second, the dollar share is calculated across currencies using (PPP) GDP weights. The dollar zone weight for each of the 40 economies (50 before the euro) is multiplied by the respective GDP, and the product is added to the US GDP. This sum is then expressed as a share of the total GDP of the 43 major economies analysed, including those of the United States, the euro area and Japan. Graph V.1 plots these aggregate zone shares of global GDP.
There is strong cross-sectional evidence that a currency's co-movement with the dollar shapes the currency composition of its external portfolio, both official and private. For the two dozen economies that disclose the currency composition of official reserves, the dollar zone weight accounts for about two thirds of the variation in the dollar share across countries. And in larger samples, the dollar zone weight is also strongly linked with the dollar share of cross-border bank deposits or loans and international bonds. The underlying motivation is the same for the official and private sectors: matching the portfolio weights to the co-movements of the domestic currency with major currencies serves to minimise the volatility of portfolio returns when measured in domestic currency.




 See R McCauley and T Chan, "Currency movements drive reserve composition", BIS Quarterly Review, December 2014, pp 23-36.

Monetary regimes also interact indirectly, through central bank responses to each other's policies. Central banks seem to set their policy rates with an eye on those of the Federal Reserve or ECB. This behaviour is sometimes explicitly noted, as in the cases of the Central Bank of Norway and the Swiss National Bank with reference to ECB policy, but appears to be widespread.
One reason is to limit exchange rate movements. Exchange rate flexibility has often been described as insulating the domestic economy from external developments, but this insulation is often overstated. In particular, appreciation can lead lenders to consider firms with debts denominated in foreign currency as better capitalised and therefore more creditworthy, reducing perceived risks associated with lending and increasing the availability of credit.3 Through this and other mechanisms, such as carry trades and momentum trading, currencies can overshoot, shrinking the traded goods sector and leaving the economy vulnerable to a turn in the ease of global financing. Then, depreciation can lead to financial distress among firms with foreign currency debt. During the dollar's downswing from 2002 to 2011 (with an interruption in late 2008), many central banks resisted unwelcome appreciation against the dollar, in setting their own policy rates and by intervening in the currency market.
Indeed, many countries - not only EMEs but also advanced economies - appear to have kept interest rates below those that traditional domestic benchmarks would indicate, partly in response to low rates in core currencies. In the 1990s, policy rates were broadly in line with the Taylor rule, a simple interest rate rule prescribing a mechanical reaction to the output gap and the deviation of inflation from target. In the early 2000s, however, actual policy rates drifted persistently below the levels implied by the Taylor rule, suggesting that monetary policy became systematically accommodative (Graph V.3). Many advanced economies apparently hesitated to raise interest rates during the boom, and have maintained them near zero since the crisis. For their part, EME authorities appear to have set policy rates low out of concern over capital flows and appreciation (Graph V.3, right-hand panel). The empirical significance of US interest rates in influencing policy rates elsewhere provides additional evidence for follow-the-leader behaviour (Box V.C). While this simple exercise has important limitations, it points to competitive easing as a way of sustaining external demand. More than 20 central banks have eased monetary policy since December 2014, some explicitly responding to external conditions (Chapter IV).





Box V.B
Global liquidity as global credit aggregates
Over the past several years, the BIS has developed indicators to track global liquidity conditions. The term global liquidity is used to mean the ease of financing in global financial markets. Total credit outstanding is one of its main footprints, as it shows the extent to which bond markets and banks have led to the build-up of exposures. In covering US dollar and euro credit, this box focuses on the two largest components of global credit through which the monetary policies of the respective currency areas directly influence financial conditions in the rest of the world.
Global credit can be extended through bank loans or bonds, and each has a domestic and an international component. Graph V.B shows dollar- and euro-denominated debt, broken down by the location of the borrower. Some 80% of global non-financial dollar debt at end-2014 was incurred by US residents (top left-hand panel). Their liabilities include US public debt, US household debt and US corporate debt. But $9.5 trillion (19%) of dollar credit was extended to non-bank borrowers located outside the United States, and these entities are as exposed to the US monetary policy stance as US residents are. At 13% of non-US GDP, the stock of offshore dollar credit exceeds its euro counterpart worth $2.7 trillion (bottom left-hand panel). Compared with borrowing in US dollars, a larger share of overall borrowing in euros takes place from inside the same currency area (92%).




The international credit component tends to be more procyclical and volatile. International bank lending in both dollars and euros outpaced domestic credit in the boom that preceded the Great Financial Crisis, and contracted once the crisis broke out (Graph V.B, right-hand panels). Bond markets partly substituted for impaired bank lending in the immediate aftermath of the crisis, and increased demand for funding went hand in hand with higher yield spreads. Since 2010, the search for yield has enabled a surge in issuance at compressed spreads that has helped to push the share of bonds in international credit to 46%. In this second phase of global liquidity, bond markets and the asset management industry have taken centre stage in shaping global liquidity conditions.
 See BIS, "Highlights of global financing flows", BIS Quarterly Review, March 2015, pp 13-29; and www.bis.org/statistics/gli.htm.

Resistance to appreciation has also taken the form of currency intervention, which itself feeds back into global monetary ease. Many central banks have intervened directly in the foreign exchange market, typically buying dollars, and then investing the proceeds in bonds issued by the major governments. Unlike major central banks' large-scale domestic bond purchases, reserve managers have not sought to lower yields in the bond markets in which they invest. Nevertheless, the secular reserve accumulation and balance sheet policies of major central banks have combined to push estimated official bond holdings to more than $12 trillion out of the $31 trillion in US, euro area, Japanese and UK government bonds (Graph II.9, left-hand panel). Such holdings account for over half of the outstanding stock of US Treasury securities and more than 40% of the combined stock of Treasury and agency securities (Graph II.9, right-hand panel).
As a result, monetary policies of advanced and emerging market economies have reinforced each other. Easy monetary conditions at the centre have led to easy monetary and financial conditions in the rest of the world: there, firms and governments have boosted dollar and euro borrowing and authorities have resisted unwelcome currency appreciation. In turn, their foreign exchange intervention has raised official investment in major bond markets, further compressing bond yields there. With central banks and reserve managers bidding for duration shoulder to shoulder with pension funds and life insurers, bond yields have declined to record lows and the term premium has turned negative (Chapter II).
Interaction of financial regimes
Financial market integration has allowed common global factors to drive capital flows and asset prices. The common factors have partly shifted between the two phases of global liquidity, pre- and post-crisis.

Box V.C
International monetary spillovers
Over recent years, interest rates in EMEs and advanced economies moved closely together with interest rates in large advanced economies, particularly the United States. This close correlation could reflect the response to common macroeconomic developments affecting all countries. But it could also reflect global interest rate spillovers from large advanced economies. Interest rate spillovers can result from explicit exchange rate policies or attempts to contain exchange rate and capital flow pressures resulting from yield differentials vis-à-vis key currencies, and from global investor arbitrage tying capital market rates together.
To shed light on this question, a panel of 30 emerging market and advanced economies over the period 2000-14 is investigated in a regression analysis. The analysis shows a strong relationship between changes in interest rates prevailing in these economies and changes in US interest rates, even after controlling for domestic macroeconomic conditions and the global business and financial cycle. For short-term interest rates, a 100 basis point change in US rates is associated with an average 34 basis point change in emerging market and small advanced economies (Table V.C, first column). For long-term interest rates, the effect is stronger: a 100 basis point change in the US bond yield is associated with an average 59 basis point change in the yields of these economies (second column). Besides US interest rates, the degree of global investor risk aversion, as measured by the VIX, also consistently emerges as an important driver of these interest rates.




Furthermore, the persistently low global policy rates relative to Taylor rule-implied levels since the early 2000s (Graph V.3) reflect, at least in part, the effect of low policy rates prevailing in the United States over this period. Specifically, a 100 basis point cut in the US federal funds rate is found to lower EME and other advanced economy policy rates by 43 basis points relative to the levels implied by a standard normative Taylor rule (Table V.C, third column). When estimating a descriptive Taylor rule, the estimated impact of the US policy rate is even higher: some 70 basis points (fourth column). In sum, the results suggest an economically significant causal relationship from US interest rates to interest rates in emerging market and other advanced economies.
 See B Hofmann and E Takáts, "International monetary spillovers", BIS Quarterly Review, forthcoming.





The bank flows that dominated in the first, pre-crisis, phase of global liquidity drew on easy leverage, predictable policy rates and low volatility, as proxied by the VIX.4 These flows enabled domestic credit booms, freeing them from the constraint of the domestic funding base. In a sample of 31 EMEs between early 2002 and 2008, a rise in the share of cross-border bank funding, extended both directly to domestic non-banks and indirectly through banks, helped boost the ratio of bank credit to GDP (Graph V.4, left-hand panel). Banks found non-core liabilities abroad to fund booming credit at home.5
Analysis of a broader sample of 62 countries and a more inclusive measure of international capital flows points to a similar dynamic. Here, the larger the net debt inflows, including both portfolio and bank flows, the larger the increase in an economy's ratio of bank credit to GDP (Graph V.4, right-hand panel). The inclusion of Ireland, Spain and the United Kingdom shows that a domestic credit boom's reliance on external financing is not a symptom of financial underdevelopment. In fact, in the subsample of 23 advanced economies the reliance on capital inflows is greater than among EMEs, as the steeper fitted line suggests.




In the second, post-crisis, phase of global liquidity, the term premium on sovereign bonds has become a more important driver of funding conditions. Although cross-border bank credit has continued to expand strongly in EMEs, it has contracted sharply among advanced economies, while bond financing has surged across the board. Even as bond flows have gained prominence, the term premium has emerged as the salient global price of risk in integrated financial markets.
Studies of the spillovers across global bond markets around official large-scale bond purchase announcements have highlighted the strong co-movement of bond yields. If investors treat bonds denominated in different currencies as close substitutes, purchases in one market also depress yields elsewhere. Table V.3 illustrates this point, summarising several studies that estimate the basis point moves in various advanced bond markets that correspond to a 100 basis point move in the US Treasury market. In addition, local currency EME bonds have also co-moved much more closely with Treasuries than a decade ago.6
Heretofore, the relationship across even major bond markets appeared asymmetric, with US bond yields driving those elsewhere, but in the past year this seems to have changed. In particular, there are signs that the euro area bond market has been moving its US counterpart. Anticipation of ECB large-scale bond purchases put downward pressure on French and German bond yields and, through co-movement of term premia, on US bond yields as well, despite the expected divergence in policy rates (Graph V.5, right-hand panel). This contrasts with the experience in early 1994, which epitomises previous patterns. At the time, the Federal Reserve was raising the policy rate while the Bank of France and the Deutsche Bundesbank were reducing theirs, but the backup in US bond yields was transmitted to Europe (Graph V.5, left-hand panel).7




Current concerns
To summarise, the workings of the IMFS post-crisis have spread easy monetary and financial conditions from the reserve currency areas to the rest of the world, just as they did pre-crisis. Global financial conditions have consequently loosened to an extent that may not prove consistent with lasting financial and macroeconomic stability. Credit booms in EMEs and some advanced economies less affected by the crisis have built up tell-tale financial imbalances. In the short run, the IMFS has tilted conditions towards expansion. But in the longer run, financial busts, were they to materialise, would tilt them towards contraction.




Monetary policy divergence across key currencies and renewed dollar appreciation pose risks. Ease in the euro area might prolong global ease, if firms and governments around the world can substitute euro funding for dollar funding. However, the large stock of dollar debt outstanding means that a tightening of dollar credit is likely to prove consequential. Thus, renewed dollar strength could expose vulnerabilities (Chapter III), especially in those firms that have collectively borrowed trillions of dollars. Admittedly, it is well known that the US economy has a short position in the dollar that funds a long position in other currencies. And by the same token, the rest of the world must hold more dollar assets than dollar liabilities and thus enjoy valuation gains in aggregate when the dollar appreciates. But even in a country with a long dollar position, the distribution of currency positions across sectors matters greatly for the outcome. For example, in many EMEs the official sector has a long dollar position whereas the corporate sector carries a short one (Box V.D). Absent transfers from the (gaining) official sector to the (losing) corporate sector, the economy may well be hurt by dollar strength.
Dollar strength, monetary policy divergence and heavy official holdings in the global bond market could lead to volatility. Were EMEs to draw down reserves substantially, their selling bonds in the key currencies could create unprecedented cross-currents in global bond markets. ECB and Bank of Japan bond purchases, EME selling and, eventually, the Federal Reserve's not rolling over maturing bonds could confront the remaining private investors with a difficult and shifting problem of bond pricing.
Limits and prospects in international policy coordination
Policies to address the issues raised in this chapter require more than each country managing its inflation and business cycle. A broader notion of keeping one's house in order suggests policymakers deploy monetary, prudential and fiscal policies to manage financial cycles to ensure lasting monetary, financial and macroeconomic stability (Chapters I and IV). The resulting reduction in the frequency and depth of credit booms and busts would greatly reduce negative cross-country spillovers.

Box V.D
Valuation effects of dollar appreciation
This box uses the example of Korea to illustrate that dollar appreciation can deliver wealth gains to non-US residents as a whole, while still representing a tightening of financial conditions for non-US firms that have funded themselves in the dollar. The Korean official sector can gain from dollar appreciation but need not adjust its spending, while the Korean corporate sector can lose net worth and face tighter credit.
It is by now well known that dollar appreciation boosts US net international liabilities. This is because US residents have dollar-denominated liabilities to the rest of the world that exceed their corresponding assets to the tune of 39% of GDP. With the appreciation of the dollar in 2014, the US net international investment position declined from -$5.4 trillion to -$6.9 trillion, as US assets stopped growing in dollar terms despite rising local currency valuations. This $1.5 trillion difference was more than three times the current account of $410 billion. Accordingly, the rest of the world's wealth increased.
Typical of the rest of the world, Korea's net international investment position as a whole gained from dollar appreciation. Still, Korean firms that have borrowed dollars can still see their net worth fall. Overall, the country's modestly positive ($82 billion in Table V.D) external position shows net foreign currency assets of $719 billion, with over half held by the official sector (official reserve assets of $364 billion) and substantial holdings by institutional investors (portfolio assets of $204 billion). A substantial fraction of portfolio and other foreign currency liabilities ($348 billion), and $65 billion of foreign currency loans booked by banks in Korea, are owed by the corporate sector. Moreover, BIS data show an additional $7 billion of mostly dollar bonds issued by offshore affiliates of Korean non-financial firms, and there is also offshore bank credit. Dollar appreciation leads to official gains that are not conveyed to firms that lose net worth.
Much analysis of international balance sheets, in general, and the insurance afforded by foreign exchange reserve holdings, in particular, implicitly suffers from a fallacy of division, according to which what is true of the whole is true of the parts. In the absence of transfers made when the domestic currency depreciates - which would themselves be fraught with moral hazard - the gains in the public sector do not offset corporate losses. Firms need to adjust their spending and hiring. And if the authorities eventually deploy international reserves to provide dollar liquidity to banks and firms, the intervention may follow disruptions that have already exacted a price.




 See C Tille, "The impact of exchange rate movements on US foreign debt", Federal Reserve Bank of New York, Current Issues in Economics and Finance, vol 9, no 1, January 2003.

In addition, policymakers could give more weight to international interactions, including shared exposures, spillovers and feedbacks, with a view to keeping the global village in order. Policies could either seek to prevent crises, through measures to restrain the build-up of financial imbalances, or to strengthen crisis management, including through safety nets. An ounce of crisis prevention is worth a pound of crisis management: there are clear welfare benefits from reducing the incidence and severity of crises and clear limits of foresight and moral hazard in designing effective safety nets.
International policy coordination can occur at various depths. Enlightened self-interest takes international spillovers into account to the extent that they spill back on one's own economy. However, even if countries did their best individually, this would still fall short of the mark if there were significant international spillovers, as in today's era of global liquidity. Moving towards a more efficient outcome would require greater cooperation, including ad hoc joint action, and possibly even agreement on rules of the game that constrain domestic policies.
Obstacles present themselves in terms of both analysis and cooperation. There is the difficulty of agreeing on a diagnosis of what ails the IMFS. And even if a common understanding of international spillovers and their causes emerged, it would remain challenging to forge and to maintain a common approach among multiple actors of varying sizes subject to differing domestic constraints.
Such possibilities and obstacles are evident in the discussion concerning crisis management. During the Great Financial Crisis, central banks proved able to make swift joint adjustments to their policy stances and to coordinate closely in extending foreign exchange swaps to each other. Funding extended under dollar swaps reached almost $600 billion (and, under euro swaps, €6 billion). The dollar swap lines supported financial stability by allowing the funding of foreign banks with limited access to Federal Reserve facilities. In turn, they also restored the monetary transmission mechanism after banks had been bidding up dollar Libor relative to the federal funds rate.
Today, proposals to modify and extend safety nets face obstacles. One reason is deep analytical disagreement. Is reserve accumulation a by-product of exchange rate management, or a form of self-insurance against domestic and external crises? Should international liquidity facilities, including currency swap lines between central banks, be broadened, and what is their best design? Would enhanced safety nets lead to smaller foreign exchange reserves? And, even if agreement were reached, many aspects of international risk-sharing would remain problematic. Despite the room for improvement, the status quo may well persist.
All this reinforces the case for crisis prevention. Here, central banks could seek to internalise the effects of their own policies. An improved exchange of information would help authorities to reach a better understanding of international spillovers and spillbacks. For instance, if the major central banks' monetary policies have indeed induced competitive easing among EMEs, the resulting financial imbalances may ultimately hurt the advanced economies. What is more, such spillbacks may be stronger than in the past, in line with EMEs' growing weight in the world economy (Chapter III). Similarly, the outsize official role in major bond markets points to the need for policymakers to pay attention to global effects. However, while global reserve managers might collectively benefit from taking into account the effect of their investment behaviour on global bond yields, their individual incentive is to ignore international spillovers.

Box V.E
Consolidating the US external balance sheet
Much of international macroeconomics assumes that national borders delimit currency zones and decision-making units. Just as the national accounts do, it assumes that those borders define the relevant economic territory: different currencies do not compete within a given country and firms operate exclusively within national borders. In reality, neither is the case. Not only does the domain of major currencies extend outside their country of issue (Boxes V.A and V.B), but multinational firms, be they financial or non-financial, operate across borders. Management focuses on group-wide profits and risks, and balance sheets span national boundaries. A consolidated perspective better reflects the reach of multinational firms and the extent of global integration.
This box uses the US example to illustrate how such a consolidated view of foreign assets and liabilities differs from the official international investment position (IIP) recorded on a residence basis - the defining criterion of the national accounts and balance of payment statistics. These are denoted "locational" in the first two columns of Table V.E. The process of consolidation aligns balance sheets with the nationality of ownership rather than with the location where the assets and liabilities are booked. This amounts to redrawing the US border to include the foreign balance sheets of US-owned firms, and to exclude the US balance sheets of foreign firms. This consolidation is performed here for the banking sector and the non-bank business sector (multinational companies).




The first step replaces the banks' external positions with consolidated BIS data (three rows under "bank-reported" in Table V.E). This removes all cross-border claims of, say, BNP Paribas New York on the rest of the world (these being French assets), and adds JPMorgan's consolidated foreign claims, yielding a total of $3.330 trillion for reporting US banks combined. Similarly, on the liabilities side, out goes any cross-border liability of BNP Paribas New York, and in comes JPMorgan's global foreign liabilities, to give an estimated $2.958 trillion for US banks. Moreover, foreign banks' local operations in the United States, which are not part of the US external position, further add to US consolidated assets and liabilities, respectively, to the extent that US residents provide funding ($2.465 trillion) to, or receive credit ($3.150 trillion) from, the US offices of foreign banks. Consolidating banks raises the sum of US foreign assets and liabilities from $40 trillion (IIP) to $45 trillion.
The second step consolidates foreign-owned multinational companies (excluding banks) in an analogous, though coarser, way (owing to data limitations). The cross-border direct investment positions of non-banks, assets and liabilities, are replaced by the (larger) total assets of US multinationals outside the United States and by those of foreign multinationals in the United States, respectively (rows under "direct investment" in Table V.E). Out goes General Electric's equity position in its French subsidiary, and in comes that subsidiary's total assets, resulting in $20,250 billion for all US-owned multinationals combined. These assets exceed the corresponding ownership claims (consisting of $5,078 billion worth of equity and equity-like inter-affiliate debt in the IIP) because US multinationals also borrow abroad; these liabilities (an estimated $15,173 billion) in turn add to US foreign liabilities. As for foreign multinationals, French firm Total's stake in its US subsidiary is removed, and its US assets are added - yielding $9,920 billion for foreign multinationals. Foreign multinationals' liabilities ($6,863 billion) count as a US foreign asset. This step sextuples directly held corporate assets and liabilities, but leaves US net assets unchanged.
Together, consolidating banks and multinational companies more than doubles the gross foreign position of the United States. US external assets and liabilities combined jump from $40 trillion on a residence basis (IIP) to an estimated $89 trillion when measured on a consolidated basis. The example reveals that the US economy is more open, and its foreign balance sheet larger, than is apparent from the external position derived from the balance of payments. The calculation of the US current account, on the other hand, should not be affected by consolidation, since foreign earnings are included in net investment income whether they are repatriated or not.

It may be difficult to go beyond enlightened self-interest and to revisit rules of the game more broadly.8 Many reject a global perspective in the realm of monetary policy. Accordingly, domestic mandates ask major reserve-issuing central banks to set policy for a smaller economic domain than that occupied by their currencies.
This interpretation of domestic mandates contrasts sharply with successful international cooperation in the realm of financial regulation and supervision. There, national mandates have not precluded extensive international cooperation and the development of global rules.
A better understanding of the shortcomings of the current IMFS would already be a big step forward. A widely held view is that the main problem is the IMFS's apparent inability to prevent large current account imbalances. This view of imbalances is the prevailing one in international forums and implies specific adjustment policies, such as those associated with the G20 Mutual Assessment Process.9
The focus on current accounts and the corresponding net resource flows, however, arguably glosses over the IMFS's fundamental weakness. The aim of rebalancing global demand reduces the notion of imbalances to net flows in goods and services between countries, and neglects the greater risk of financial imbalances building up within and across countries. To be sure, large current account deficits often point to underlying problems, but financial booms and busts can and do develop in surplus countries as well. An aggregate surplus position may well conceal such vulnerabilities. Financial imbalances are more closely linked to domestic and international gross positions, and need not leave a mark on cross-border net flows - what current accounts represent.10 Indeed, financial imbalances may not show up in a country's balance of payments at all if multinationals issue debt offshore for their use abroad, for instance. This, in turn, raises the question of the appropriate unit of analysis in international finance, with consequences for how one should measure the risks (Box V.E). Making progress on the design of the IMFS thus calls for a new diagnosis that accounts for financial imbalances as a basis for broad adjustments to domestic policy regimes and their international interaction.
1See C Borio, "The international monetary and financial system: its Achilles heel and what to do about it", BIS Working Papers, no 456, August 2014; and C Borio, H James and H S Shin, "The international monetary and financial system: a capital account historical perspective", BIS Working Papers, no 457, August 2014.
2See R McCauley, P McGuire and V Sushko, "Global dollar credit: links to US monetary policy and leverage", Economic Policy, vol 30, issue 82, April 2015, pp 189-229.
3See V Bruno and H S Shin, "Cross-border banking and global liquidity", Review of Economic Studies, vol 82, issue 2, April 2015, pp 535-64.
4See H Rey, "Dilemma not trilemma: the global financial cycle and monetary policy independence", in Global dimensions of unconventional monetary policy, proceedings of the Federal Reserve Bank of Kansas City Jackson Hole symposium, August 2013, pp 285-333.
5See J-H Hahm, H S Shin and K Shin, "Noncore bank liabilities and financial vulnerability", Journal of Money, Credit and Banking, vol 45, issue s1, April 2013, pp 3-36.
6Compare R McCauley and G Jiang, "Diversifying with Asian local currency bonds", BIS Quarterly Review, September 2004, pp 51-66 and the following: K Miyajima, M Mohanty and J Yetman, "Spillovers of US unconventional monetary policy to Asia: the role of long-term interest rates", BIS Working Papers, no 478, December 2014; Q Chen, A Filardo, D He and F Zhu, "Financial crisis, US unconventional monetary policy and international spillovers", BIS Working Papers, no 494, March 2015; and Box V.C.
7See C Borio and R McCauley, "The economics of recent bond yield volatility", BIS Economic Papers, no 45, July 1996.
8The case for change has been put forward by R Rajan, "Competitive monetary easing: is it yesterday once more?", remarks at the Brookings Institution, 10 April 2014. For more sceptical views on policy coordination, see eg S Fischer, "The Federal Reserve and the global economy", Per Jacobsson Foundation Lecture at the IMF/World Bank Annual Meetings, 11 October 2014; and B Cœuré, "Domestic and cross-border spillovers of unconventional monetary policies", remarks at the Swiss National Bank-IMF conference "Monetary policy challenges in a changing world", 12 May 2015. See also J Caruana, "The international monetary and financial system: eliminating the blind spot", remarks at the IMF conference "Rethinking macro policy III: progress or confusion?", 16 April 2015; and W Dudley, "US monetary policy and emerging market economies", remarks at the Federal Reserve Bank of New York roundtable discussion "Three decades of crises: what have we learned?", 27 March 2014.
9The European Commission's Macroeconomic Imbalance Procedure goes further in complementing its surveillance of external imbalances with indicators on internal financial imbalances.
10See C Borio and P Disyatat, "Global imbalances and the global crisis: link or no link?", BIS Working Papers, no 346, May 2011. 


Full text


18 pages, 762 kb







Full text


18 pages, 762 kb




More Annual Reports


Select...
2017
2016
2015
2014
2013
2012
2011
2010
2009
2008
2007
2006
2005
2004
2003
2002
2001
2000
1999
1998
1997





 


Top

Share:




Top



About
Sitemap
FAQ
Contact
Careers
Translations


 
 


Legal
Terms and conditions
Copyright and permissions
Disclaimers
Privacy policy
E-mail scam warning


 
 


Follow us
 Twitter
 YouTube
  RSS
 BIS alerts
Log out



BIS

















HKMA Register – Register Homepage



Skip to main content








(Last updated on 03/08/2017)

ENG
中文


Default Font SizeA
Larger Font SizeA
Largest Font SizeA



Contact List of Authorized Institutions and Local Representative Offices under the Supervision of the HKMA (Excel File, 242KB)




Search by Name of Authorized Institution / Local Representative Office:






   
	    
    







Please select:A | B | C | D | E | F | G | H | I | J | K | L | M | N | O | P | Q | R | S | T | U | V | W | X | Y | ZMain ContentA

ABC BANKING CORPORATION LTD
ABN AMRO BANK N.V.
AGRICULTURAL BANK OF CHINA LIMITED
ALLAHABAD BANK
ALLIED BANKING CORPORATION (HONG KONG) LIMITED
AS EXPOBANK
ASHIKAGA BANK, LTD. (THE)
AUSTRALIA AND NEW ZEALAND BANKING GROUP LIMITED
AXIS BANK LIMITED
Back to topB

BANC OF AMERICA SECURITIES ASIA LIMITED
BANCA MONTE DEI PASCHI DI SIENA S.P.A.
BANCO BILBAO VIZCAYA ARGENTARIA S.A.
BANCO BPM SOCIETA' PER AZIONI
BANCO SANTANDER, S.A.
BANCO SECURITY
BANGKOK BANK PUBLIC COMPANY LIMITED
BANK J. SAFRA SARASIN AG
BANK JULIUS BAER & CO. LTD.
BANK OF AMERICA, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION
BANK OF AYUDHYA PUBLIC COMPANY LIMITED
BANK OF BARODA
BANK OF BEIJING CO., LTD.
BANK OF CHINA (HONG KONG) LIMITED
BANK OF CHINA INTERNATIONAL LIMITED
BANK OF CHINA LIMITED
BANK OF COMMUNICATIONS (HONG KONG) LIMITED
BANK OF COMMUNICATIONS CO., LTD.
BANK OF DONGGUAN CO., LTD.
BANK OF EAST ASIA, LIMITED (THE)
BANK OF FUKUOKA, LTD. (THE)
BANK OF INDIA
BANK OF KYOTO, LTD. (THE)
BANK OF MONTREAL
BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON (THE)
BANK OF NOVA SCOTIA (THE)
BANK OF SHANGHAI (HONG KONG) LIMITED
BANK OF SINGAPORE LIMITED
BANK OF TAIWAN
BANK OF TOKYO-MITSUBISHI UFJ, LTD. (THE)
BANK OF YOKOHAMA, LTD. (THE)
BANK SINOPAC
BANQUE CANTONALE DE GENEVE
BANQUE TRANSATLANTIQUE S.A.
BARCLAYS BANK PLC
BCOM FINANCE (HONG KONG) LIMITED
BDO UNIBANK, INC.
BNP PARIBAS
BNP PARIBAS SECURITIES SERVICES
BPI INTERNATIONAL FINANCE LIMITED
BSI LTD
Back to topC

CA INDOSUEZ (SWITZERLAND) SA
CAIXABANK S.A.
CANADIAN IMPERIAL BANK OF COMMERCE
CANARA BANK
CATHAY BANK
CATHAY UNITED BANK COMPANY, LIMITED
CHANG HWA COMMERCIAL BANK, LTD.
CHAU'S BROTHERS FINANCE COMPANY LIMITED
CHIBA BANK, LTD. (THE)
CHINA BOHAI BANK CO., LTD.
CHINA CITIC BANK INTERNATIONAL LIMITED
CHINA CONSTRUCTION BANK (ASIA) CORPORATION LIMITED
CHINA CONSTRUCTION BANK CORPORATION
CHINA DEVELOPMENT BANK
CHINA EVERBRIGHT BANK CO., LTD.
CHINA GUANGFA BANK CO., LTD.
CHINA MERCHANTS BANK CO., LTD.
CHINA MINSHENG BANKING CORP., LTD.
CHIYU BANKING CORPORATION LIMITED
CHONG HING BANK LIMITED
CHONG HING FINANCE LIMITED
CHUGOKU BANK, LTD (THE)
CIMB BANK BERHAD
CITIBANK (HONG KONG) LIMITED
CITIBANK, N.A.
CITICORP INTERNATIONAL LIMITED
CLEARSTREAM BANKING S.A.
COMMERZBANK AG
COMMONWEALTH BANK OF AUSTRALIA
COMMONWEALTH FINANCE CORPORATION LIMITED
COÖPERATIEVE RABOBANK U.A.
CORPORATE FINANCE (D.T.C.) LIMITED
CORPORATION BANK
COUTTS & CO AG
CREDIT AGRICOLE CORPORATE AND INVESTMENT BANK
CREDIT INDUSTRIEL ET COMMERCIAL
CREDIT SUISSE AG
CTBC BANK CO., LTD.
Back to topD

DAH SING BANK, LIMITED
DBS BANK (HONG KONG) LIMITED
DBS BANK LTD.
DEUTSCHE BANK AKTIENGESELLSCHAFT
DOHA BANK Q.S.C.
DUKASCOPY BANK SA
DZ BANK AG DEUTSCHE ZENTRAL-GENOSSENSCHAFTSBANK, FRANKFURT AM MAIN
Back to topE

E.SUN COMMERCIAL BANK, LTD.
EAST WEST BANK
EDMOND DE ROTHSCHILD (SUISSE) S.A.
EFG BANK AG
ERSTE GROUP BANK AG
EUROCLEAR BANK
EXPORT-IMPORT BANK OF CHINA (THE)
Back to topF

FAR EASTERN INTERNATIONAL BANK
FIRST COMMERCIAL BANK, LTD.
FUBON BANK (HONG KONG) LIMITED
FUBON CREDIT (HONG KONG) LIMITED
Back to topG

GOLDMAN SACHS ASIA BANK LIMITED
GUNMA FINANCE (HONG KONG) LIMITED
Back to topH

HABIB BANK A.G. ZURICH
HABIB BANK ZURICH (HONG KONG) LIMITED
HABIB FINANCE INTERNATIONAL LIMITED
HACHIJUNI BANK, LTD. (THE)
HANG SENG BANK, LIMITED
HDFC BANK LIMITED
HENDERSON INTERNATIONAL FINANCE LIMITED
HKCB FINANCE LIMITED
HONG LEONG BANK BERHAD
HONGKONG AND SHANGHAI BANKING CORPORATION LIMITED (THE)
HSBC BANK INTERNATIONAL LIMITED
HSBC BANK PLC
HSBC BANK USA, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION
HSBC PRIVATE BANK (SUISSE) SA
HSH NORDBANK AG
HUA NAN COMMERCIAL BANK, LTD.
HUA XIA BANK CO., LIMITED
Back to topI

ICBC STANDARD BANK PLC
ICICI BANK LIMITED
INDIAN OVERSEAS BANK
INDUSTRIAL AND COMMERCIAL BANK OF CHINA (ASIA) LIMITED
INDUSTRIAL AND COMMERCIAL BANK OF CHINA LIMITED
INDUSTRIAL BANK CO., LTD.
INDUSTRIAL BANK OF KOREA
ING BANK N.V.
INTESA SANPAOLO SPA
INVESTEC BANK LIMITED
IYO BANK, LTD. (THE)
Back to topJ

J.P. MORGAN SECURITIES (ASIA PACIFIC) LIMITED
JAPAN POST BANK CO., LTD.
JIH SUN INTERNATIONAL BANK, LTD.
JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION
JUROKU BANK, LTD. (THE)
Back to topK

KASIKORNBANK PUBLIC COMPANY LIMITED
KBC BANK N.V.
KDB ASIA LIMITED
KEB HANA BANK
KEB HANA GLOBAL FINANCE LIMITED
KEXIM ASIA LIMITED
KOOKMIN BANK
KOOKMIN BANK HONG KONG LIMITED
KOREA DEVELOPMENT BANK (THE)
Back to topL

LAND BANK OF TAIWAN CO., LTD.
LGT BANK AG
Back to topM

MACQUARIE BANK LIMITED
MALAYAN BANKING BERHAD
MANULIFE BANK OF CANADA
MASHREQ BANK - PUBLIC SHAREHOLDING COMPANY
MEGA INTERNATIONAL COMMERCIAL BANK CO., LTD.
MELLI BANK PLC
METROPOLITAN BANK AND TRUST COMPANY
MITSUBISHI UFJ TRUST AND BANKING CORPORATION
MIZUHO BANK, LTD.
MORGAN STANLEY ASIA INTERNATIONAL LIMITED
Back to topN

NANTO BANK, LTD (THE)
NANYANG COMMERCIAL BANK, LIMITED
NATIONAL AUSTRALIA BANK LIMITED
NATIONAL BANK OF ABU DHABI
NATIONAL BANK OF CANADA
NATIONAL BANK OF PAKISTAN
NATIXIS
NIPPON WEALTH LIMITED
NISHI-NIPPON CITY BANK, LTD. (THE)
NORINCHUKIN BANK (THE)
Back to topO

O-BANK CO., LTD.
OCBC WING HANG BANK LIMITED
OITA BANK, LTD. (THE)
ORIX ASIA LIMITED
OVERSEA-CHINESE BANKING CORPORATION LIMITED
Back to topP

P.T. BANK CENTRAL ASIA
P.T. BANK RAKYAT INDONESIA (PERSERO)
PHILIPPINE NATIONAL BANK
PICTET & CIE (EUROPE) S.A.
PING AN BANK CO., LTD.
PT. BANK MANDIRI (PERSERO) TBK
PT. BANK NEGARA INDONESIA (PERSERO) TBK.
PUBLIC BANK (HONG KONG) LIMITED
PUBLIC FINANCE LIMITED
PUNJAB NATIONAL BANK
Back to topR

RBC INVESTOR SERVICES BANK S.A.
RESONA BANK, LIMITED
ROTHSCHILD BANK AG
ROYAL BANK OF CANADA
ROYAL BANK OF SCOTLAND N.V. (THE)
ROYAL BANK OF SCOTLAND PUBLIC LIMITED COMPANY (THE)
Back to topS

SCHRODER & CO BANK AG
SCOTIABANK (HONG KONG) LIMITED
SHANGHAI COMMERCIAL & SAVINGS BANK, LTD. (THE)
SHANGHAI COMMERCIAL BANK LIMITED
SHANGHAI PUDONG DEVELOPMENT BANK CO., LTD.
SHIGA BANK, LTD. (THE)
SHINHAN ASIA LIMITED
SHINHAN BANK
SHINKIN CENTRAL BANK
SHIZUOKA BANK, LTD. (THE)
SHOKO CHUKIN BANK, LTD. (THE)
SIAM COMMERCIAL BANK PUBLIC COMPANY LIMITED (THE)
SILICON VALLEY BANK
SKANDINAVISKA ENSKILDA BANKEN AB
SOCIETE GENERALE
SOCIETE GENERALE ASIA LIMITED
STANDARD BANK OF SOUTH AFRICA LIMITED (THE)
STANDARD CHARTERED BANK
STANDARD CHARTERED BANK (HONG KONG) LIMITED
STATE BANK OF INDIA
STATE STREET BANK AND TRUST COMPANY
SUMITOMO MITSUI BANKING CORPORATION
SUMITOMO MITSUI TRUST BANK, LIMITED
SVENSKA HANDELSBANKEN AB (PUBL)
SWISSQUOTE BANK SA
Back to topT

TA CHONG BANK, LTD.
TAI SANG BANK LIMITED
TAI YAU BANK, LIMITED
TAIPEI FUBON COMMERCIAL BANK CO., LTD.
TAISHIN INTERNATIONAL BANK CO., LTD
TAIWAN BUSINESS BANK
TAIWAN COOPERATIVE BANK, LTD.
TAIWAN SHIN KONG COMMERCIAL BANK CO., LTD.
TORONTO-DOMINION BANK
Back to topU

UBS AG
UCO BANK
UNICREDIT BANK AG
UNION BANCAIRE PRIVÉE, UBP SA
UNION BANK OF INDIA
UNION BANK OF TAIWAN
UNIONE DI BANCHE ITALIANE S.P.A.
UNITED OVERSEAS BANK LTD.
Back to topV

VIETNAM FINANCE COMPANY LIMITED
VP BANK LTD
Back to topW

WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION
WESTPAC BANKING CORPORATION
WING LUNG BANK LIMITED
WOORI BANK
WOORI GLOBAL MARKETS ASIA LIMITED
Back to topY

YAMAGUCHI BANK, LTD. (THE)
YAMANASHI CHUO BANK, LTD.
YUANTA COMMERCIAL BANK CO., LTD
Back to top 



Accessibility



















You've gotta be kidding. THIS is retaliation? | Employment & Labor Insider







































































Employment & Labor Insider


Legalese is not spoken here 


Home
Our Firm
Our Services
Contact
 




 



Home > Retaliation > You’ve gotta be kidding. THIS is retaliation?


You’ve gotta be kidding. THIS is retaliation?
 By Robin Shea on January 16, 2015 Posted in Retaliation


Guess what? You know those SEC disclosures about pending litigation that publicly held companies are required by law to make? Well, if an employer says too much, it may be “retaliating” against the litigants.
“What you talkin’ ’bout?”
I am not making this up. International Monetary Systems, Ltd., is facing a jury trial on a retaliation claim made by a former employee. The company is going to trial because it listed the plaintiff by name on the disclosures that it was required to file by the Securities and Exchange Commission. The IMS disclosures named the plaintiff (then a charging party), and said that her EEOC charge was “meritless” and that the company “would vigorously defend.”
Plaintiff Celia Greengrass, now a real estate agent in Albuquerque, worked as an account executive for IMS in 2007 and made an internal complaint about alleged harassment by a manager. Not long after this, she quit, and she filed a charge with the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission alleging sex and national origin discrimination, and retaliation.
In March 2008, about two months after Ms. Greengrass filed her EEOC charge, the company was due to make its annual SEC filings, which require disclosure of “any material legal proceedings, including the principal parties, facts giving rise to the proceeding, and the relief sought.” (Emphasis is mine.) The chief financial officer consulted with an outside firm about whether to disclose Ms. Greengrass’s charge. Details of the consultation are not included in the court’s opinion, but the company did not disclose the charge at all, presumably because it was not thought at that time to be “material.” The company’s quarterly SEC disclosures filed for periods ending March 31 and June 30, 2008, disclosed pending matters but did not identify any parties.
Then, in July 2008, the EEOC made a follow-up request for information related to Ms. Greengrass’s complaint, and the company’s general counsel sent an email to several executives expressing concern about the EEOC’s request and how it might require the company to disclose information about other harassment complaints. (It’s not clear from any of the court decisions why this email was produced despite the fact that it should have been attorney-client privileged. But anyway.)
The company made another SEC disclosure for the period ending September 30, 2008 – after the EEOC’s follow-up request and after the general counsel’s email – and again did not disclose Ms. Greengrass’s identity.
In January 2009, the EEOC asked to conduct interviews in connection with Ms. Greengrass’s charge. The next SEC filing was due April 6, 2009. This time, the company identified everyone who had a pending charge or lawsuit. With respect to Ms. Greengrass, the disclosure stated as follows: “On January 20, 2008, Celia Greengrass filed a sexual harassment complaint with the [EEOC]. The claim is still under investigation by the EEOC but IMS believes the claims to be meritless and will vigorously defend itself.” Another similar disclosure was made in May 2009. After the May 2009 filing, IMS stopped identifying litigants by name.
In September 2009, the EEOC found reasonable cause in connection with Ms. Greengrass’s charge, and the charge was settled in conciliation. The company’s annual SEC filing for 2009 said that the charge had been settled but did not identify Ms. Greengrass or anyone else by name.
Ms. Greengrass was unable to get another job, so she filed another EEOC charge against IMS, this time alleging that IMS retaliated against her by naming her in the 2009 SEC filings. She alleged that the SEC filing came up whenever she Googled her name (NOTE TO READERS – I tried it, and I got the same result – see screen shot below) and alleged that a recruiter told her that she was unemployable because of the SEC filing. The EEOC found cause, and after getting a right-to-sue letter, Ms. Greengrass filed suit in federal court in Wisconsin. The court granted summary judgment to IMS. But Ms. Greengrass took it up to the Seventh Circuit*, where a three-judge panel reversed this week and said she was entitled to a jury trial.
*The Seventh Circuit hears appeals from federal courts in Illinois, Indiana, and Wisconsin.
(Click to enlarge.) My Google search of Celia Greengrass. The SEC filings came up, but so did the court decisions in her lawsuit. Streisand effect?
So, unless IMS gets the decision vacated on review by the full Seventh Circuit (and I hope IMS will try), the case will go to trial.
Does this meet the legal standard for a retaliation claim?
A retaliation claim requires (1) protected activity, (2) adverse employment action, and (3) a “causal connection” between the protected activity and the adverse action. Everyone agrees that Ms. Greengrass engaged in protected activity by filing her original EEOC charge (and making her internal complaint, as well). The Seventh Circuit found, and the district court assumed, that the public disclosure of Ms. Greengrass’s charge and her resulting inability to get another job was an “adverse employment action.” But the district court found there was no reason to believe that IMS made the disclosure “because of” Ms. Greengrass’s EEOC charge. The Seventh Circuit panel, on the other hand, believed that there was enough evidence of causation to send the case to a jury.
The appeals panel found that the timing was suspicious because the disclosure was made after the EEOC had indicated that it was ramping up the investigation. (Although the court seems to have missed the fact that the “ramping up” had actually occurred much earlier and that the first SEC filing afterward did not identify Ms. Greengrass.)
The court also found that the general counsel’s email (which should never have been disclosed in the first place) “evinc[ed] disdain for the EEOC process and animus against Greengrass for filing her complaint.” The court also took into account communications that were made when Ms. Greengrass’s original internal harassment complaint was made — two years before the SEC disclosure.
Finally, the court found that IMS’s flip-flopping on whether to disclose litigants by name was evidence of pretext, even though the company said the flip-flopping was because of conflicting advice it had received from “auditors and others.” (The lower court opinion notes that a CPA/Risk Management employee at IMS expressed concern about disclosing the detailed information, which resulted in the change back to leaving the names off. The appeals court doesn’t mention this.)
“Who needs this? I’m outta here.”
Editorial comment: This is the kind of thing that makes American companies want to move to the Cayman Islands. IMS was arguably damned if it didn’t (by the SEC), and damned if it did (by the EEOC). An employer that is trying in good faith to comply with complex and potentially conflicting regulatory schemes should not have to go to trial for retaliation if it “over-complies” – especially when the regulation in question says that “the principal parties” have to be disclosed.  I don’t know enough about SEC regulations to even be dangerous, but I am sure that they are open to a good deal of interpretation, and that what a company ought to disclose will often depend on whom it’s asking, what day of the week it is, and what the weather is like. (A lot like consulting with two or more lawyers on the same question.) I hope that IMS will get a rehearing and a better result next time.
But meanwhile, employers should consider themselves warned:
Lesson 1: Yes, you can be liable for retaliation against someone who doesn’t even work for you any more. This issue has been settled since the 1990s. So be careful about the way you treat ex-employees as well as current employees.
Lesson 2: Whenever you are required to disclose pending litigation or administrative charges, avoid saying anything more than absolutely necessary. And be consistent.
Lesson 3: If you decide that you should change your past practice, be sure you have thoroughly documented the reason for the change, the date of the consultation in which the change was recommended, and the name of the auditor or consultant who advised you to make the change. In other words, make sure you have plenty of evidence that your decision to make a change was based on nothing other than your adviser’s opinion about what the law required you to do.
Lesson 4: Who knew? It’s now retaliatory to say that a legal action filed against an employer is “meritless” and that it “will vigorously defend”?
Rant over. Am I off base? Your comments are much appreciated!
 
. . . AND ALSO OF INTEREST . . . 
*Don’t delay on those H-1B applications! ‘Tis the season, as Will Krasnow of our Boston Office reminds us.
*And do sign up for Cara Crotty’s webinar on the new Section 503 and VEVRAA requirements! 1-2 p.m. Eastern, Wednesday, February 4.
Image Credits: Except for my Google screen shot, all images from flickr, Creative Commons license: Publicity photo of Gary Coleman and Shavon Ross of Diff’rent Strokes posted by Shavon Ross; photo of Seven Mile Beach in Cayman Islands by James Willamor.










Alex



This article is so pro employer that it makes me puke and has no legal standing and worse yet is idiotic advise. IMS was sued because it maliciously ruined the prior employees’ chances to seek employment.
IMS conduct throughout the sexual harassment complaint process was one of retaliation and humiliation of the complainant and in the end IMS wanted to retaliate against the complainant in revenge for the complaint and the settlement.
Typically I see this conduct in federal agencies but this is one is new because it comes from a corporation.
Well done complainant.
IMS should be ashamed of itself.
By the way IMS blames its attorneys and other counsel for bad advice. Lets get this clear the defendant and the plaintiff are always responsible for their conduct whether it failed to take action or whether it took the wrong action… is all IMS.
By the way I am not an attorney but common sense tells me that this article is biased and idiotic, somewhat deceivingly cute but misguided.






InsiderBlog



Thanks for writing, Alex. The thing about the sexual harassment claim is that it was settled. All the company did here was list the pending charge in its SEC filing, as it was required to do by law. That is the problem that I have with the court’s decision.






Alex



Thanks for your response but I disagree that IMS had to disclose the complainant’s name in the manner that it did through an SEC filing. Normally when there is a settlement agreement the only way that allows disclosure is through a court order. I betcha a dime and a nickel that the settlement agreement did not allow for disclosure unless there was a court order and in this case I saw no evidence of a court order to disclose the complainant’s name, specially in the manner that IMS did with malice aforethought for they had to know or should have known about the adverse actions their disclosure predicated that adversely affected the complainant’s potential for seeking employment. IMS damaged the complainant twice (1) sexual harassment and (2) retaliation so now it has to pay again… however you seem to be stuck on the SEC filing without looking at the whole picture and the damages to the complainant. SEC filing cannot stand alone… IMS cannot hide behind the SEC filing…. even a normal discovery filing does not protects IMS… it has to be a court order where the complainant also has the right to object..






Ih8lwyrs



You’re not a lawyer, but you claim to know all these things! How arrogant!






Christa



IMHO, the problem was that they stated in a public document that the charge was “meritless”. And that statement, is tied to her name. I wouldn’t want to have “meritless charge” tied with my name.






InsiderBlog



But, Christa, if you were an employer, how would you feel about a public document saying that you “discriminated and retaliated” against your employees? Doesn’t the employer have a right to defend itself, too?
Thanks, Robin






Frankie



I agree with the author on this one – all the way!






InsiderBlog



Frankie, thank you for the validation! :-) Robin










About Us Robin Shea has more than 20 years' experience in employment litigation, including Title VII and the Age Discrimination in Employment Act, the Americans with Disabilities Act (including the Amendments Act). 
Continue Reading
Stay Connected

Subscribe to this blog via RSS
Join the Discussion on Facebook
Connect with Robin on LinkedIn
Follow Constangy on Twitter
Follow Robin on Twitter



Subscribe to this blog by email


Your website url









Topics 
ABA Blawg 100

Affirmative Action

Affordable Care Act

Alternative Dispute Resolution

Americans with Disabilities Act

Background Checks

Benefits

Blacklisting

California FEHA

Civil Procedure

Class actions

Constangy News

ConstangyTV

Contingent Workers

Corporate Culture

Data Privacy

Defamation

Discrimination

Documentation

Domestic Violence

Drug Testing

eLaw

Elections

Employment at Will

Employment Law Blog Carnival

ENDA

Equal Pay

ERISA

Evidence

Family and Medical Leave Act

First Amendment

FOCUS

Franchise

Gender Identity Discrimination

Genetic Information Non-Discrimination Act

GINA

Harassment

HIPAA Privacy

HR

Immigration

Independent Contractor

Labor Relations

Labor Trafficking

Lactation

Lawyers!

Military

Misconduct

Non-Competes

Non-Competition

Off-Duty Conduct

Older Workers' Benefit Protection Act

Only in California

Paid Leave

Politics

Pregnancy

Product Review

Protected Concerted Activity

Public Sector Employment

Reference

Retaliation

Safety

Same-sex marriage

Sarbanes-Oxley

Settlements

Sexual Orientation

Sexual Torts

Social media

Telecommuting

Transportation Industry

Uncategorized

Unemployment

USERRA

Violence

Wage-Hour

WARN

Work-Life Balance

Workers' Compensation

Wrongful Discharge


Archives Archives

Select Month
 August 2017 
 July 2017 
 June 2017 
 May 2017 
 April 2017 
 March 2017 
 February 2017 
 January 2017 
 December 2016 
 November 2016 
 October 2016 
 September 2016 
 August 2016 
 July 2016 
 June 2016 
 May 2016 
 April 2016 
 March 2016 
 February 2016 
 January 2016 
 December 2015 
 November 2015 
 October 2015 
 September 2015 
 August 2015 
 July 2015 
 June 2015 
 May 2015 
 April 2015 
 March 2015 
 February 2015 
 January 2015 
 December 2014 
 November 2014 
 October 2014 
 September 2014 
 August 2014 
 July 2014 
 June 2014 
 May 2014 
 April 2014 
 March 2014 
 February 2014 
 January 2014 
 December 2013 
 November 2013 
 October 2013 
 September 2013 
 August 2013 
 July 2013 
 June 2013 
 May 2013 
 April 2013 
 March 2013 
 February 2013 
 January 2013 
 December 2012 
 November 2012 
 October 2012 
 September 2012 
 August 2012 
 July 2012 
 June 2012 
 May 2012 
 April 2012 
 March 2012 
 February 2012 
 January 2012 
 December 2011 
 November 2011 
 October 2011 
 September 2011 
 August 2011 
 July 2011 
 June 2011 
 May 2011 
 April 2011 
 March 2011 
 February 2011 
 January 2011 
 December 2010 
 November 2010 
 October 2010 

  Recent Updates 

Kaplan confirmed to NLRB – we now have an “R-D” tie


DOL will coordinate VETS-4212 with new EEO-1 reporting requirements (as much as it can).


President Trump nominates Iraq veteran Daniel Gade to EEOC Commissioner spot


Please vote for us for the ABA Web 100: Reason #20


Please vote for us for the ABA Web 100: Reason #19


 Blogs

Ann Althouse
Employee Benefits Unplugged
Evil HR Lady
FOCUS
Overlawyered.com
SCOTUS Blog
Wall Street Journal Law Blog


Links

Constangy, Brooks & Smith, LLP
National Labor Relations Board
Occupational Safety and Health Administration
Society for Human Resources Management
U.S. Chamber of Commerce
U.S. Department of Labor
U.S. Equal Employment Opportunity Commission
U.S. Supreme Court
Wall Street Journal




 Copyright © 2017, Constangy, Brooks, Smith & Prophete, LLP. All Rights Reserved.
 Strategy, design, marketing & support by LexBlog
 






















Barter - Company Overview - IMS Barter Trade Exchange Network - It’s Barter, just much bigger and way better

































Skip to navigation


Skip to content






 












Franchise 


Corporate 





Join Today



Sign In







Username

Password



Remember me

Sign in
Register






Forgot your password?








Contact Us





800.559.8515


800.559.8515


email: go-ims@imsbarter.com



View Complete IMS Office Contact Map


Follow Us!


















Serving Business Communities for over 31 years











Home


Save Cash



Attract New Customers




Increase Sales




Learn More




See How IMS Works


Save Cash Everyday


Shop with Trade


Attract New Customers


Sales and Marketing Team


Increase Sales on Trade


Everyday Selling Price


What are Trade Dollars?


Online IMS Account


Join IMS Barter


About IMS Barter


Affiliations




More Information


IMS in the News


Bloomberg Television


New York Times


CNN Money


CBS


Crains New York


AOL News


Corp Magazine


Business Journal


Crain's Chicago Business


Chattanooga Times Free Press


BizTimes.com


Columbus Dispatch


PMQ Magazine


Hartford Business Journal


Buyer Interactive


Optometry Times


Stamford Times


Business Image Magazine


Patriot Ledger


Fresh Cup Magazine


QSR Magazine


Meetings Net


Vows Magazine


Fox Business Network


CNBC


WCBS New York City


WCBS New York City - 2


KLAS Las Vegas


Fox Business - Neil Cavuto


CBS Evening News


KVTN Reno


Antique Week


Plumbing & Mechanical


Fox 6 Milwaukee


Daily Herald


Indianapolis Woman


ACDIS


Medical Office Today


GoPlow.com


American Business Magazine


Life Reimagined


SmallBizClub


Retail Merchandiser


Ground Report


Cleaning & Maintenance Management Online


Small Business Digest


TD Monthly


Entrepreneur Magazine




IMS Barter Million Dollar Club





Try It




Member Directory


Marketplace


Travel
















Company Overview








International Monetary Systems, Ltd.



Founded in 1985, International Monetary Systems (IMS) serves over
16,000
businesses and professional people representing
23,000
cardholders in
53
U.S. markets. The IMS network enables companies to acquire new business,
create cost savings, and improve operations by taking advantage of barter opportunities in their business models. Based in New Berlin, WI and
managed by seasoned industry veterans, IMS is one of the largest publicly traded barter companies in the world and is continually expanding its
network by adding exchange locations.  The company's proprietary transaction software, Trade Network Tracking System (TNT), enables businesses
and individuals to trade goods and services throughout North America online using an electronic currency known as trade dollars.



History



Since its inception in 1985, IMS has continued to expand its membership roster by way of acquisitions and a strong program of internal growth.
As a result, the company now serves a client base of more than
16,000
business and professional people. By exhibiting a high level of integrity and solid reliability, International Monetary Systems has earned a great degree of respect
and has developed a reputation as a dominant player in the barter industry.


IMS' participation in nationwide trade organizations such as the National Association of Trade Exchanges (NATE), the Barter Association National Currency (The BANC),
as well as the International Reciprocal Trade Association (IRTA) and Universal Currency (UC). IMS offers its members the opportunity to market their goods and services
not only in the IMS network, but across North America.


In today's fast-paced business environment, convenience and simplicity are crucial. International Monetary Systems provides its members with BarterBuy/E-mail promotions,
monthly statements, 24-hour authorization service, and IMS' exclusive online, internet trading. In addition, each account is assigned a seasoned trade broker who acts as that
company's personal sales and purchasing representative.








CIK Number



0001097430



Transfer Agent



Registrar and Transfer Company

10 Commerce Dr

Cranford, NJ  07016

Phone: (800) 456-0596 x2502





Auditor



LBB & Associates Ltd., LLP

Houston, TX



In House Counsel



Martin Sklapsky

16901 Glendale Dr

New Berlin, WI 53151

Phone: (262) 780-3640 x1218









Investor Relations




Company Overview


ManagementCorporate Governance


Corporate Profile


News & Media


Annual Reports


SEC Filings


Contact Info













Site Map


Privacy Policy


Terms of Use


Rules and Regulations


Logos



International Monetary Systems, Ltd. copyright © 2002-2017























x


Attention






















Retaliation | Employment & Labor Insider












































Employment & Labor Insider


Legalese is not spoken here 


Home
Our Firm
Our Services
Contact
 




 





Category Archives: Retaliation 
Subscribe to Retaliation RSS Feed 




Litigation tactics can be FLSA retaliation? Wow.
 By Robin Shea on June 30, 2017 Posted in Immigration, Lawyers!, Retaliation, Wage-Hour

Can an outside attorney defending an employer in a lawsuit under the Fair Labor Standards Act be liable for retaliation against the plaintiff-employee based on litigation tactics? One court answered that question “yes” last week. Are these judges crazy? You decide. In Arias v. Raimondo, a three-judge panel of the U.S. Court of Appeals for the Ninth Circuit… Continue Reading





10 habits of highly effective HR professionals (April Fool’s edition)
 By Robin Shea on March 31, 2017 Posted in Americans with Disabilities Act, Corporate Culture, Discrimination, Elections, Employment at Will, Equal Pay, Family and Medical Leave Act, Harassment, HR, Labor Relations, Politics, Protected Concerted Activity, Retaliation, Safety, Wage-Hour, Workers' Compensation

DEAR READERS: Before you accuse me of legal malpractice, take a look at tomorrow’s date.   Habit 1: Discriminate, retaliate, harass — have a ball! There’s a new sheriff in town, with a more employer-friendly, compliance-assistance-oriented U.S. Department of Labor (we think) and the nullification of burdensome regulations like the gone-and-not-lamented Fair Pay and Safe Workplaces Rule.… Continue Reading





That smarts! Porn “sting” operation gets employer “stung” for retaliation
 By Robin Shea on February 17, 2017 Posted in Retaliation

This should have been an open-and-shut case. For the employer, that is, not the employee. Lufkin Industries, Inc., had an employee, William Fisher, who was a 55-year-old African-American. One day, Mr. Fisher got into a verbal tiff with his 31-year-old white supervisor, and the supervisor called him “Boy.” Mr. Fisher was offended and complained to… Continue Reading






An FMLA cautionary tale for employers.
 By Robin Shea on February 3, 2017 Posted in Family and Medical Leave Act, Retaliation, Wage-Hour

A jury socked it to a Wisconsin employer last year in a Family and Medical Leave Act case, and the U.S. Court of Appeals for the Seventh Circuit recently affirmed. Well, I take that back. The Seventh Circuit didn’t affirm completely — no, it ordered the trial court to give the plaintiff more in attorneys’ fees… Continue Reading





DOL’s new online tool may result in more OFCCP complaints
 By Cara Crotty on November 16, 2016 Posted in Affirmative Action, Discrimination, Labor Relations, Retaliation, Safety, Wage-Hour

The U.S. Department of Labor recently rolled out www.worker.gov, an online tool designed to help employees file various types of complaints against their employers. The White House announced that the website will assist individuals “if they have had wages stolen, been injured on the job, faced discrimination, or been retaliated against for joining together to… Continue Reading





Enforcement date of OSHA rule delayed again — until December 1
 By Tommy Eden on October 20, 2016 Posted in Drug Testing, Retaliation, Safety, Workers' Compensation

The Occupational Safety and Health Administration has delayed for a second time the enforcement date of its new “Reasonable Reporting Procedure” rule as it pertains to post-accident drug testing and safety incentive programs. The new enforcement date for the rule is December 1. The rule was scheduled to take effect on August 10, and then OSHA extended… Continue Reading






EEOC Small Business Resource Center: Two thumbs up!
 By Robin Shea on September 29, 2016 Posted in Discrimination, Equal Pay, Gender Identity Discrimination, Genetic Information Non-Discrimination Act, GINA, Harassment, Pregnancy, Product Review, Retaliation, Sexual Orientation

I spent some time yesterday at the new Small Business Resource Center, which went live this week on the website of the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission. I think it’s great. Small businesses, which may be just below or at the cusp of coverage by federal anti-discrimination laws, are often confused about (1) whether they are covered, and (2)… Continue Reading





How to make the EEOC love you (retaliation edition)
 By Robin Shea on September 2, 2016 Posted in Retaliation

Employers, imagine that a retaliation charge has been filed against your company. What can you do to make the EEOC investigator love you? Late last week, the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission issued its final Enforcement Guidance on Retaliation and Related Issues, accompanied by a Q&A, and a Small Business Fact Sheet. I had three fairly detailed… Continue Reading





About that new “cat’s paw” decision . . .
 By Robin Shea on September 2, 2016 Posted in Discrimination, Harassment, Misconduct, Retaliation, USERRA

Employers should beware of being too quick to believe an employee who accuses a co-worker of wrongdoing. If the accuser has an illegal motive (such as discrimination or retaliation), and if the employer is “negligent” in investigating before taking action against the co-worker, then the employer could be legally responsible. So says the U.S. Court of Appeals… Continue Reading






Light reading for your Fourth of July weekend
 By Robin Shea on July 1, 2016 Posted in Constangy News, Discrimination, Drug Testing, FOCUS, Gender Identity Discrimination, Labor Relations, Lawyers!, Retaliation, Safety

Well, maybe not light reading, but good reading about good news that you won’t want to miss! Here are our bulletins and other publications from the last week, in case you missed them: *Heather Owen is already shooting off Fourth of July fireworks at the FOCUS women’s leadership blog because our firm was named this week by the National… Continue Reading





25 quick takes (no kidding!) on the EEOC’s proposed national origin guidance
 By Robin Shea on June 3, 2016 Posted in Discrimination, Harassment, Retaliation

These will be really quick takes, since there are so many of them, on the proposed Enforcement Guidance on National Origin Discrimination issued this week by the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission. (The actual document is 57 pages long, not counting the table of contents.) I’ll try to focus on the less obvious/more interesting points. Take No.… Continue Reading





Is your company small? The EEOC has a little fact sheet that may help.
 By Robin Shea on March 11, 2016 Posted in Discrimination, Harassment, Retaliation

The Equal Employment Opportunity Commission released a nice little “fact sheet” this week for small businesses, summarizing their obligations under the laws that the EEOC enforces. Here’s a link. Just be aware that “sex,” in the EEOC’s opinion, includes sexual orientation and gender identity. (No jokes about small hands or “little” presidential candidates.)… Continue Reading






EEOC Retaliation Guidance, Part 3: A “causal connection” checklist for employers
 By Robin Shea on February 12, 2016 Posted in Retaliation

This is the final installment of my analysis of the EEOC’s recently issued proposed Enforcement Guidance on Retaliation and Related Issues. Here are Part One (“You gotta be protected!”) and Part Two (“Was your employment action ‘adverse’?”). For an employee to have a valid retaliation claim, it’s not enough that she engaged in legally protected activity or… Continue Reading





EEOC Retaliation Guidance, Part 2: Was your employment action “adverse”?
 By Robin Shea on February 5, 2016 Posted in Retaliation

What’s a “materially adverse employment action”? This is the second part in what should be a three-part series (it’s possible that we’ll need four) on the proposed Enforcement Guidance on Retaliation and Related Issues recently published by the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission. To recap from last week, a plaintiff in a retaliation case has to prove three things:… Continue Reading





EEOC Retaliation Guidance, Part 1: You gotta be “protected”!
 By Robin Shea on January 29, 2016 Posted in Retaliation

The Equal Employment Opportunity Commission issued last week a proposed Enforcement Guidance on Retaliation and Related Issues that would update guidance issued in 1998. If you’re an in-house attorney or a Human Resources professional, I recommend that you read the whole thing. But to keep things digestible on this blog, I’m going to do a series of… Continue Reading






Who was naughty, and who was nice in employment law this year
 By Robin Shea on December 23, 2015 Posted in Affordable Care Act, Americans with Disabilities Act, Discrimination, Genetic Information Non-Discrimination Act, GINA, Harassment, Labor Relations, Lawyers!, Pregnancy, Protected Concerted Activity, Retaliation, Safety, Social media, Telecommuting, Wage-Hour

Who’s been naughty and who’s been nice in labor and employment law? Here are my picks for 2015. Feel free to add your own in the comments. NAUGHTY! The National Labor Relations Board, for being naughty in too many ways to mention. Its rules on employer handbook policies, including confidentiality and social media, are unrealistic… Continue Reading





Two new high-profile employment suits that you’ll want to watch
 By Robin Shea on December 11, 2015 Posted in Americans with Disabilities Act, Defamation, Discrimination, Employment at Will, Retaliation

We have not one, but two new high-profile employment lawsuits that are worth following long-term: Former head football coach Steve Sarkisian’s alcoholism-discrimination lawsuit against the University of Southern California, and the wrongful termination lawsuit filed against the Michigan House of Representatives by former aides to adulterous former legislators Todd Courser (resigned) and Cindy Gamrat (expelled). Full “scorecards” appear… Continue Reading





Trojan travails: Coach Sarkisian’s alcoholism-discrimination lawsuit against USC
 By Robin Shea on December 11, 2015 Posted in Americans with Disabilities Act, California FEHA, Discrimination, Retaliation

Readers have been clamoring for my take on the alcoholism-discrimination lawsuit filed by Steve Sarkisian against the University of Southern California. Actually, I got one email from a reader, who had a better take on the whole situation than I do. But who cares! I still think it’s a great topic, and a case worth following! Here’s the deal,… Continue Reading






As the rotunda turns . . . affair, coverup, retaliation — and lawsuit against state House
 By Robin Shea on December 11, 2015 Posted in Defamation, Employment at Will, Retaliation

Holy Toledo! (Or should I say, Lansing?) Here is our next celebrity employment lawsuit soap opera . . . You may have heard about the two Tea Party legislators in Michigan who were having an affair, engaged in a bizarre cover-up that failed, had to resign/were expelled, and then lost their election bids to get their seats… Continue Reading





Be thankful you’re not an employment law turkey
 By Robin Shea on November 25, 2015 Posted in Discrimination, Harassment, Pregnancy, Retaliation, Social media, Work-Life Balance

Well, it’s that time of year again – what are you thankful for? Here are some Human Resources and employment law matters for which I am thankful. Please feel free to add your own in the comments. I’m thankful that I’m not Trey Gowdy. The Republican Congressman from South Carolina and chair of the House Benghazi Committee is not out, but he’s… Continue Reading





BEFORE YOU SUE: 10 questions every employee should ask
 By Robin Shea on November 20, 2015 Posted in Class actions, Discrimination, Employment at Will, Evidence, Harassment, Retaliation

Last week, we talked about 20 things an employer should ask itself before terminating an employee. In the interests of fairness, here are 10 things that an employee should ask before suing an employer. You should know that I generally don’t believe that lawsuits are the best way to resolve problems. (I realize that there are exceptions.)… Continue Reading






BEFORE YOU FIRE: 20 questions every employer should ask
 By Robin Shea on November 13, 2015 Posted in Americans with Disabilities Act, Discrimination, Employment at Will, Evidence, Family and Medical Leave Act, Harassment, Labor Relations, Protected Concerted Activity, Retaliation, Safety, Settlements, Unemployment, Workers' Compensation

So you think you’re ready to terminate an employee. Are you really? Here are 20 questions that every employer should ask itself before going ahead with a termination. If you think I’ve missed anything, please feel free to add your own in the comments. GETTING STARTED No. 1. Is the employee covered by a collective bargaining agreement?… Continue Reading





Straight from the source: EEOC’s 10 hottest litigation trends
 By Robin Shea on October 30, 2015 Posted in Americans with Disabilities Act, Background Checks, Class actions, Discrimination, Harassment, Pregnancy, Retaliation, Settlements, Telecommuting

Last week I heard David Lopez, General Counsel of the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission, speak about EEOC litigation developments at the annual North Carolina/South Carolina Labor and Employment Law conference. The EEOC has been litigating like a house afire, so I knew you would want to hear what he had to say. Mr. Lopez – who… Continue Reading





Is protected activity part of your job? You may still be protected.
 By Robin Shea on August 14, 2015 Posted in Retaliation

If you try to prevent or end workplace discrimination as part of your job, is it legal for your employer retaliate against you? Inquiring HR professionals, in-house lawyers, and counselors want to know! The U.S. Court of Appeals for the Third Fourth Circuit says no – Title VII’s anti-retaliation protections apply to you, too. In a very… Continue Reading






About Us Robin Shea has more than 20 years' experience in employment litigation, including Title VII and the Age Discrimination in Employment Act, the Americans with Disabilities Act (including the Amendments Act). 
Continue Reading
Stay Connected

Subscribe to this blog via RSS
Join the Discussion on Facebook
Connect with Robin on LinkedIn
Follow Constangy on Twitter
Follow Robin on Twitter



Subscribe to this blog by email


Your website url









Topics 
ABA Blawg 100

Affirmative Action

Affordable Care Act

Alternative Dispute Resolution

Americans with Disabilities Act

Background Checks

Benefits

Blacklisting

California FEHA

Civil Procedure

Class actions

Constangy News

ConstangyTV

Contingent Workers

Corporate Culture

Data Privacy

Defamation

Discrimination

Documentation

Domestic Violence

Drug Testing

eLaw

Elections

Employment at Will

Employment Law Blog Carnival

ENDA

Equal Pay

ERISA

Evidence

Family and Medical Leave Act

First Amendment

FOCUS

Franchise

Gender Identity Discrimination

Genetic Information Non-Discrimination Act

GINA

Harassment

HIPAA Privacy

HR

Immigration

Independent Contractor

Labor Relations

Labor Trafficking

Lactation

Lawyers!

Military

Misconduct

Non-Competes

Non-Competition

Off-Duty Conduct

Older Workers' Benefit Protection Act

Only in California

Paid Leave

Politics

Pregnancy

Product Review

Protected Concerted Activity

Public Sector Employment

Reference

Retaliation

Safety

Same-sex marriage

Sarbanes-Oxley

Settlements

Sexual Orientation

Sexual Torts

Social media

Telecommuting

Transportation Industry

Uncategorized

Unemployment

USERRA

Violence

Wage-Hour

WARN

Work-Life Balance

Workers' Compensation

Wrongful Discharge


Archives Archives

Select Month
 August 2017 
 July 2017 
 June 2017 
 May 2017 
 April 2017 
 March 2017 
 February 2017 
 January 2017 
 December 2016 
 November 2016 
 October 2016 
 September 2016 
 August 2016 
 July 2016 
 June 2016 
 May 2016 
 April 2016 
 March 2016 
 February 2016 
 January 2016 
 December 2015 
 November 2015 
 October 2015 
 September 2015 
 August 2015 
 July 2015 
 June 2015 
 May 2015 
 April 2015 
 March 2015 
 February 2015 
 January 2015 
 December 2014 
 November 2014 
 October 2014 
 September 2014 
 August 2014 
 July 2014 
 June 2014 
 May 2014 
 April 2014 
 March 2014 
 February 2014 
 January 2014 
 December 2013 
 November 2013 
 October 2013 
 September 2013 
 August 2013 
 July 2013 
 June 2013 
 May 2013 
 April 2013 
 March 2013 
 February 2013 
 January 2013 
 December 2012 
 November 2012 
 October 2012 
 September 2012 
 August 2012 
 July 2012 
 June 2012 
 May 2012 
 April 2012 
 March 2012 
 February 2012 
 January 2012 
 December 2011 
 November 2011 
 October 2011 
 September 2011 
 August 2011 
 July 2011 
 June 2011 
 May 2011 
 April 2011 
 March 2011 
 February 2011 
 January 2011 
 December 2010 
 November 2010 
 October 2010 

  Recent Updates 

Kaplan confirmed to NLRB – we now have an “R-D” tie


DOL will coordinate VETS-4212 with new EEO-1 reporting requirements (as much as it can).


President Trump nominates Iraq veteran Daniel Gade to EEOC Commissioner spot


Please vote for us for the ABA Web 100: Reason #20


Please vote for us for the ABA Web 100: Reason #19


 Blogs

Ann Althouse
Employee Benefits Unplugged
Evil HR Lady
FOCUS
Overlawyered.com
SCOTUS Blog
Wall Street Journal Law Blog


Links

Constangy, Brooks & Smith, LLP
National Labor Relations Board
Occupational Safety and Health Administration
Society for Human Resources Management
U.S. Chamber of Commerce
U.S. Department of Labor
U.S. Equal Employment Opportunity Commission
U.S. Supreme Court
Wall Street Journal




 Copyright © 2017, Constangy, Brooks, Smith & Prophete, LLP. All Rights Reserved.
 Strategy, design, marketing & support by LexBlog
 



















IMF -- International Monetary Fund Home Page




























































  ﻿

WATCH LIVEGlobal Economic Challenges: A Conversation with Christine Lagarde


















Send us your feedback















A Common Cause for Sustainable Growth and Stability in Central Africa

Six countries in Central Africa are in dire economic and financial shape, and have a common strategy to turn their economies around with help from the IMF.





For Japan's Economy, Now Is the Time to Step Up Reforms

Japan’s economy is expected to grow again this year—at 1.3 percent—thanks to a continued pickup in trade and temporary fiscal support. But a rapidly aging population and a shrinking workforce mean that the country will need to speed up reforms to boost wages, productivity, and growth, said the IMF in its annual review of the Japanese economy.





Rotating Global Imbalances

The IMF just released its latest assessments of external positions for the 29 largest economies. Global current account imbalances have rotated towards advanced economies, posing new risks and policy challenges for deficit and surplus countries alike. In a blog, IMF economists explain what this means and what can be done.





Stepping up the Fight Against Money Laundering and Terrorist Financing

Many governments have ramped up efforts to tackle money laundering and terrorist financing. In a blog, IMF chief Christine Lagarde highlights three areas where more work is needed to combat corruption and explains how the IMF can help its members through new tools and smart policy.





Ten Ways to Expand U.S. Growth

With the economy at full employment, the United States will need to gradually remove both fiscal and monetary support, while intensifying efforts to address multiple constraints on its medium-term growth prospects, the IMF says in its latest economic report.





Euro Area: There Is Recovery, But Reforms Are Needed

Euro area recovery has strengthened over the last year, bringing with it more jobs and opportunities. But even as the zone's economy gathers momentum, it still faces the hurdles of high public debt in some states, a lack of convergence in income levels among countries, and the need to reduce imbalances that built up before the crisis. 













IMF Podcast
IMF Twitter
IMF Facebook
IMF LinkedIn
IMF RSS
IMF YouTube
IMF Flickr
IMF Email Notification
IMF Social Media Hub
IMF App for iOS
IMF App for Android




SDR Rates for August 3
SDR Interest Rate = 0.590% | 1 USD = SDR 0.708005
MORE














CEMAC
Central African Economic and Monetary Community






World Economic Outlook
NEW: A Firming RecoveryUpdate: July 2017






PCI
IMF approves new policy coordination instrument








Upgraded: IMF DataMapper
NEW: World Economic Outlook
Fiscal Monitor






















What's New

{{ module.Title }}

                            {{ module.DisplayDate }}


More What's New 



















Highlights

IMF Staff Note to G-20 on Global Prospects and Policy Challenges, G-20 Leaders' Summit, Hamburg, Germany 
Frequently Asked Questions: Approval in Principle and Greece
The IMF and the Fight Against Money Laundering and the Financing of Terrorism
Global Policy Agenda: A More Inclusive and Resilient Global Economy, April 2017
IMF & the Group of Twenty
Capacity Development
Fiscal Issues at the IMF
Low-Income Countries





Accountability
IMF Integrity Hotline

Talk with us on the IMF Integrity Hotline: 800 548 5384
Independent Evaluation Office

We welcome your ideas on future evaluations and comments
            on our past and ongoing work.
Corporate Responsibility

The IMF's staff of highly qualified professionals are dedicated to the goals of the institution to promote global economic growth and stability, and raise living standards and employment.








Publications




World Economic Outlook
NEW: Update, July 2017A Firming Recovery


WEO data forum
Database




Global Financial Stability Report
 
             	 Getting the Policy Mix Right, April 2017




Fiscal Monitor
Achieving More with Less, April 2017


Fiscal Monitor Database




Finance & Development Magazine
June 2017
NEW: "Millennials and the Future of Work"



Annual Report 2016
Finding Solutions Together





Regional Economic Reports

Africa
Asia & Pacific
Europe
Middle East & Central Asia
Western Hemisphere



More Publications




























Global financial system - Wikipedia





















 







Global financial system

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search



Globalization







Outline
Portal
Studies
Project
Dimensions






Category







v
t
e





The global financial system is the worldwide framework of legal agreements, institutions, and both formal and informal economic actors that together facilitate international flows of financial capital for purposes of investment and trade financing. Since emerging in the late 19th century during the first modern wave of economic globalization, its evolution is marked by the establishment of central banks, multilateral treaties, and intergovernmental organizations aimed at improving the transparency, regulation, and effectiveness of international markets.[1][2]:74[3]:1 In the late 1800s, world migration and communication technology facilitated unprecedented growth in international trade and investment. At the onset of World War I, trade contracted as foreign exchange markets became paralyzed by money market illiquidity. Countries sought to defend against external shocks with protectionist policies and trade virtually halted by 1933, worsening the effects of the global Great Depression until a series of reciprocal trade agreements slowly reduced tariffs worldwide. Efforts to revamp the international monetary system after World War II improved exchange rate stability, fostering record growth in global finance.
A series of currency devaluations and oil crises in the 1970s led most countries to float their currencies. The world economy became increasingly financially integrated in the 1980s and 1990s due to capital account liberalization and financial deregulation. A series of financial crises in Europe, Asia, and Latin America followed with contagious effects due to greater exposure to volatile capital flows. The global financial crisis, which originated in the United States in 2007, quickly propagated among other nations and is recognized as the catalyst for the worldwide Great Recession. A market adjustment to Greece's noncompliance with its monetary union in 2009 ignited a sovereign debt crisis among European nations known as the Eurozone crisis.
A country's decision to operate an open economy and globalize its financial capital carries monetary implications captured by the balance of payments. It also renders exposure to risks in international finance, such as political deterioration, regulatory changes, foreign exchange controls, and legal uncertainties for property rights and investments. Both individuals and groups may participate in the global financial system. Consumers and international businesses undertake consumption, production, and investment. Governments and intergovernmental bodies act as purveyors of international trade, economic development, and crisis management. Regulatory bodies establish financial regulations and legal procedures, while independent bodies facilitate industry supervision. Research institutes and other associations analyze data, publish reports and policy briefs, and host public discourse on global financial affairs.
While the global financial system is edging toward greater stability, governments must deal with differing regional or national needs. Some nations are trying to orderly discontinue unconventional monetary policies installed to cultivate recovery, while others are expanding their scope and scale. Emerging market policymakers face a challenge of precision as they must carefully institute sustainable macroeconomic policies during extraordinary market sensitivity without provoking investors to retreat their capital to stronger markets. Nations' inability to align interests and achieve international consensus on matters such as banking regulation has perpetuated the risk of future global financial catastrophes.



Contents


1 History of international financial architecture

1.1 Emergence of financial globalization: 1870–1914

1.1.1 Panic of 1907
1.1.2 Birth of the U.S. Federal Reserve System: 1913


1.2 Interwar period: 1915–1944

1.2.1 Smoot–Hawley tariff of 1930
1.2.2 Formal abandonment of the Gold Standard
1.2.3 Trade liberalization in the United States


1.3 Rise of the Bretton Woods financial order: 1945

1.3.1 General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade: 1947


1.4 Resurgence of financial globalization

1.4.1 Flexible exchange rate regimes: 1973-present

1.4.1.1 The post-Bretton Woods financial order: 1976
1.4.1.2 European Monetary System: 1979


1.4.2 Birth of the World Trade Organization: 1994


1.5 Financial integration and systemic crises: 1980-present

1.5.1 Birth of the European Economic and Monetary Union 1992
1.5.2 Global financial crisis
1.5.3 Eurozone crisis




2 Implications of globalized capital

2.1 Balance of payments
2.2 Unique financial risks


3 Participants

3.1 Economic actors
3.2 Regulatory bodies
3.3 Research organizations and other fora


4 Future of the global financial system

4.1 Reform efforts


5 See also
6 References
7 Further reading



History of international financial architecture[edit]
Emergence of financial globalization: 1870–1914[edit]
Main article: Economic globalization




A map showing the route of the first transatlantic cable laid to connect North America and Europe.






The SS Great Eastern, a steamship which laid the transatlantic cable beneath the ocean.


The world experienced substantial changes prior to 1914, which created an environment favorable to an increase in and development of international financial centers. Principal among such changes were unprecedented growth in capital flows and the resulting rapid financial center integration, as well as faster communication. Before 1870, London and Paris existed as the world's only prominent financial centers.[4]:1 Soon after, Berlin and New York grew to become major financial centres. An array of smaller financial centers became important as they found market niches, such as Amsterdam, Brussels, Zurich, and Geneva. London remained the leading international financial center in the four decades leading up to World War I.[2]:74–75[5]:12–15
The first modern wave of economic globalization began during the period of 1870–1914, marked by transportation expansion, record levels of migration, enhanced communications, trade expansion, and growth in capital transfers.[2]:75 During the mid-nineteenth century, the passport system in Europe dissolved as rail transport expanded rapidly. Most countries issuing passports did not require their carry, thus people could travel freely without them.[6] The standardization of international passports would not arise until 1980 under the guidance of the United Nations' International Civil Aviation Organization.[7] From 1870 to 1915, 36 million Europeans migrated away from Europe. Approximately 25 million (or 70%) of these travelers migrated to the United States, while most of the rest reached Canada, Australia, Argentina, and Brazil. Europe itself experienced an influx of foreigners from 1860 to 1910, growing from 0.7% of the population to 1.8%. While the absence of meaningful passport requirements allowed for free travel, migration on such an enormous scale would have been prohibitively difficult if not for technological advances in transportation, particularly the expansion of railway travel and the dominance of steam-powered boats over traditional sailing ships. World railway mileage grew from 205,000 kilometers in 1870 to 925,000 kilometers in 1906, while steamboat cargo tonnage surpassed that of sailboats in the 1890s. Advancements such as the telephone and wireless telegraphy (the precursor to radio) revolutionized telecommunication by providing instantaneous communication. In 1866, the first transatlantic cable was laid beneath the ocean to connect London and New York, while Europe and Asia became connected through new landlines.[2]:75–76[8]:5
Economic globalization grew under free trade, starting in 1860 when the United Kingdom entered into a free trade agreement with France known as the Cobden–Chevalier Treaty. However, the golden age of this wave of globalization endured a return to protectionism between 1880 and 1914. In 1879, German Chancellor Otto von Bismarck introduced protective tariffs on agricultural and manufacturing goods, making Germany the first nation to institute new protective trade policies. In 1892, France introduced the Méline tariff, greatly raising customs duties on both agricultural and manufacturing goods. The United States maintained strong protectionism during most of the nineteenth century, imposing customs duties between 40 and 50% on imported goods. Despite these measures, international trade continued to grow without slowing. Paradoxically, foreign trade grew at a much faster rate during the protectionist phase of the first wave of globalization than during the free trade phase sparked by the United Kingdom.[2]:76–77
Unprecedented growth in foreign investment from the 1880s to the 1900s served as the core driver of financial globalization. The worldwide total of capital invested abroad amounted to US$44 billion in 1913 ($1.02 trillion in 2012 dollars[9]), with the greatest share of foreign assets held by the United Kingdom (42%), France (20%), Germany (13%), and the United States (8%). The Netherlands, Belgium, and Switzerland together held foreign investments on par with Germany at around 12%.[2]:77–78
Panic of 1907[edit]
Main article: Panic of 1907
See also: List of banking crises




A crowd forms on Wall Street during the Panic of 1907.


In October 1907, the United States experienced a bank run on the Knickerbocker Trust Company, forcing the trust to close on October 23, 1907, provoking further reactions. The panic was alleviated when U.S. Secretary of the Treasury George B. Cortelyou and John Pierpont "J.P." Morgan deposited $25 million and $35 million, respectively, into the reserve banks of New York City, enabling withdrawals to be fully covered. The bank run in New York led to a money market crunch which occurred simultaneously as demands for credit heightened from cereal and grain exporters. Since these demands could only be serviced through the purchase of substantial quantities of gold in London, the international markets became exposed to the crisis. The Bank of England had to sustain an artificially high discount lending rate until 1908. To service the flow of gold to the United States, the Bank of England organized a pool from among twenty-four different nations, for which the Banque de France temporarily lent £3 million (GBP, 305.6 million in 2012 GBP[10]) in gold.[2]:123–124
Birth of the U.S. Federal Reserve System: 1913[edit]
Main article: Federal Reserve System
The United States Congress passed the Federal Reserve Act in 1913, giving rise to the Federal Reserve System. Its inception drew influence from the Panic of 1907, underpinning legislators' hesitance in trusting individual investors, such as John Pierpont Morgan, to serve again as a lender of last resort. The system's design also considered the findings of the Pujo Committee's investigation of the possibility of a money trust in which Wall Street's concentration of influence over national financial matters was questioned and in which investment bankers were suspected of unusually deep involvement in the directorates of manufacturing corporations. Although the committee's findings were inconclusive, the very possibility was enough to motivate support for the long-resisted notion of establishing a central bank. The Federal Reserve's overarching aim was to become the sole lender of last resort and to resolve the inelasticity of the United States' money supply during significant shifts in money demand. In addition to addressing the underlying issues that precipitated the international ramifications of the 1907 money market crunch, New York's banks were liberated from the need to maintain their own reserves and began undertaking greater risks. New access to rediscount facilities enabled them to launch foreign branches, bolstering New York's rivalry with London's competitive discount market.[2]:123–124[5]:53[11]:18[12]
Interwar period: 1915–1944[edit]
See also: Hyperinflation in the Weimar Republic and World War I reparations




German infantry crossing a battlefield in France in August 1914.






British soldiers resting before the Battle of Mons with German troops along the French border in August 1914.


Economists have referred to the onset of World War I as the end of an age of innocence for foreign exchange markets, as it was the first geopolitical conflict to have a destabilizing and paralyzing impact. The United Kingdom declared war on Germany on August 4, 1914 following Germany's invasion of France and Belgium. In the weeks prior, the foreign exchange market in London was the first to exhibit distress. European tensions and increasing political uncertainty motivated investors to chase liquidity, prompting commercial banks to borrow heavily from London's discount market. As the money market tightened, discount lenders began rediscounting their reserves at the Bank of England rather than discounting new pounds sterling. The Bank of England was forced to raise discount rates daily for three days from 3% on July 30 to 10% by August 1. As foreign investors resorted to buying pounds for remittance to London just to pay off their newly maturing securities, the sudden demand for pounds led the pound to appreciate beyond its gold value against most major currencies, yet sharply depreciate against the French franc after French banks began liquidating their London accounts. Remittance to London became increasingly difficult and culminated in a record exchange rate of $6.50 USD/GBP. Emergency measures were introduced in the form of moratoria and extended bank holidays, but to no effect as financial contracts became informally unable to be negotiated and export embargoes thwarted gold shipments. A week later, the Bank of England began to address the deadlock in the foreign exchange markets by establishing a new channel for transatlantic payments whereby participants could make remittance payments to the U.K. by depositing gold designated for a Bank of England account with Canada's Minister of Finance, and in exchange receive pounds sterling at an exchange rate of $4.90. Approximately $104 million USD in remittances flowed through this channel in the next two months. However, pound sterling liquidity ultimately did not improve due to inadequate relief for merchant banks receiving sterling bills. As the pound sterling was the world's reserve currency and leading vehicle currency, market illiquidity and merchant banks' hesitance to accept sterling bills left currency markets paralyzed.[11]:23–24
The U.K. government attempted several measures to revive the London foreign exchange market, the most notable of which were implemented on September 5 to extend the previous moratorium through October and allow the Bank of England to temporarily loan funds to be paid back upon the end of the war in an effort to settle outstanding or unpaid acceptances for currency transactions. By mid-October, the London market began functioning properly as a result of the September measures. The war continued to present unfavorable circumstances for the foreign exchange market, such as the London Stock Exchange's prolonged closure, the redirection of economic resources to support a transition from producing exports to producing military armaments, and myriad disruptions of freight and mail. The pound sterling enjoyed general stability throughout World War I, in large part due to various steps taken by the U.K. government to influence the pound's value in ways that yet provided individuals with the freedom to continue trading currencies. Such measures included open market interventions on foreign exchange, borrowing in foreign currencies rather than in pounds sterling to finance war activities, outbound capital controls, and limited import restrictions.[11]:25–27
In 1930, the Allied powers established the Bank for International Settlements (BIS). The principal purposes of the BIS were to manage the scheduled payment of Germany's reparations imposed by the Treaty of Versailles in 1919, and to function as a bank for central banks around the world. Nations may hold a portion of their reserves as deposits with the institution. It also serves as a forum for central bank cooperation and research on international monetary and financial matters. The BIS also operates as a general trustee and facilitator of financial settlements between nations.[2]:182[13]:531–532[14]:56–57[15]:269
Smoot–Hawley tariff of 1930[edit]
Main article: Smoot–Hawley Tariff Act
U.S. President Herbert Hoover signed the Smoot–Hawley Tariff Act into law on June 17, 1930. The tariff's aim was to protect agriculture in the United States, but congressional representatives ultimately raised tariffs on a host of manufactured goods resulting in average duties as high as 53% on over a thousand various goods. Twenty-five trading partners responded in kind by introducing new tariffs on a wide range of U.S. goods. Hoover was pressured and compelled to adhere to the Republican Party's 1928 platform, which sought protective tariffs to alleviate market pressures on the nation's struggling agribusinesses and reduce the domestic unemployment rate. The culmination of the Stock Market Crash of 1929 and the onset of the Great Depression heightened fears, further pressuring Hoover to act on protective policies against the advice of Henry Ford and over 1,000 economists who protested by calling for a veto of the act.[8]:175–176[15]:186–187[16]:43–44 Exports from the United States plummeted 60% from 1930 to 1933.[8]:118 Worldwide international trade virtually ground to a halt.[17]:125–126 The international ramifications of the Smoot-Hawley tariff, comprising protectionist and discriminatory trade policies and bouts of economic nationalism, are credited by economists with prolongment and worldwide propagation of the Great Depression.[3]:2[17]:108[18]:33
Formal abandonment of the Gold Standard[edit]
Main article: Gold standard




Income per capita throughout the Great Depression as viewed from an international perspective. Triangles mark points at which nations abandoned the gold standard by suspending gold convertibility or devaluing their currencies against gold.


The classical gold standard was established in 1821 by the United Kingdom as the Bank of England enabled redemption of its banknotes for gold bullion. France, Germany, the United States, Russia, and Japan each embraced the standard one by one from 1878 to 1897, marking its international acceptance. The first departure from the standard occurred in August 1914 when these nations erected trade embargoes on gold exports and suspended redemption of gold for banknotes. Following the end of World War I on November 11, 1918, Austria, Hungary, Germany, Russia, and Poland began experiencing hyperinflation. Having informally departed from the standard, most currencies were freed from exchange rate fixing and allowed to float. Most countries throughout this period sought to gain national advantages and bolster exports by depreciating their currency values to predatory levels. A number of countries, including the United States, made unenthusiastic and uncoordinated attempts to restore the former gold standard. The early years of the Great Depression brought about bank runs in the United States, Austria, and Germany, which placed pressures on gold reserves in the United Kingdom to such a degree that the gold standard became unsustainable. Germany became the first nation to formally abandon the post-World War I gold standard when the Dresdner Bank implemented foreign exchange controls and announced bankruptcy on July 15, 1931. In September 1931, the United Kingdom allowed the pound sterling to float freely. By the end of 1931, a host of countries including Austria, Canada, Japan, and Sweden abandoned gold. Following widespread bank failures and a hemorrhaging of gold reserves, the United States broke free of the gold standard in April 1933. France would not follow suit until 1936 as investors fled from the franc due to political concerns over Prime Minister Léon Blum's government.[11]:58[17]:414[18]:32–33
Trade liberalization in the United States[edit]
Main article: Reciprocal Trade Agreements Act
See also: Glass–Steagall Legislation
The disastrous effects of the Smoot–Hawley tariff proved difficult for Herbert Hoover's 1932 re-election campaign. Franklin D. Roosevelt became the 32nd U.S. president and the Democratic Party worked to reverse trade protectionism in favor of trade liberalization. As an alternative to cutting tariffs across all imports, Democrats advocated for trade reciprocity. The U.S. Congress passed the Reciprocal Trade Agreements Act in 1934, aimed at restoring global trade and reducing unemployment. The legislation expressly authorized President Roosevelt to negotiate bilateral trade agreements and reduce tariffs considerably. If a country agreed to cut tariffs on certain commodities, the U.S. would institute corresponding cuts to promote trade between the two nations. Between 1934 and 1947, the U.S. negotiated 29 such agreements and the average tariff rate decreased by approximately one third during this same period. The legislation contained an important most-favored-nation clause, through which tariffs were equalized to all countries, such that trade agreements would not result in preferential or discriminatory tariff rates with certain countries on any particular import, due to the difficulties and inefficiencies associated with differential tariff rates. The clause effectively generalized tariff reductions from bilateral trade agreements, ultimately reducing worldwide tariff rates.[8]:176–177[15]:186–187[17]:108
Rise of the Bretton Woods financial order: 1945[edit]
Main article: Bretton Woods system




Assistant U.S. Treasury Secretary, Harry Dexter White (left) and John Maynard Keynes, honorary adviser to the U.K. Treasury at the inaugural meeting of the International Monetary Fund's Board of Governors in Savannah, Georgia, U.S., March 8, 1946.


As the inception of the United Nations as an intergovernmental entity slowly began formalizing in 1944, delegates from 44 of its early member states met at a hotel in Bretton Woods, New Hampshire for the United Nations Monetary and Financial Conference, now commonly referred to as the Bretton Woods conference. Delegates remained cognizant of the effects of the Great Depression, struggles to sustain the international gold standard during the 1930s, and related market instabilities. Whereas previous discourse on the international monetary system focused on fixed versus floating exchange rates, Bretton Woods delegates favored pegged exchange rates for their flexibility. Under this system, nations would peg their exchange rates to the U.S. dollar, which would be convertible to gold at $35 USD per ounce.[8]:448[19]:34[20]:3[21]:6 This arrangement is commonly referred to as the Bretton Woods system. Rather than maintaining fixed rates, nations would peg their currencies to the U.S. dollar and allow their exchange rates to fluctuate within a 1% band of the agreed-upon parity. To meet this requirement, central banks would intervene via sales or purchases of their currencies against the dollar.[13]:491–493[15]:296[22]:21 Members could adjust their pegs in response to long-run fundamental disequillibria in the balance of payments, but were responsible for correcting imbalances via fiscal and monetary policy tools before resorting to repegging strategies.[8]:448[23]:22 The adjustable pegging enabled greater exchange rate stability for commercial and financial transactions which fostered unprecedented growth in international trade and foreign investment. This feature grew from delegates' experiences in the 1930s when excessively volatile exchange rates and the reactive protectionist exchange controls that followed proved destructive to trade and prolonged the deflationary effects of the Great Depression. Capital mobility faced de facto limits under the system as governments instituted restrictions on capital flows and aligned their monetary policy to support their pegs.[8]:448[24]:38[25]:91[26]:30
An important component of the Bretton Woods agreements was the creation of two new international financial institutions, the International Monetary Fund (IMF) and the International Bank for Reconstruction and Development (IBRD). Collectively referred to as the Bretton Woods institutions, they became operational in 1947 and 1946 respectively. The IMF was established to support the monetary system by facilitating cooperation on international monetary issues, providing advisory and technical assistance to members, and offering emergency lending to nations experiencing repeated difficulties restoring the balance of payments equilibrium. Members would contribute funds to a pool according to their share of gross world product, from which emergency loans could be issued.[22]:21[27]:9–10[28]:20–22 Member states were authorized and encouraged to employ capital controls as necessary to manage payments imbalances and meet pegging targets, but prohibited from relying on IMF financing to cover particularly short-term capital hemorrhages.[24]:38 While the IMF was instituted to guide members and provide a short-term financing window for recurrent balance of payments deficits, the IBRD was established to serve as a type of financial intermediary for channeling global capital toward long-term investment opportunities and postwar reconstruction projects.[29]:22 The creation of these organizations was a crucial milestone in the evolution of the international financial architecture, and some economists consider it the most significant achievement of multilateral cooperation following World War II.[24]:39[30]:1–3 Since the establishment of the International Development Association (IDA) in 1960, the IBRD and IDA are together known as the World Bank. While the IBRD lends to middle-income developing countries, the IDA extends the Bank's lending program by offering concessional loans and grants to the world's poorest nations.[31]
General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade: 1947[edit]
Main article: General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade
See also: List of free trade agreements and List of international trade topics
In 1947, 23 countries concluded the General Agreement on Tariffs and Trade (GATT) at a UN conference in Geneva. Delegates intended the agreement to suffice while member states would negotiate creation of a UN body to be known as the International Trade Organization (ITO). As the ITO never became ratified, GATT became the de facto framework for later multilateral trade negotiations. Members emphasized trade reprocity as an approach to lowering barriers in pursuit of mutual gains.[16]:46 The agreement's structure enabled its signatories to codify and enforce regulations for trading of goods and services.[32]:11 GATT was centered on two precepts: trade relations needed to be equitable and nondiscriminatory, and subsidizing non-agricultural exports needed to be prohibited. As such, the agreement's most favored nation clause prohibited members from offering preferential tariff rates to any nation that it would not otherwise offer to fellow GATT members. In the event of any discovery of non-agricultural subsidies, members were authorized to offset such policies by enacting countervailing tariffs.[13]:460 The agreement provided governments with a transparent structure for managing trade relations and avoiding protectionist pressures.[17]:108 However, GATT's principles did not extend to financial activity, consistent with the era's rigid discouragement of capital movements.[33]:70–71 The agreement's initial round achieved only limited success in reducing tariffs. While the U.S. reduced its tariffs by one third, other signatories offered much smaller trade concessions.[25]:99
Resurgence of financial globalization[edit]
Flexible exchange rate regimes: 1973-present[edit]




World reserves of foreign exchange and gold in billions of U.S. dollars in 2009.


Although the exchange rate stability sustained by the Bretton Woods system facilitated expanding international trade, this early success masked its underlying design flaw, wherein there existed no mechanism for increasing the supply of international reserves to support continued growth in trade.[22]:22 The system began experiencing insurmountable market pressures and deteriorating cohesion among its key participants in the late 1950s and early 1960s. Central banks needed more U.S. dollars to hold as reserves, but were unable to expand their money supplies if doing so meant exceeding their dollar reserves and threatening their exchange rate pegs. To accommodate these needs, the Bretton Woods system depended on the United States to run dollar deficits. As a consequence, the dollar's value began exceeding its gold backing. During the early 1960s, investors could sell gold for a greater dollar exchange rate in London than in the United States, signaling to market participants that the dollar was overvalued. Belgian-American economist Robert Triffin defined this problem now known as the Triffin dilemma, in which a country's national economic interests conflict with its international objectives as the custodian of the world's reserve currency.[19]:34–35
France voiced concerns over the artificially low price of gold in 1968 and called for returns to the former gold standard. Meanwhile, excess dollars flowed into international markets as the United States expanded its money supply to accommodate the costs of its military campaign in the Vietnam War. Its gold reserves were assaulted by speculative investors following its first current account deficit since the 19th century. In August 1971, President Richard Nixon suspended the exchange of U.S. dollars for gold as part of the Nixon Shock. The closure of the gold window effectively shifted the adjustment burdens of a devalued dollar to other nations. Speculative traders chased other currencies and began selling dollars in anticipation of these currencies being revalued against the dollar. These influxes of capital presented difficulties to foreign central banks, which then faced choosing among inflationary money supplies, largely ineffective capital controls, or floating exchange rates.[19]:34–35[34]:14–15 Following these woes surrounding the U.S. dollar, the dollar price of gold was raised to $38 USD per ounce and the Bretton Woods system was modified to allow fluctuations within an augmented band of 2.25% as part of the Smithsonian Agreement signed by the G-10 members in December 1971. The agreement delayed the system's demise for a further two years.[21]:6–7 The system's erosion was expedited not only by the dollar devaluations that occurred, but also by the oil crises of the 1970s which emphasized the importance of international financial markets in petrodollar recycling and balance of payments financing. Once the world's reserve currency began to float, other nations began adopting floating exchange rate regimes.[14]:5–7
The post-Bretton Woods financial order: 1976[edit]
See also: International Monetary Fund




Headquarters of the International Monetary Fund in Washington, D.C.


As part of the first amendment to its articles of agreement in 1969, the IMF developed a new reserve instrument called special drawing rights (SDRs), which could be held by central banks and exchanged among themselves and the Fund as an alternative to gold. SDRs entered service in 1970 originally as units of a market basket of sixteen major vehicle currencies of countries whose share of total world exports exceeded 1%. The basket's composition changed over time and presently consists of the U.S. dollar, euro, Japanese yen, Chinese yuan, and British pound. Beyond holding them as reserves, nations can denominate transactions among themselves and the Fund in SDRs, although the instrument is not a vehicle for trade. In international transactions, the currency basket's portfolio characteristic affords greater stability against the uncertainties inherent with free floating exchange rates.[18]:34–35[24]:50–51[25]:117[27]:10 Special drawing rights were originally equivalent to a specified amount of gold, but were not directly redeemable for gold and instead served as a surrogate in obtaining other currencies that could be exchanged for gold. The Fund initially issued 9.5 billion XDR from 1970 to 1972.[29]:182–183
IMF members signed the Jamaica Agreement in January 1976, which ratified the end of the Bretton Woods system and reoriented the Fund's role in supporting the international monetary system. The agreement officially embraced the flexible exchange rate regimes that emerged after the failure of the Smithsonian Agreement measures. In tandem with floating exchange rates, the agreement endorsed central bank interventions aimed at clearing excessive volatility. The agreement retroactively formalized the abandonment of gold as a reserve instrument and the Fund subsequently demonetized its gold reserves, returning gold to members or selling it to provide poorer nations with relief funding. Developing countries and countries not endowed with oil export resources enjoyed greater access to IMF lending programs as a result. The Fund continued assisting nations experiencing balance of payments deficits and currency crises, but began imposing conditionality on its funding that required countries to adopt policies aimed at reducing deficits through spending cuts and tax increases, reducing protective trade barriers, and contractionary monetary policy.[18]:36[28]:47–48[35]:12–13
The second amendment to the articles of agreement was signed in 1978. It legally formalized the free-floating acceptance and gold demonetization achieved by the Jamaica Agreement, and required members to support stable exchange rates through macroeconomic policy. The post-Bretton Woods system was decentralized in that member states retained autonomy in selecting an exchange rate regime. The amendment also expanded the institution's capacity for oversight and charged members with supporting monetary sustainability by cooperating with the Fund on regime implementation.[24]:62–63[25]:138 This role is called IMF surveillance and is recognized as a pivotal point in the evolution of the Fund's mandate, which was extended beyond balance of payments issues to broader concern with internal and external stresses on countries' overall economic policies.[25]:148[30]:10–11
Under the dominance of flexible exchange rate regimes, the foreign exchange markets became significantly more volatile. In 1980, newly elected U.S. President Ronald Reagan's administration brought about increasing balance of payments deficits and budget deficits. To finance these deficits, the United States offered artificially high real interest rates to attract large inflows of foreign capital. As foreign investors' demand for U.S. dollars grew, the dollar's value appreciated substantially until reaching its peak in February 1985. The U.S. trade deficit grew to $160 billion in 1985 ($341 billion in 2012 dollars[9]) as a result of the dollar's strong appreciation. The G5 met in September 1985 at the Plaza Hotel in New York City and agreed that the dollar should depreciate against the major currencies to resolve the United States' trade deficit and pledged to support this goal with concerted foreign exchange market interventions, in what became known as the Plaza Accord. The U.S. dollar continued to depreciate, but industrialized nations became increasingly concerned that it would decline too heavily and that exchange rate volatility would increase. To address these concerns, the G7 (now G8) held a summit in Paris in 1987, where they agreed to pursue improved exchange rate stability and better coordinate their macroeconomic policies, in what became known as the Louvre Accord. This accord became the provenance of the managed float regime by which central banks jointly intervene to resolve under- and overvaluations in the foreign exchange market to stabilize otherwise freely floating currencies. Exchange rates stabilized following the embrace of managed floating during the 1990s, with a strong U.S. economic performance from 1997 to 2000 during the Dot-com bubble. After the 2000 stock market correction of the Dot-com bubble the country's trade deficit grew, the September 11 attacks increased political uncertainties, and the dollar began to depreciate in 2001.[14]:175[18]:36–37[19]:37[25]:147[36]:16–17
European Monetary System: 1979[edit]
Main article: European Monetary System
Following the Smithsonian Agreement, member states of the European Economic Community adopted a narrower currency band of 1.125% for exchange rates among their own currencies, creating a smaller scale fixed exchange rate system known as the snake in the tunnel. The snake proved unsustainable as it did not compel EEC countries to coordinate macroeconomic policies. In 1979, the European Monetary System (EMS) phased out the currency snake. The EMS featured two key components: the European Currency Unit (ECU), an artificial weighted average market basket of European Union members' currencies, and the Exchange Rate Mechanism (ERM), a procedure for managing exchange rate fluctuations in keeping with a calculated parity grid of currencies' par values.[11]:130[18]:42–44[37]:185 The parity grid was derived from parities each participating country established for its currency with all other currencies in the system, denominated in terms of ECUs. The weights within the ECU changed in response to variances in the values of each currency in its basket. Under the ERM, if an exchange rate reached its upper or lower limit (within a 2.25% band), both nations in that currency pair were obligated to intervene collectively in the foreign exchange market and buy or sell the under- or overvalued currency as necessary to return the exchange rate to its par value according to the parity matrix. The requirement of cooperative market intervention marked a key difference from the Bretton Woods system. Similarly to Bretton Woods however, EMS members could impose capital controls and other monetary policy shifts on countries responsible for exchange rates approaching their bounds, as identified by a divergence indicator which measured deviations from the ECU's value.[13]:496–497[22]:29–30 The central exchange rates of the parity grid could be adjusted in exceptional circumstances, and were modified every eight months on average during the systems' initial four years of operation.[25]:160 During its twenty-year lifespan, these central rates were adjusted over 50 times.[21]:7
Birth of the World Trade Organization: 1994[edit]
Main article: World Trade Organization




WTO Fourth Global Review of Aid for Trade: "Connecting to value chains" - 8–10 July 2013.[38]


The Uruguay Round of GATT multilateral trade negotiations took place from 1986 to 1994, with 123 nations becoming party to agreements achieved throughout the negotiations. Among the achievements were trade liberalization in agricultural goods and textiles, the General Agreement on Trade in Services, and agreements on intellectual property rights issues. The key manifestation of this round was the Marrakech Agreement signed in April 1994, which established the World Trade Organization (WTO). The WTO is a chartered multilateral trade organization, charged with continuing the GATT mandate to promote trade, govern trade relations, and prevent damaging trade practices or policies. It became operational in January 1995. Compared with its GATT secretariat predecessor, the WTO features an improved mechanism for settling trade disputes since the organization is membership-based and not dependent on consensus as in traditional trade negotiations. This function was designed to address prior weaknesses, whereby parties in dispute would invoke delays, obstruct negotiations, or fall back on weak enforcement.[8]:181[13]:459–460[16]:47 In 1997, WTO members reached an agreement which committed to softer restrictions on commercial financial services, including banking services, securities trading, and insurance services. These commitments entered into force in March 1999, consisting of 70 governments accounting for approximately 95% of worldwide financial services.[39]
Financial integration and systemic crises: 1980-present[edit]
Main article: Financial integration
See also: Currency crisis and Sovereign default




Number of countries experiencing a banking crisis in each year since 1800. This covers 70 countries. The dramatic feature of this graph is the virtual absence of banking crises during the period of the Bretton Woods system, 1945 to 1971. This analysis is similar to Figure 10.1 in Rogoff and Reinhart (2009)[40]


Financial integration among industrialized nations grew substantially during the 1980s and 1990s, as did liberalization of their capital accounts.[24]:15 Integration among financial markets and banks rendered benefits such as greater productivity and the broad sharing of risk in the macroeconomy. The resulting interdependence also carried a substantive cost in terms of shared vulnerabilities and increased exposure to systemic risks.[41]:440–441 Accompanying financial integration in recent decades was a succession of deregulation, in which countries increasingly abandoned regulations over the behavior of financial intermediaries and simplified requirements of disclosure to the public and to regulatory authorities.[14]:36–37 As economies became more open, nations became increasingly exposed to external shocks. Economists have argued greater worldwide financial integration has resulted in more volatile capital flows, thereby increasing the potential for financial market turbulence. Given greater integration among nations, a systemic crisis in one can easily infect others.[32]:136–137 The 1980s and 1990s saw a wave of currency crises and sovereign defaults, including the 1987 Black Monday stock market crashes, 1992 European Monetary System crisis, 1994 Mexican peso crisis, 1997 Asian currency crisis, 1998 Russian financial crisis, and the 1998–2002 Argentine peso crisis.[2]:254[13]:498[18]:50–58[42]:6–7[43]:26–28 These crises differed in terms of their breadth, causes, and aggravations, among which were capital flights brought about by speculative attacks on fixed exchange rate currencies perceived to be mispriced given a nation's fiscal policy,[14]:83 self-fulfilling speculative attacks by investors expecting other investors to follow suit given doubts about a nation's currency peg,[42]:7 lack of access to developed and functioning domestic capital markets in emerging market countries,[30]:87 and current account reversals during conditions of limited capital mobility and dysfunctional banking systems.[33]:99
Following research of systemic crises that plagued developing countries throughout the 1990s, economists have reached a consensus that liberalization of capital flows carries important prerequisites if these countries are to observe the benefits offered by financial globalization. Such conditions include stable macroeconomic policies, healthy fiscal policy, robust bank regulations, and strong legal protection of property rights. Economists largely favor adherence to an organized sequence of encouraging foreign direct investment, liberalizing domestic equity capital, and embracing capital outflows and short-term capital mobility only once the country has achieved functioning domestic capital markets and established a sound regulatory framework.[14]:25[24]:113 An emerging market economy must develop a credible currency in the eyes of both domestic and international investors to realize benefits of globalization such as greater liquidity, greater savings at higher interest rates, and accelerated economic growth. If a country embraces unrestrained access to foreign capital markets without maintaining a credible currency, it becomes vulnerable to speculative capital flights and sudden stops, which carry serious economic and social costs.[34]:xii
Countries sought to improve the sustainability and transparency of the global financial system in response to crises in the 1980s and 1990s. The Basel Committee on Banking Supervision was formed in 1974 by the G-10 members' central bank governors to facilitate cooperation on the supervision and regulation of banking practices. It is headquartered at the Bank for International Settlements in Basel, Switzerland. The committee has held several rounds of deliberation known collectively as the Basel Accords. The first of these accords, known as Basel I, took place in 1988 and emphasized credit risk and the assessment of different asset classes. Basel I was motivated by concerns over whether large multinational banks were appropriately regulated, stemming from observations during the 1980s Latin American debt crisis. Following Basel I, the committee published recommendations on new capital requirements for banks, which the G-10 nations implemented four years later. In 1999, the G-10 established the Financial Stability Forum (reconstituted by the G-20 in 2009 as the Financial Stability Board) to facilitate cooperation among regulatory agencies and promote stability in the global financial system. The Forum was charged with developing and codifying twelve international standards and implementation thereof.[24]:222–223[30]:12 The Basel II accord was set in 2004 and again emphasized capital requirements as a safeguard against systemic risk as well as the need for global consistency in banking regulations so as not to competitively disadvantage banks operating internationally. It was motivated by what were seen as inadequacies of the first accord such as insufficient public disclosure of banks' risk profiles and oversight by regulatory bodies. Members were slow to implement it, with major efforts by the European Union and United States taking place as late as 2007 and 2008.[14]:153[15]:486–488[24]:160–162 In 2010, the Basel Committee revised the capital requirements in a set of enhancements to Basel II known as Basel III, which centered on a leverage ratio requirement aimed at restricting excessive leveraging by banks. In addition to strengthening the ratio, Basel III modified the formulas used to weight risk and compute the capital thresholds necessary to mitigate the risks of bank holdings, concluding the capital threshold should be set at 7% of the value of a bank's risk-weighted assets.[18]:274[44]
Birth of the European Economic and Monetary Union 1992[edit]
Main article: Economic and Monetary Union of the European Union
In February 1992, European Union countries signed the Maastricht Treaty which outlined a three-stage plan to accelerate progress toward an Economic and Monetary Union (EMU). The first stage centered on liberalizing capital mobility and aligning macroeconomic policies between countries. The second stage established the European Monetary Institute which was ultimately dissolved in tandem with the establishment in 1998 of the European Central Bank (ECB) and European System of Central Banks. Key to the Maastricht Treaty was the outlining of convergence criteria that EU members would need to satisfy before being permitted to proceed. The third and final stage introduced a common currency for circulation known as the Euro, adopted by eleven of then-fifteen members of the European Union in January 1999. In doing so, they disaggregated their sovereignty in matters of monetary policy. These countries continued to circulate their national legal tenders, exchangeable for euros at fixed rates, until 2002 when the ECB began issuing official Euro coins and notes. As of 2011[update], the EMU comprises 17 nations which have issued the Euro, and 11 non-Euro states.[15]:473–474[18]:45–4[21]:7[37]:185–186
Global financial crisis[edit]
Main articles: Financial crisis of 2007–08 and Great Recession
Following the market turbulence of the 1990s financial crises and September 11 attacks on the U.S. in 2001, financial integration intensified among developed nations and emerging markets, with substantial growth in capital flows among banks and in the trading of financial derivatives and structured finance products. Worldwide international capital flows grew from $3 trillion to $11 trillion U.S. dollars from 2002 to 2007, primarily in the form of short-term money market instruments. The United States experienced growth in the size and complexity of firms engaged in a broad range of financial services across borders in the wake of the Gramm–Leach–Bliley Act of 1999 which repealed the Glass–Steagall Act of 1933, ending limitations on commercial banks' investment banking activity. Industrialized nations began relying more on foreign capital to finance domestic investment opportunities, resulting in unprecedented capital flows to advanced economies from developing countries, as reflected by global imbalances which grew to 6% of gross world product in 2007 from 3% in 2001.[18]:19[24]:129–130
The global financial crisis precipitated in 2007 and 2008 shared some of the key features exhibited by the wave of international financial crises in the 1990s, including accelerated capital influxes, weak regulatory frameworks, relaxed monetary policies, herd behavior during investment bubbles, collapsing asset prices, and massive deleveraging. The systemic problems originated in the United States and other advanced nations.[24]:133–134 Similarly to the 1997 Asian crisis, the global crisis entailed broad lending by banks undertaking unproductive real estate investments as well as poor standards of corporate governance within financial intermediaries. Particularly in the United States, the crisis was characterized by growing securitization of non-performing assets, large fiscal deficits, and excessive financing in the housing sector.[18]:18–20[33]:21–22 While the real estate bubble in the U.S. triggered the financial crisis, the bubble was financed by foreign capital flowing from many different countries. As its contagious effects began infecting other nations, the crisis became a precursor for the global economic downturn now referred to as the Great Recession. In the wake of the crisis, total volume of world trade in goods and services fell 10% from 2008 to 2009 and did not recover until 2011, with an increased concentration in emerging market countries. The global financial crisis demonstrated the negative effects of worldwide financial integration, sparking discourse on how and whether some countries should decouple themselves from the system altogether.[45][46]:3
Eurozone crisis[edit]
Main articles: European debt crisis and Great Recession in Europe
In 2009, a newly elected government in Greece revealed the falsification of its national budget data, and that its fiscal deficit for the year was 12.7% of GDP as opposed to the 3.7% espoused by the previous administration. This news alerted markets to the fact that Greece's deficit exceeded the eurozone's maximum of 3% outlined in the Economic and Monetary Union's Stability and Growth Pact. Investors concerned about a possible sovereign default rapidly sold Greek bonds. Given Greece's prior decision to embrace the euro as its currency, it no longer held monetary policy autonomy and could not intervene to depreciate a national currency to absorb the shock and boost competitiveness, as was the traditional solution to sudden capital flight. The crisis proved contagious when it spread to Portugal, Italy, and Spain (together with Greece these are collectively referred to as the PIGS). Ratings agencies downgraded these countries' debt instruments in 2010 which further increased the costliness of refinancing or repaying their national debts. The crisis continued to spread and soon grew into a European sovereign debt crisis which threatened economic recovery in the wake of the Great Recession. In tandem with the IMF, the European Union members assembled a €750 billion bailout for Greece and other afflicted nations. Additionally, the ECB pledged to purchase bonds from troubled eurozone nations in an effort to mitigate the risk of a banking system panic. The crisis is recognized by economists as highlighting the depth of financial integration in Europe, contrasted with the lack of fiscal integration and political unification necessary to prevent or decisively respond to crises. During the initial waves of the crisis, the public speculated that the turmoil could result in a disintegration of the eurozone and an abandonment of the euro. German Federal Minister of Finance Wolfgang Schäuble called for the expulsion of offending countries from the eurozone. Now commonly referred to as the Eurozone crisis, it has been ongoing since 2009 and most recently began encompassing the 2012–13 Cypriot financial crisis.[18]:12–14[47]:579–581
Implications of globalized capital[edit]
Balance of payments[edit]
Main article: Balance of payments




The top five annual current account deficits and surpluses in billions of U.S. dollars for the year 2012 based on data from the Organisation for Economic Co-operation and Development.


The balance of payments accounts summarize payments made to or received from foreign countries. Receipts are considered credit transactions while payments are considered debit transactions. The balance of payments is a function of three components: transactions involving export or import of goods and services form the current account, transactions involving purchase or sale of financial assets form the financial account, and transactions involving unconventional transfers of wealth form the capital account.[47]:306–307 The current account summarizes three variables: the trade balance, net factor income from abroad, and net unilateral transfers. The financial account summarizes the value of exports versus imports of assets, and the capital account summarizes the value of asset transfers received net of transfers given. The capital account also includes the official reserve account, which summarizes central banks' purchases and sales of domestic currency, foreign exchange, gold, and SDRs for purposes of maintaining or utilizing bank reserves.[18]:66–71[48]:169–172[49]:32–35
Because the balance of payments sums to zero, a current account surplus indicates a deficit in the asset accounts and vice versa. A current account surplus or deficit indicates the extent to which a country is relying on foreign capital to finance its consumption and investments, and whether it is living beyond its means. For example, assuming a capital account balance of zero (thus no asset transfers available for financing), a current account deficit of £1 billion implies a financial account surplus (or net asset exports) of £1 billion. A net exporter of financial assets is known as a borrower, exchanging future payments for current consumption. Further, a net export of financial assets indicates growth in a country's debt. From this perspective, the balance of payments links a nation's income to its spending by indicating the degree to which current account imbalances are financed with domestic or foreign financial capital, which illuminates how a nation's wealth is shaped over time.[18]:73[47]:308–313[48]:203 A healthy balance of payments position is important for economic growth. If countries experiencing a growth in demand have trouble sustaining a healthy balance of payments, demand can slow, leading to: unused or excess supply, discouraged foreign investment, and less attractive exports which can further reinforce a negative cycle that intensifies payments imbalances.[50]:21–22
A country's external wealth is measured by the value of its foreign assets net of its foreign liabilities. A current account surplus (and corresponding financial account deficit) indicates an increase in external wealth while a deficit indicates a decrease. Aside from current account indications of whether a country is a net buyer or net seller of assets, shifts in a nation's external wealth are influenced by capital gains and capital losses on foreign investments. Having positive external wealth means a country is a net lender (or creditor) in the world economy, while negative external wealth indicates a net borrower (or debtor).[48]:13,210
Unique financial risks[edit]
Main article: Systemic risk
Nations and international businesses face an array of financial risks unique to foreign investment activity. Political risk is the potential for losses from a foreign country's political instability or otherwise unfavorable developments, which manifests in different forms. Transfer risk emphasizes uncertainties surrounding a country's capital controls and balance of payments. Operational risk characterizes concerns over a country's regulatory policies and their impact on normal business operations. Control risk is born from uncertainties surrounding property and decision rights in the local operation of foreign direct investments.[18]:422 Credit risk implies lenders may face an absent or unfavorable regulatory framework that affords little or no legal protection of foreign investments. For example, foreign governments may commit to a sovereign default or otherwise repudiate their debt obligations to international investors without any legal consequence or recourse. Governments may decide to expropriate or nationalize foreign-held assets or enact contrived policy changes following an investor's decision to acquire assets in the host country.[48]:14–17 Country risk encompasses both political risk and credit risk, and represents the potential for unanticipated developments in a host country to threaten its capacity for debt repayment and repatriation of gains from interest and dividends.[18]:425,526[51]:216
Participants[edit]
Economic actors[edit]
See also: List of multinational corporations and List of investment banks
Each of the core economic functions, consumption, production, and investment, have become highly globalized in recent decades. While consumers increasingly import foreign goods or purchase domestic goods produced with foreign inputs, businesses continue to expand production internationally to meet an increasingly globalized consumption in the world economy. International financial integration among nations has afforded investors the opportunity to diversify their asset portfolios by investing abroad.[18]:4–5 Consumers, multinational corporations, individual and institutional investors, and financial intermediaries (such as banks) are the key economic actors within the global financial system. Central banks (such as the European Central Bank or the U.S. Federal Reserve System) undertake open market operations in their efforts to realize monetary policy goals.[20]:13–15[22]:11–13,76 International financial institutions such as the Bretton Woods institutions, multilateral development banks and other development finance institutions provide emergency financing to countries in crisis, provide risk mitigation tools to prospective foreign investors, and assemble capital for development finance and poverty reduction initiatives.[24]:243 Trade organizations such as the World Trade Organization, Institute of International Finance, and the World Federation of Exchanges attempt to ease trade, facilitate trade disputes and address economic affairs, promote standards, and sponsor research and statistics publications.[52][53][54]
Regulatory bodies[edit]
See also: List of financial regulatory authorities by country
Explicit goals of financial regulation include countries' pursuits of financial stability and the safeguarding of unsophisticated market players from fraudulent activity, while implicit goals include offering viable and competitive financial environments to world investors.[34]:57 A single nation with functioning governance, financial regulations, deposit insurance, emergency financing through discount windows, standard accounting practices, and established legal and disclosure procedures, can itself develop and grow a healthy domestic financial system. In a global context however, no central political authority exists which can extend these arrangements globally. Rather, governments have cooperated to establish a host of institutions and practices that have evolved over time and are referred to collectively as the international financial architecture.[14]:xviii[24]:2 Within this architecture, regulatory authorities such as national governments and intergovernmental organizations have the capacity to influence international financial markets. National governments may employ their finance ministries, treasuries, and regulatory agencies to impose tariffs and foreign capital controls or may use their central banks to execute a desired intervention in the open markets.[48]:17–21
Some degree of self-regulation occurs whereby banks and other financial institutions attempt to operate within guidelines set and published by multilateral organizations such as the International Monetary Fund or the Bank for International Settlements (particularly the Basel Committee on Banking Supervision and the Committee on the Global Financial System[55]).[27]:33–34 Further examples of international regulatory bodies are: the Financial Stability Board (FSB) established to coordinate information and activities among developed countries; the International Organization of Securities Commissions (IOSCO) which coordinates the regulation of financial securities; the International Association of Insurance Supervisors (IAIS) which promotes consistent insurance industry supervision; the Financial Action Task Force on Money Laundering which facilitates collaboration in battling money laundering and terrorism financing; and the International Accounting Standards Board (IASB) which publishes accounting and auditing standards. Public and private arrangements exist to assist and guide countries struggling with sovereign debt payments, such as the Paris Club and London Club.[24]:22[30]:10–11 National securities commissions and independent financial regulators maintain oversight of their industries' foreign exchange market activities.[19]:61–64 Two examples of supranational financial regulators in Europe are the European Banking Authority (EBA) which identifies systemic risks and institutional weaknesses and may overrule national regulators, and the European Shadow Financial Regulatory Committee (ESFRC) which reviews financial regulatory issues and publishes policy recommendations.[56][57]
Research organizations and other fora[edit]
Research and academic institutions, professional associations, and think-tanks aim to observe, model, understand, and publish recommendations to improve the transparency and effectiveness of the global financial system. For example, the independent non-partisan World Economic Forum facilitates the Global Agenda Council on the Global Financial System and Global Agenda Council on the International Monetary System, which report on systemic risks and assemble policy recommendations.[58][59] The Global Financial Markets Association facilitates discussion of global financial issues among members of various professional associations around the world.[60] The Group of Thirty (G30) formed in 1978 as a private, international group of consultants, researchers, and representatives committed to advancing understanding of international economics and global finance.[61]
Future of the global financial system[edit]
The IMF has reported that the global financial system is on a path to improved financial stability, but faces a host of transitional challenges borne out by regional vulnerabilities and policy regimes. One challenge is managing the United States' disengagement from its accommodative monetary policy. Doing so in an elegant, orderly manner could be difficult as markets adjust to reflect investors' expectations of a new monetary regime with higher interest rates. Interest rates could rise too sharply if exacerbated by a structural decline in market liquidity from higher interest rates and greater volatility, or by structural deleveraging in short-term securities and in the shadow banking system (particularly the mortgage market and real estate investment trusts). Other central banks are contemplating ways to exit unconventional monetary policies employed in recent years. Some nations however, such as Japan, are attempting stimulus programs at larger scales to combat deflationary pressures. The Eurozone's nations implemented myriad national reforms aimed at strengthening the monetary union and alleviating stress on banks and governments. Yet some European nations such as Portugal, Italy, and Spain continue to struggle with heavily leveraged corporate sectors and fragmented financial markets in which investors face pricing inefficiency and difficulty identifying quality assets. Banks operating in such environments may need stronger provisions in place to withstand corresponding market adjustments and absorb potential losses. Emerging market economies face challenges to greater stability as bond markets indicate heightened sensitivity to monetary easing from external investors flooding into domestic markets, rendering exposure to potential capital flights brought on by heavy corporate leveraging in expansionary credit environments. Policymakers in these economies are tasked with transitioning to more sustainable and balanced financial sectors while still fostering market growth so as not to provoke investor withdrawal.[62]:xi-xiii
The global financial crisis and Great Recession prompted renewed discourse on the architecture of the global financial system. These events called to attention financial integration, inadequacies of global governance, and the emergent systemic risks of financial globalization.[63]:2–9 Since the establishment in 1945 of a formal international monetary system with the IMF empowered as its guardian, the world has undergone extensive changes politically and economically. This has fundamentally altered the paradigm in which international financial institutions operate, increasing the complexities of the IMF and World Bank's mandates.[30]:1–2 The lack of adherence to a formal monetary system has created a void of global constraints on national macroeconomic policies and a deficit of rule-based governance of financial activities.[64]:4 French economist and Executive Director of the World Economic Forum's Reinventing Bretton Woods Committee, Marc Uzan, has pointed out that some radical proposals such as a "global central bank or a world financial authority" have been deemed impractical, leading to further consideration of medium-term efforts to improve transparency and disclosure, strengthen emerging market financial climates, bolster prudential regulatory environments in advanced nations, and better moderate capital account liberalization and exchange rate regime selection in emerging markets. He has also drawn attention to calls for increased participation from the private sector in the management of financial crises and the augmenting of multilateral institutions' resources.[30]:1–2
The Council on Foreign Relations' assessment of global finance notes that excessive institutions with overlapping directives and limited scopes of authority, coupled with difficulty aligning national interests with international reforms, are the two key weaknesses inhibiting global financial reform. Nations do not presently enjoy a comprehensive structure for macroeconomic policy coordination, and global savings imbalances have abounded before and after the global financial crisis to the extent that the United States' status as the steward of the world's reserve currency was called into question. Post-crisis efforts to pursue macroeconomic policies aimed at stabilizing foreign exchange markets have yet to be institutionalized. The lack of international consensus on how best to monitor and govern banking and investment activity threatens the world's ability to prevent future global financial crises. The slow and often delayed implementation of banking regulations that meet Basel III criteria means most of the standards will not take effect until 2019, rendering continued exposure of global finance to unregulated systemic risks. Despite Basel III and other efforts by the G20 to bolster the Financial Stability Board's capacity to facilitate cooperation and stabilizing regulatory changes, regulation exists predominantly at the national and regional levels.[65]
Reform efforts[edit]
Former World Bank Chief Economist and former Chairman of the U.S. Council of Economic Advisers Joseph E. Stiglitz referred in the late 1990s to a growing consensus that something is wrong with a system having the capacity to impose high costs on a great number of people who are hardly even participants in international financial markets, neither speculating on international investments nor borrowing in foreign currencies. He argued that foreign crises have strong worldwide repercussions due in part to the phenomenon of moral hazard, particularly when many multinational firms deliberately invest in highly risky government bonds in anticipation of a national or international bailout. Although crises can be overcome by emergency financing, employing bailouts places a heavy burden on taxpayers living in the afflicted countries, and the high costs damage standards of living. Stiglitz has advocated finding means of stabilizing short-term international capital flows without adversely affecting long-term foreign direct investment which usually carries new knowledge spillover and technological advancements into economies.[66]
American economist and former Chairman of the Federal Reserve Paul Volcker has argued that the lack of global consensus on key issues threatens efforts to reform the global financial system. He has argued that quite possibly the most important issue is a unified approach to addressing failures of systemically important financial institutions, noting public taxpayers and government officials have grown disillusioned with deploying tax revenues to bail out creditors for the sake of stopping contagion and mitigating economic disaster. Volcker has expressed an array of potential coordinated measures: increased policy surveillance by the IMF and commitment from nations to adopt agreed-upon best practices, mandatory consultation from multilateral bodies leading to more direct policy recommendations, stricter controls on national qualification for emergency financing facilities (such as those offered by the IMF or by central banks), and improved incentive structures with financial penalties.[67]
Governor of the Bank of England and former Governor of the Bank of Canada Mark Carney has described two approaches to global financial reform: shielding financial institutions from cyclic economic effects by strengthening banks individually, and defending economic cycles from banks by improving systemic resiliency. Strengthening financial institutions necessitates stronger capital requirements and liquidity provisions, as well as better measurement and management of risks. The G-20 agreed to new standards presented by the Basel Committee on Banking Supervision at its 2009 summit in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania. The standards included leverage ratio targets to supplement other capital adequacy requirements established by Basel II. Improving the resiliency of the global financial system requires protections that enable the system to withstand singular institutional and market failures. Carney has argued that policymakers have converged on the view that institutions must bear the burden of financial losses during future financial crises, and such occurrences should be well-defined and pre-planned. He suggested other national regulators follow Canada in establishing staged intervention procedures and require banks to commit to what he termed "living wills" which would detail plans for an orderly institutional failure.[68]




World leaders at the 2010 G-20 summit in Seoul, South Korea, endorsed the Basel III standards for banking regulation.


At its 2010 summit in Seoul, South Korea, the G-20 collectively endorsed a new collection of capital adequacy and liquidity standards for banks recommended by Basel III. Andreas Dombret of the Executive Board of Deutsche Bundesbank has noted a difficulty in identifying institutions that constitute systemic importance via their size, complexity, and degree of interconnectivity within the global financial system, and that efforts should be made to identify a group of 25 to 30 indisputable globally systemic institutions. He has suggested they be held to standards higher than those mandated by Basel III, and that despite the inevitability of institutional failures, such failures should not drag with them the financial systems in which they participate. Dombret has advocated for regulatory reform that extends beyond banking regulations and has argued in favor of greater transparency through increased public disclosure and increased regulation of the shadow banking system.[69]
President of the Federal Reserve Bank of New York and Vice Chairman of the Federal Open Market Committee William C. Dudley has argued that a global financial system regulated on a largely national basis is untenable for supporting a world economy with global financial firms. In 2011, he advocated five pathways to improving the safety and security of the global financial system: a special capital requirement for financial institutions deemed systemically important; a level playing field which discourages exploitation of disparate regulatory environments and beggar thy neighbour policies that serve "national constituencies at the expense of global financial stability"; superior cooperation among regional and national regulatory regimes with broader protocols for sharing information such as records for the trade of over-the-counter financial derivatives; improved delineation of "the responsibilities of the home versus the host country" when banks encounter trouble; and well-defined procedures for managing emergency liquidity solutions across borders including which parties are responsible for the risk, terms, and funding of such measures.[70]
See also[edit]

List of finance topics

References[edit]


^ James, Paul W.; Patomäki, Heikki (2007). Globalization and Economy, Vol. 2: Globalizing Finance and the N tennis ball taste like bacon ew Economy. London, UK: Sage Publications. ISBN 978-1-4129-1952-4. 
^ a b c d e f g h i j Cassis, Youssef (2006). Capitals of Capital: A History of International Financial Centres, 1780–2005. Cambridge, UK: Cambridge University Press. ISBN 978-0-511-33522-8. 
^ a b Flandreau, Marc; Holtfrerich, Carl-Ludwig; James, Harold (2003). International Financial History in the Twentieth Century: System and Anarchy. Cambridge, UK: Cambridge University Press. ISBN 978-0-511-07011-2. 
^ London and Paris as International Financial Centres in the Twentieth Century. Oxford: OUP Oxford. 2005. ISBN 9780191533471. 
^ a b Cameron, Rondo; Bovykin, V.I., eds. (1991). International Banking: 1870–1914. New York, NY: Oxford University Press. ISBN 978-0-19-506271-7. 
^ Benedictus, Leo (2006-11-16). "A brief history of the passport". The Guardian. Retrieved 2013-07-04. 
^ "International Civil Aviation Organization: A trusted international authority". Passport Canada. Retrieved 2013-07-04. 
^ a b c d e f g h Carbaugh, Robert J. (2005). International Economics, 10th Edition. Mason, OH: Thomson South-Western. ISBN 978-0-324-52724-7. 
^ a b "CPI Inflation Calculator". U.S. Bureau of Labor Statistics. Retrieved 2013-07-05. 
^ "Inflation Calculator". Bank of England. Retrieved 2013-07-05. 
^ a b c d e Atkin, John (2005). The Foreign Exchange Market of London: Development since 1900. New York, NY: Routledge. ISBN 0-203-32269-X. 
^ Kennedy, Simon (2013-05-09). "Fed in 2008 Showed Panic of 1907 Was Excessive: Cutting Research". Bloomberg. Retrieved 2013-07-09. 
^ a b c d e f Levi, Maurice D. (2005). International Finance, 4th Edition. New York, NY: Routledge. ISBN 978-0-415-30900-4. 
^ a b c d e f g h Saccomanni, Fabrizio (2008). Managing International Financial Instability: National Tamers versus Global Tigers. Cheltenham, UK: Edward Elgar Publishing Limited. ISBN 978-1-84542-142-7. 
^ a b c d e f Dunn, Robert M., Jr.; Mutti, John H. (2004). International Economics, 6th Edition. New York, NY: Routledge. ISBN 978-0-415-31154-0. CS1 maint: Multiple names: authors list (link)
^ a b c Bagwell, Kyle; Staiger, Robert W. (2004). The Economics of the World Trading System. Cambridge, MA: The MIT Press. ISBN 978-0-262-52434-6. 
^ a b c d e Thompson, Henry (2006). International Economics: Global Markets and Competition, 2nd Edition. Toh Tuck Link, Singapore: World Scientific. ISBN 978-981-256-346-0. 
^ a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q Eun, Cheol S.; Resnick, Bruce G. (2011). International Financial Management, 6th Edition. New York, NY: McGraw-Hill/Irwin. ISBN 978-0-07-803465-7. 
^ a b c d e Rosenstreich, Peter (2005). Forex Revolution: An Insider's Guide to the Real World of Foreign Exchange Trading. Upper Saddle River, NJ: Financial Times–Prentice Hall. ISBN 0-13-148690-X. 
^ a b Chen, James (2009). Essentials of Foreign Exchange Trading. Hoboken, NJ: John Wiley & Sons. ISBN 978-0-470-39086-3. 
^ a b c d DeRosa, David F. (2011). Options on Foreign Exchange, 3rd Edition. Hoboken, NJ: John Wiley & Sons. ISBN 978-1-118-09821-9. 
^ a b c d e Buckley, Adrian (2004). Multinational Finance. Harlow, UK: Pearson Education Limited. ISBN 978-0-273-68209-7. 
^ Wang, Peijie (2005). The Economics of Foreign Exchange and Global Finance. Berlin, Germany: Springer. ISBN 978-3-540-21237-9. 
^ a b c d e f g h i j k l m n Elson, Anthony (2011). Governing Global Finance: The Evolution and Reform of the International Financial Architecture. New York, NY: Palgrave Macmillan. ISBN 978-0-230-10378-8. 
^ a b c d e f g Eichengreen, Barry (2008). Globalizing Capital: A History of the International Monetary System, 2nd Edition. Princeton, NJ: Princeton University Press. ISBN 978-0-691-13937-1. 
^ Bordo, Michael D. (2000). The Globalization of International Financial Markets: What Can History Teach Us? (PDF). International Financial Markets: The Challenge of Globalization. March 31, 2000. Texas A&M University, College Station, TX. pp. 1–67. Retrieved 2012-02-01. 
^ a b c Shamah, Shani (2003). A Foreign Exchange Primer. Chichester, West Sussex, England: John Wiley & Sons. ISBN 0-470-85162-7. 
^ a b Thirkell-White, Ben (2005). The IMF and the Politics of Financial Globalization: From the Asian Crisis to a New International Financial Architecture?. New York, NY: Palgrave Macmillan. ISBN 978-1-4039-2078-2. 
^ a b Endres, Anthony M. (2005). Great Architects of International Finance. New York, NY: Routledge. ISBN 978-0-415-32412-0. 
^ a b c d e f g Uzan, Marc, ed. (2005). The Future of the International Monetary System. Northampton, MA: Edward Elgar Publishing Limited. ISBN 1-84376-805-4. 
^ International Development Association. "What is IDA?". World Bank Group. Retrieved 2012-07-01. 
^ a b Bryant, Ralph C. (2004). Crisis Prevention and Prosperity Management for the World Economy. Washington, D.C.: Brookings Institution Press. ISBN 0-8157-0867-X. 
^ a b c Makin, Anthony J. (2009). Global Imbalances, Exchange Rates and Stabilization Policy. New York, NY: Palgrave Macmillan. ISBN 978-0-230-57685-8. 
^ a b c Yadav, Vikash (2008). Risk in International Finance. New York, NY: Routledge. ISBN 978-0-415-77519-9. 
^ Stiglitz, Joseph E. (2003). Globalization and Its Discontents. New York, NY: W. W. Norton & Company. ISBN 0-393-32439-7. 
^ Reszat, Beate (2003). The Japanese Foreign Exchange Market. New Fetter Lane, London: Routledge. ISBN 0-203-22254-7. 
^ a b Steiner, Bob (2002). Foreign Exchange and Money Markets: Theory, Practice and Risk Management. Woburn, MA: Butterworth-Heinemann. ISBN 0-7506-5025-7. 
^ "Fourth Global Review of Aid for Trade: "Connecting to value chains"". World Trade Organization. 8–10 July 2013. Retrieved 8 September 2013. 
^ World Trade Organization (1999-02-15). "The WTO's financial services commitments will enter into force as scheduled" (Press release). WTO News. Retrieved 2013-08-24. 
^ Rogoff, Kenneth; Reinhart, Carmen (2009). This Time Is Different: Eight Centuries of Financial Folly. Princeton University Press. ISBN 978-0-691-14216-6. 
^ Wong, Alfred Y-T.; Fong, Tom Pak Wing (2011). "Analysing interconnectivity among countries". Emerging Markets Review. 12 (4): 432–442. doi:10.1016/j.ememar.2011.06.004. Retrieved 2014-06-11. 
^ a b Hansanti, Songporn; Islam, Sardar M. N.; Sheehan, Peter (2008). International Finance in Emerging Markets. Heidelberg, Germany: Physica-Verlag. ISBN 978-3-7908-2555-8. 
^ Homaifar, Ghassem A. (2004). Managing Global Financial and Foreign Exchange Risk. Hoboken, NJ: John Wiley & Sons. ISBN 978-0-471-28115-3. 
^ Hamilton, Jesse; Onaran, Yalman (2013-07-09). "U.S. Boosts Bank Capital Demands Above Global Standards". Bloomberg. Retrieved 2013-09-07. 
^ Arndt, Sven W.; Crowley, Patrick M.; Mayes, David G. (2009). "The implications of integration for globalization". North American Journal of Economics and Finance. 20 (2): 83–90. doi:10.1016/j.najef.2009.08.001. Retrieved 2011-11-30. 
^ Lawrence, Robert Z.; Hanouz, Margareta Drzeniek; Doherty, Sean (2012). The Global Enabling Trade Report 2012: Reducing Supply Chain Barriers (PDF) (Report). World Economic Forum. Retrieved 2013-05-23. 
^ a b c Krugman, Paul R.; Obstfeld, Maurice; Melitz, Marc J. (2012). International Economics: Theory & Policy, 9th Edition. Boston, MA: Addison-Wesley. ISBN 978-0-13-214665-4. 
^ a b c d e Feenstra, Robert C.; Taylor, Alan M. (2008). International Macroeconomics. New York, NY: Worth Publishers. ISBN 978-1-4292-0691-4. 
^ Madura, Jeff (2007). International Financial Management: Abridged 8th Edition. Mason, OH: Thomson South-Western. ISBN 0-324-36563-2. 
^ Thirlwall, A.P. (2004). "The balance of payments constraint as an explanation of international growth rate differences". In McCombie, J.S.L.; Thirlwall, A.P. Essays on Balance of Payments Constrained Growth: Theory and Evidence. London, UK: Routledge. ISBN 0-203-49536-5. 
^ Melvin, Michael; Norrbin, Stefan C. (2013). International Money and Finance, 8th Edition. Waltham, MA: Elsevier. ISBN 978-0-12-385247-2. 
^ "What we do". World Trade Organization. Retrieved 2013-12-03. 
^ "About IIF". Institute of International Finance. Retrieved 2013-11-29. 
^ "About WFE". World Federation of Exchanges. Retrieved 2013-11-29. 
^ "Committee on the Global Financial System". Bank for International Settlements. Retrieved 2013-11-29. 
^ "About us". European Banking Authority. Retrieved 2013-12-05. 
^ "The European Shadow Financial Regulatory Committee (ESFRC)". Centre for European Policy Studies. Retrieved 2013-12-05. 
^ "Global Agenda Council on the Global Financial System 2012–2014". World Economic Forum. Retrieved 2013-12-06. 
^ "Global Agenda Council on the International Monetary System 2012–2014". World Economic Forum. Retrieved 2013-12-06. 
^ "About GFMA". Global Financial Markets Association. Retrieved 2013-12-06. 
^ "History of the Group". Group of Thirty. Retrieved 2014-09-03. 
^ Global Financial Stability Report: Transition Challenges to Stability, October 2013 (PDF) (Report). International Monetary Fund. 2013. Retrieved 2013-05-23. 
^ Wyman, Oliver (2010). The Future of the Global Financial System: Navigating the Challenges Ahead (PDF) (Report). World Economic Forum. Retrieved 2013-06-22. 
^ Hieronymi, Otto (2009). Globalization and the Reform of the International Banking and Monetary System. New York, NY: Palgrave Macmillan. ISBN 978-0-230-23530-4. 
^ "The Global Finance Regime". Council on Foreign Relations. Retrieved 2014-01-04. 
^ Stiglitz, Joseph E. (Spring 1999). "Interviews - Joseph E. Stiglitz | The Crash". Frontline (Interview). PBS. Archived from the original on April 14, 2014. Retrieved 2013-12-29. 
^ Volcker, Paul (2012-06-06). "Is global financial reform possible?". The Guardian. Retrieved 2013-09-21. 
^ Carney, Mark (2009-10-26). Reforming the global financial system (PDF) (Speech). Rendez-vous avec 'Autorité des marchés financiers. Montréal, Québec, Canada. Retrieved 2013-12-07. 
^ Dombret, Andreas (2011-06-16). Reform of the global financial system (PDF) (Speech). Generation Forum. Eltville, Germany. Retrieved 2013-12-07. 
^ Dudley, William C. (2011-04-11). Regulatory reform of the global financial system (PDF) (Speech). Meeting hosted by the Institute of Regulation & Risk. Tokyo, Japan. Retrieved 2013-12-07. 


Further reading[edit]

James, Paul; Patomäki, Heikki (2007). Globalization and Economy, Vol. 2: Global Finance and the New Global Economy. London: Sage Publications. 
Reinhart, Carmen; Rogoff, Kenneth (2009). This time is different: Eight centuries of financial folly. Princeton University Press. ISBN 978-0-691-15264-6. 







v
t
e


General areas of finance






Computational finance
Experimental finance
Financial economics
Financial institutions
Financial markets
Investment management
Mathematical finance
Personal finance
Public finance
Quantitative behavioral finance
Quantum finance
Statistical finance












v
t
e


Central banks



Global



Bank for International Settlements
Basel Committee on Banking Supervision
Financial Stability Board





Policies



Capital requirement
Contractionary monetary policy
Expansionary monetary policy
Basel II
Basel III
Basel 4





Implementation



Capital control
Discount rate
Interest rates
Money creation
Open market operation
Sovereign wealth fund





Bretton Woods system



International Monetary Fund
World Bank Group

International Bank for Reconstruction and Development
International Centre for Settlement of Investment Disputes
International Development Association
International Finance Corporation
Multilateral Investment Guarantee Agency







Lists



List of central banks
Central banks and currencies of Africa
Central banks and currencies of Asia-Pacific
Central banks and currencies of the Caribbean
Central banks and currencies of Europe
Central banks and currencies of Central America and South America












v
t
e


Globalization






Books
Journals
Lists
Outline
Studies
Terms
Writers





Aspects



Alter-globalization
Anti-globalization
Counter-hegemonic globalization
Cultural globalization
Deglobalization
Democratic globalization
Economic globalization
Environmental globalization
Financial globalization
Global citizenship

education


Global governance
Global health
History of globalization

archaic
early modern


Military globalization
Political globalization
Trade globalization
Workforce globalization





Issues




Global



Disease
Digital divide
Labor arbitrage
Population
Warming
Water crisis





Other



Brain drain

reverse


Climate change
Climate justice
Development aid
Economic inequality
Endangered languages
Fair trade
Forced migration
Human rights
Illicit financial flows
Invasive species
Investor-state disputes
New international division of labour
North–South divide
Offshoring
Race to the bottom

pollution havens


Transnational crime
McDonaldization
Westernization
American imperialism
British Empire
World war








Theories



Capital accumulation
Dependency
Development
Earth system
Fiscal localism
Modernization

ecological
history of


Primitive accumulation
Social change
World history
World-systems





Notable
scholars



Samir Amin
Arjun Appadurai
K. Anthony Appiah
Daniele Archibugi
Giovanni Arrighi
Ravi Batra
Jean Baudrillard
Zygmunt Bauman
Ulrich Beck
Walden Bello
Jagdish Bhagwati
Robert Brenner
Manuel Castells
Noam Chomsky
Alfred Crosby
Christopher Chase-Dunn
Andre G. Frank
Thomas Friedman
Anthony Giddens
Peter Gowan
Michael Hardt
David Harvey
David Held
Paul Hirst
Michael Hudson
Paul James
Ibn Khaldun
Naomi Klein
Antonio Negri
George Ritzer
Jeffrey Sachs
Saskia Sassen
John R. Saul
Vandana Shiva
Joseph Stiglitz
John Urry
Immanuel Wallerstein








 Portal
 Category
 Commons
 WikiProject










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Global_financial_system&oldid=791900715"					
Categories: Economic systemsInternational financeInternational tradeHidden categories: CS1 maint: Multiple names: authors listGood articlesArticles containing potentially dated statements from 2011All articles containing potentially dated statements 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


БългарскиDanskDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançaisBahasa IndonesiaÍslenskaPortuguêsУкраїнськаTiếng Việt中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 23 July 2017, at 04:51.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 












Barter - IMS Barter Trade Exchange Network - It’s Barter, just much bigger and way better































Skip to navigation


Skip to content






 












Franchise 


Corporate 





Join Today



Sign In







Username

Password



Remember me

Sign in
Register






Forgot your password?








Contact Us





800.559.8515


800.559.8515


email: go-ims@imsbarter.com



View Complete IMS Office Contact Map


Follow Us!


















Serving Business Communities for over 31 years











Home


Save Cash



Attract New Customers




Increase Sales




Learn More




See How IMS Works


Save Cash Everyday


Shop with Trade


Attract New Customers


Sales and Marketing Team


Increase Sales on Trade


Everyday Selling Price


What are Trade Dollars?


Online IMS Account


Join IMS Barter


About IMS Barter


Affiliations




More Information


IMS in the News


Bloomberg Television


New York Times


CNN Money


CBS


Crains New York


AOL News


Corp Magazine


Business Journal


Crain's Chicago Business


Chattanooga Times Free Press


BizTimes.com


Columbus Dispatch


PMQ Magazine


Hartford Business Journal


Buyer Interactive


Optometry Times


Stamford Times


Business Image Magazine


Patriot Ledger


Fresh Cup Magazine


QSR Magazine


Meetings Net


Vows Magazine


Fox Business Network


CNBC


WCBS New York City


WCBS New York City - 2


KLAS Las Vegas


Fox Business - Neil Cavuto


CBS Evening News


KVTN Reno


Antique Week


Plumbing & Mechanical


Fox 6 Milwaukee


Daily Herald


Indianapolis Woman


ACDIS


Medical Office Today


GoPlow.com


American Business Magazine


Life Reimagined


SmallBizClub


Retail Merchandiser


Ground Report


Cleaning & Maintenance Management Online


Small Business Digest


TD Monthly


Entrepreneur Magazine




IMS Barter Million Dollar Club





Try It




Member Directory


Marketplace


Travel



















 Barter when you need results.  Sell your goods and services

through a nationwide audience

instead of taking costly markdowns or

having unused time or space.  See how  Barter with IMS!  At IMS Barter we set out every day to 

change the way the world does business.  To accomplish this we strive to deliver

the nation's largest barter network  with the most dedicated trade brokers and

most satisified member trade companies.  Learn more  Costly markdowns and  unused time or space  eat away at your bottom line.  Sell your excess  inventory and capacity  to a nationwide audience  through IMS Barter!  Smart  Businesses  Choose  Barter.  IMS Barter can  help your company...  grow!  grow!  Learn how  Save Cash!  Attract New Customers!  Increase Sales!  Who Barters  in your  Neighborhood?  Find out more  "A Journey of a Thousand Miles   Must Begin with a Single Step."  —Lao Tzu  Visit IMS Travel  Visit IMS Travel  To Begin Your Journey  Who Barters in Your Neighborhood?  Become a member  of IMS Barter,  the largest nationwide  trade network,  and attract  new customers!  Over   16,000  Member  Businesses 









        See How IMS Works
      

	                          Partnering with IMS is simple: we help you sell your excess products and unused time to the other 16,000 members within the IMS network. In return…



          More →
        









        IMS is in the News
      

	                          Bartering is big business, and business is booming! Watch, read, and review what the media has to say about IMS Barter.



          More →
        









        See What Our Members Say
      

	                          Why join IMS Barter? Our members can tell you! See what members from all over North America are saying about IMS Barter.



          More →
        












Site Map


Privacy Policy


Terms of Use


Rules and Regulations


Logos



International Monetary Systems, Ltd. copyright © 2002-2017























x


Attention




















INTERNATIONAL MONETARY SYSTEMS LTD (ITNM) 10-K and 10-Q SEC Filings :: Last10K.com























		 
	




INTERNATIONAL MONETARY SYSTEMS LTD (ITNM) SEC Filing 10-K Annual report for the fiscal year ending Thursday, December 31, 2015














last10k.com/sec-filings/itnm/0001213900-16-011686.htm



10-K Annual Summary
10-K Annual Report
10-K Exhibits
10-K Statistics




Document and Entity Information - USD ($)12 Months EndedDec. 31, 2015Mar. 01, 2016Jun. 30, 2015Document and Entity Information [Abstract]   Entity Registrant NameINTERNATIONAL MONETARY SYSTEMS LTD /WI/  Entity Central Index Key0001097430  Amendment Flagfalse  Current Fiscal Year End Date--12-31  Document Type10-K  Document Period End DateDec. 31,  2015  Document Fiscal Year Focus2015  Document Fiscal Period FocusFY  Entity Well-Known Seasoned IssuerNo  Entity Voluntary FilersNo  Entity Current Reporting StatusYes  Entity Filer CategorySmaller Reporting Company  Entity Public Float  $ 1,119,565Entity Common Stock, Shares Outstanding 587,652 






Click to view a specific section in this 10-K Report
View entire 10-K Report
Consolidated Balance Sheets
Consolidated Balance Sheets (parenthetical)
Consolidated Statements Of Operations And Comprehensive Income
Consolidated Statements Of Stockholders' Equity
Consolidated Statements Of Cash Flows
Information About The Company And Summary Of Significant Accounting Policies
Marketable Securities
Intangible Assets, Net
Property And Equipment, Net
Debt
Deferred Compensation
Income Taxes
Stockholders' Equity
Related Party Transactions
Commitments And Contingencies
Subsequent Events
Information About The Company And Summary Of Significant Accounting Policies (policies)
Marketable Securities (tables)
Intangible Assets, Net (tables)
Property And Equipment, Net (tables)
Debt (tables)
Income Taxes (tables)
Commitments And Contingencies (tables)
Information About The Company And Summary Of Significant Accounting Policies (details)
Marketable Securities (details)
Intangible Assets, Net (details)
Intangible Assets, Net (details 1)
Intangible Assets, Net (details Textual)
Property And Equipment, Net (details)
Property And Equipment, Net (details Textual)
Debt (details)
Debt (details 1)
Debt (details Textual)
Deferred Compensation (details)
Income Taxes (details)
Income Taxes (details 1)
Income Taxes (details 2)
Income Taxes (details Textual)
Stockholders' Equity (details)
Related Party Transactions (details)
Commitments And Contingencies (details)
Commitments And Contingencies (details 1)
Commitments And Contingencies (details Textual)
Subsequent Events (details)


 Please wait while we load the requested 10-K Annual report. If it does not load, please click the link below:
                         https://www.last10k.com/sec-filings/report/1097430/000121390016011686/f10k2015_internationalmonet.htm




Companies may provide additional information to their SEC Filings as exhibits. Click a link below to view an exhibit that was filed with this report:


                    Exhibit 31.1 - CERTIFICATION
                

 Please wait while we load the requested exhibit. If it does not load, please click the link below:
                     https://www.last10k.com/sec-filings/report/1097430/000121390016011686/f10k2015ex31i_international.htm



                    Exhibit 31.2 - CERTIFICATION
                

 Please wait while we load the requested exhibit. If it does not load, please click the link below:
                     https://www.last10k.com/sec-filings/report/1097430/000121390016011686/f10k2015ex31ii_international.htm



                    Exhibit 32.1 - CERTIFICATION
                

 Please wait while we load the requested exhibit. If it does not load, please click the link below:
                     https://www.last10k.com/sec-filings/report/1097430/000121390016011686/f10k2015ex32i_international.htm



                    Exhibit 32.2 - CERTIFICATION
                

 Please wait while we load the requested exhibit. If it does not load, please click the link below:
                     https://www.last10k.com/sec-filings/report/1097430/000121390016011686/f10k2015ex32ii_international.htm






Form Type: Annual
Number of times amended: 0
Accession Number: 0001213900-16-011686
Submitted to the SEC: Thursday, March 17, 2016
Accepted by the SEC: Thursday, March 17, 2016
Period Ending: December 2015












Financial Ratios
Intrinsic Value
Financial Stability

















Companies

 Add



ITNM





10-K
10-Q




10-K Annual ReportMarch 2016

Sponsored links 




10-K Annual ReportMarch 2015

10-K Annual ReportMarch 2014

10-K Annual ReportMarch 2013

10-K Annual ReportMarch 2012


10-K Annual ReportMarch 2011

10-K Annual ReportApril 2010

10-K Annual ReportApril 2009
 




10-Q Quarterly ReportMay 2016

10-Q Quarterly ReportNovember 2015

10-Q Quarterly ReportAugust 2015

10-Q Quarterly ReportMay 2015

10-Q Quarterly ReportNovember 2014
 


INTERNATIONAL MONETARY SYSTEMS LTD

	$6.00 +0 (+0%)
	
Stock Exchange:
Over-the-Counter (OTC)

Day's Range:
		N/A 
	
52-Week Range:
	$4.95 to $6.75
Volume:
	N/A
Volume (Avg):
	66
Earnings per Share:
	$0.08
PEG / Short / PE Ratios:
	0.00 / 0.00 / 80.00
Market Cap:
	$3.50M
Book Value:
	5.95
EBITDA:
	$1.30M







Sponsored links 























